THE OAK OPENINGS.
CHAPTER I.
How doth the little busy bee
Improve each shining hour,
And gather honey all the day,
From every opening flower.
Watts' Hymns for Children
.
We
have heard of those who fancied that they beheld a
signal instance of the hand of the Creator in the celebrated
cataract of Niagara. Such instances of the power of
sensible
and near objects to influence certain minds, only
prove how much easier it is to impress the imaginations
of the dull with images that are novel, than with those that
are less apparent, though of infinitely greater magnitude.
Thus, it would seem to be strange, indeed, that any human
being should find more to wonder at in any one of the
phenomena
of the earth, than in the earth itself; or, should
specially
stand astonished at the might of Him who created the
world, when each night brings into view a firmament studded
with other worlds, each equally the work of His hands!
Nevertheless, there is (at bottom) a motive for adoration,
in the study of the lowest fruits of the wisdom and power
of God. The leaf is as much beyond our comprehension
of remote causes, as much a subject of intelligent
admiration
,
as the tree which bears it: the single tree confounds
our knowledge and researches the same as the entire forest;
and, though a variety that appears to be endless pervades
the world, the same admirable adaptation of means to
ends, the same bountiful forethought, and the same
benevolent
wisdom are to be found in the acorn, as in the
gnarled branch on which it grew.
The American forest has so often been described, as to
cause one to hesitate about reviving scenes that might
possibly
pall, and in retouching pictures that have been so
frequently
painted as to be familiar to every mind. But God
created the woods, and the themes bestowed by his bounty
are inexhaustible. Even the ocean, with its boundless
waste of water, has been found to be rich in its various
beauties and marvels; and he who shall bury himself with
us, once more, in the virgin forests of this wide-spread
land, may possibly discover new subjects of admiration, new
causes to adore the being that has brought all into
existence
,
from the universe to its most minute particle.
The precise period of our legend was in the year 1812,
and the season of the year the pleasant month of July,
which had now drawn near to its close. The sun was
already
approaching the western limits of a wooded view,
when the actors in its opening scene must appear on a
stage that is worthy of a more particular description.
The region was, in one sense, wild, though it offered a
picture that was not without some of the strongest and most
pleasing features of civilization. The country was what
is termed rolling, from some fancied resemblance to the
surface of the ocean, when it is just undulating with a
long ground-swell. Although wooded, it was not as the
American forest is wont to grow, with tall straight trees
towering towards the light, but with intervals between the
low oaks that were scattered profusely over the view, and
with much of that air of negligence that one is apt to see
in grounds, where art is made to assume the character of
nature. The trees, with very few exceptions, were what
is called the burr oak, a small variety of a very
extensive
genus; and the spaces between them, always irregular,
and often of singular beauty, have obtained the name of
openings; the two terms combined giving their
appellation
to this particular species of native forest, under the
name of Oak Openings.
These woods, so peculiar to certain districts of country,
are not altogether without some variety, though possessing
a general character of sameness. The trees were of very
uniform size, being little taller than pear trees, which they
resemble a good deal in form; and having trunks that rarely
attain two feet in diameter. The variety is produced by
their distribution. In places they stand with a regularity
resembling that of an orchard; then, again, they are more
scattered and less formal, while wide breadths of the land
are occasionally seen in which they stand in copses, with
vacant spaces, that bear no small affinity to artificial lawns,
being covered with verdure. The grasses are supposed to
be owing to the fires lighted periodically by the Indians in
order to clear their hunting-grounds.
Towards one of these grassy glades, which was spread
on an almost imperceptible acclivity, and which might have
contained some fifty or sixty acres of land, the reader is
now requested to turn his eyes. Far in the wilderness as
was the spot, four men were there, and two of them had
even some of the appliances of civilization about them.
The woods around were the then unpeopled forest of
Michigan
,
and the small winding reach of placid water that
was just visible in the distance, was an elbow of the
Kalamazoo
,
a beautiful little river that flows westward,
emptying
its tribute into the vast expanse of Lake Michigan.
Now, this river has already become known, by its villages
and farms, and railroads and mills; but then, not a
dwelling
of more pretension than the wigwam of the Indian, or
an occasional shanty of some white adventurer, had ever
been seen on its banks. In that day, the whole of that fine
peninsula, with the exception of a narrow belt of country
along the Detroit river, which was settled by the French as
far back as near the close of the seventeenth century, was
literally a wilderness. If a white man found his way into
it, it was as an Indian trader, a hunter, or an adventurer in
some other of the pursuits connected with border life and
the habits of the savages.
Of this last character were two of the men on the open
glade just mentioned, while their companions were of the
race of the aborigines. What is much more remarkable,
the four were absolutely strangers to each other's faces,
having met for the first time in their lives, only an hour
previously to the commencement of our tale. By saying
that they were strangers to each other, we do not mean that
the white men were acquaintances, and the Indians
strangers
,
but that neither of the four had ever seen either of the
party until they met on that grassy glade, though fame had
made them somewhat acquainted through their reputations. At the moment when we desire to present this group to the
imagination of the reader, three of its number were grave
and silent observers of the movements of the fourth. The
fourth individual was of middle size, young, active,
exceedingly
well formed, and with a certain open and frank
expression
of countenance, that rendered him at least
well-looking
,
though slightly marked with the small-pox. His
real name was Benjamin Boden, though he was extensively
known throughout the north-western territories by the
sobriquet
of Ben Buzzextensively as to distances, if not
as to people. By the
voyageurs
, and other French of that
region, he was almost universally styled
le Bourdon
, or the
Drone; not, however, from his idleness or inactivity, but
from the circumstance that he was notorious for laying his
hands on the products of labour that proceeded from others.
In a word, Ben Boden was a bee-hunter, and as he was
one of the first to exercise his craft in that portion of the
country, so was he infinitely the most skilful and
prosperous
.
The honey of
le Bourdon
was not only thought
to be purer and of higher flavour than that of any other
trader in the article, but it was much the most abundant.
There were a score of respectable families on the two
banks of the Detroit, who never purchased of any one else,
but who patiently waited for the arrival of the capacious
bark canoe of Buzz, in the autumn, to lay in their supplies
of this savoury nutriment for the approaching winter. The
whole family of griddle cakes, including those of buckwheat,
Indian, rice and wheaten flour, were more or less
dependent
on the safe arrival of
le Bourdon
, for their popularity
and welcome. Honey was eaten with all; and
wild
honey
had a reputation, rightfully or not obtained, that even
rendered
it more welcome than that which was formed by the
labour and art of the domesticated bee.
The dress of
le Bourdon
was well adapted to his
pursuits
and life. He wore a hunting-shirt and trowsers, made
of thin stuff, which was dyed green, and trimmed with
yellow fringe. This was the ordinary forest attire of the
Vol. I.  2
American rifleman; being of a character, as it was thought,
to conceal the person in the woods, by blending its hues
with those of the forest. On his head Ben wore a skin
cap, somewhat smartly made, but without the fur; the
weather being warm. His moccasins were a good deal
wrought, but seemed to be fading under the exposure of
many marches. His arms were excellent; but all his
martial
accoutrements, even to a keen long-bladed knife, were
suspended from the rammer of his rifle; the weapon itself
being allowed to lean, in careless confidence, against the
trunk of the nearest oak, as if their master felt there was
no immediate use for them.
Not so with the other three. Not only was each man
well armed, but each man kept his trusty rifle hugged to
his person, in a sort of jealous watchfulness; while the
other white man, from time to time, secretly, but with great
minuteness, examined the flint and priming of his own
piece. This second pale-face was a very different person
from him just described. He was still young, tall, sinewy,
gaunt, yet springy and strong, stooping and
round-shouldered
,
with a face that carried a very decided top-light in
it, like that of the notorious Bardolph. In short, whiskey
had dyed the countenance of Gershom Waring with a
tell-tale
hue, that did not less infallibly betray his destination,
than his speech denoted his origin, which was clearly from
one of the states of New England. But Gershom had
been so long at the North-West as to have lost many of
his peculiar habits and opinions, and to have obtained
substitutes
.
Of the Indians, one, an elderly, wary, experienced
warrior
,
was a Pottawattamie, named Elksfoot, who was well
known at all the trading-houses and garrisons of the
North-Western Territory, including Michigan as low down
as Detroit itself. The other red man was a young
Chippewa
,
or O-jeb-way, as the civilized natives of that nation
now tell us the word should be spelled. His ordinary
appellation
among his own people was that of Pigeonswing;
a name obtained from the rapidity and length of his flights.
This young man, who was scarcely turned of
five-and-twenty
,
had already obtained a high reputation among the
numerous tribes of his nation, as a messenger, or runner.
Accident had brought these four persons, each and all
strangers to one another, in communication in the glade
of the Oak Openings, which has already been mentioned,
within half an hour of the scene we are about to present
to the reader. Although the rencontre had been
accompanied
by the usual precautions of those who meet in a
wilderness, it had been friendly so far; a circumstance that
was in some measure owing to the interest they all took in
the occupation of the bee-hunter. The three others, indeed,
had come in on different trails, and surprised le Bourdon
in the midst of one of the most exciting exhibitions of his
artan exhibition that awoke so much and so common an
interest in the spectators, as at once to place its
continuance
for the moment above all other considerations. After
brief salutations, and wary examinations of the spot and
its tenants, each individual had, in succession, given his
grave attention to what was going on, and all had united in
begging Ben Buzz to pursue his occupation, without
regard
to his visiters. The conversation that took place was
partly in English, and partly in one of the Indian dialects,
which luckily all the parties appeared to understand. As
a matter of course, with a sole view to oblige the reader,
we shall render what was said, freely, into the vernacular.
Let's see, let's see,
stranger
, cried Gershom,
emphasizing
the syllable we have put in italics, as if especially
to betray his origin, what you can do with your tools.
I've heer'n tell of such doin's, but never see'd a bee lined
in all my life, and have a desp'rate fancy for larnin' of all
sorts, from 'rithmetic to preachin'.
That comes from your puritan blood, answered
le
Bourdon
, with a quiet smile, using surprisingly pure
English
for one in his class of life. They tell me you
puritans
preach by instinct.
I don't know how that is, answered Gershom,
though I can turn my hand to anything. I heer'n tell;
across at Bob Ruly (
Bois Brul
[1]
[1]
This unfortunate name, which it may be necessary to tell a
portion of our readers means Burnt Wood, seems condemned to
all sorts of abuses among the linguists of the west. Among other
pronunciations is that of Bob Ruly; while an island near
Detroit
,
the proper name of which is Bois Blanc, is familiarly
known to the lake mariners by the name of Bobolo.
) of sich doin's, and
would give a week's keep at Whiskey Centre, to know
how t'was done.
Whiskey Centre was a sobriquet bestowed by the
fresh-water sailors of that region, and the few other white
adventurers of Saxon origin who found their way into that
trackless region, firstly on Gershom himself, and secondly
on his residence. These names were obtained from the
intensity of their respective characters, in favour of the
beverage
named.
L'cau de mort
, was the place termed by
the
voyageurs
, in a sort of pleasant travesty on the
cau de
vie
of their distant, but still well-remembered manufactures
on the banks of the Garonne. Ben Boden, however, paid
but little attention to the drawling remarks of Gershom
Waring. This was not the first time he had heard of
Whiskey Centre, though the first time he had ever seen
the man himself. His attention was on his own trade, or
present occupation; and when it wandered at all, it was
principally bestowed on the Indians; more especially on
the runner. Of Elk's foot, or Elksfoot, as we prefer to
spell it, he had some knowledge by means of rumour; and
the little he knew rendered him somewhat more indifferent
to his proceedings, than he felt towards those of the
Pigeonswing
.
Of this young red-skin he had never heard; and,
while he managed to suppress all exhibition of the feeling,
a lively curiosity to learn the Chippewa's business was
uppermost in his mind. As for Gershom, he had taken
his
measure at a glance, and had instantly set him down to be,
what in truth he was, a wandering, drinking, reckless
adventurer
,
who had a multitude of vices and bad qualities,
mixed up with a few that, if not absolutely redeeming,
served to diminish the disgust in which he might otherwise
have been held by all decent people. In the meanwhile,
the bee-hunting, in which all the spectators took so much
interest, went on. As this is a process with which most
of our readers are probably unacquainted, it may be
necessary
to explain the
modus operandi
, as well as the
appliances
used.
The tools of Ben Buzz, as Gershom had termed these
implements of his trade, were neither very numerous nor
very complex. They were all contained in a small covered
wooden pail, like those that artisans and labourers are
accustomed to carry for the purposes of conveying their
food from place to place. Uncovering this, le Bourdon
had brought his implements to view, previously to the
moment
when he was first seen by the reader. There was a
small covered cup of tin; a wooden box; a sort of plate,
or platter, made also of wood; and a common tumbler, of
a very inferior, greenish glass. In the year 1812, there
was not a pane, nor a vessel, of clear, transparent glass,
made in all America! Now, some of the most beautiful
manufactures of that sort, known to civilization, are
abundantly
produced among us, in common with a thousand
other articles that are used in domestic economy. The
tumbler of Ben Buzz, however, was his countryman in
more senses than one. It was not only American, but it
came from the part of Pennsylvania of which he was
himself
a native. Blurred, and of a greenish hue, the glass
was the best that Pittsburg could then fabricate, and Ben
had bought it only the year before, on the very spot where
it had been made.
An oak, of more size than usual, had stood a little
remote
from its fellows, or more within the open ground of
the glade than the rest of the orchard. Lightning had
struck this tree that very summer, twisting off its trunk at
a height of about four feet from the ground. Several
fragments
of the body and branches lay near, and on these the
spectators now took their seats, watching attentively the
movements of the bee-hunter. Of the stump Ben had made
a sort of table, first levelling its splinters with an axe, and
on it he placed the several implements of his craft, as he
had need of each in succession.
The wooden platter was first placed on this rude table.
Then le Bourdon opened his small box, and took out of it
a piece of honey-comb, that was circular in shape, and
about an inch and a half in diameter. The little covered
tin vessel was next brought into use. Some pure and
beautifully clear honey was poured from its spout, into the
cells of the piece of comb, until each of them was about
half filled. The tumbler was next taken in hand, carefully
wiped, and examined, by holding it up before the eyes of
the bee-hunter. Certainly, there was little to admire in it,
but it was sufficiently transparent to answer his purposes.
2*
All he asked was to be able to look through the glass in
order to see what was going on, in its interior.
Having made these preliminary arrangements, Buzzing
Ben  for the
sobriquet
was applied to him in this form
quite as often as in the other  next turned his attention
to the velvet-like covering of the grassy glade. Fire had
run over the whole region late that spring, and the grass
was now as fresh, and sweet and short, as if the place were
pastured. The white clover, in particular, abounded, and
was then just bursting forth into the blossom. Various
other flowers had also appeared, and around them were
buzzing thousands of bees. These industrious little
animals
were hard at work, loading themselves with sweets;
little foreseeing the robbery contemplated by the craft of
man. As le Bourdon moved stealthily among the flowers
and their humming visiters, the eyes of the two red men
followed his smallest movement, as the cat watches the
mouse; but Gershom was less attentive, thinking the whole
curious enough, but preferring whiskey to all the honey on
earth.
At length le Bourdon found a bee to his mind, and
watching the moment when the animal was sipping sweets
from a head of white clover, he cautiously placed his
blurred
and green-looking tumbler over it, and made it his
prisoner. The moment the bee found itself encircled with
the glass, it took wing and attempted to rise. This carried
it to the upper part of its prison, when Ben carefully
introduced
the unoccupied hand beneath the glass, and returned
to the stump. Here he set the tumbler down on the
platter
in a way to bring the piece of honey-comb within its
circle.
So much done successfully, and with very little trouble,
Buzzing Ben examined his captive for a moment, to make
sure that all was right. Then he took off his cap and
placed it over tumbler, platter, honey-comb and bee. He
now waited half a minute, when cautiously raising the cap
again, it was seen that the bee, the moment a darkness like
that of its hive came over it, had lighted on the comb, and
commenced filling itself with the honey. When Ben took
away the cap altogether, the head, and half of the body of
the bee was in one of the cells, its whole attention being
bestowed on this unlooked-for hoard of treasure. As this
was just what its captor wished, he considered that part of
his work accomplished. It now became apparent why a
glass was used to take the bee, instead of a vessel of
wood or of bark. Transparency was necessary in order to
watch the movements of the captive, as darkness was
necessary
in order to induce it to cease its efforts to escape,
and to settle on the comb.
As the bee was now intently occupied in filling itself,
Buzzing Ben, or le Bourdon, did not hesitate about
removing
the glass. He even ventured to look around him,
and to make another captive, which he placed over the
comb, and managed as he had done with the first. In a
minute, the second bee was also buried in a cell, and the
glass was again removed. Le Bourdon now signed for his
companions to draw near.
There they are, hard at work with the honey, he said,
speaking in English, and pointing at the bees. Little do
they think, as they undermine that comb, how near they
are to the undermining of their own hive! But so it is
with us all! When we think we are in the highest
prosperity
we may be nearest to a fall, and when we are poorest
and humblest, we may be about to be exalted. I often
think of these things, out here in the wilderness, when I'm
alone, and my thoughts are ac
tyve
.
Ben used a very pure English, when his condition in life
is remembered; but, now and then, he encountered a word
which pretty plainly proved he was not exactly a scholar.
A false emphasis has sometimes an influence on a man's
fortune, when one lives in the world; but, it mattered little
to one like Buzzing Ben, who seldom saw more than half
a dozen human faces in the course of a whole summer's
hunting. We remember an Englishman, however, who
would never concede talents to Burr, because the latter
said,
l' Amricaine
, Eurpean, instead of Europ
an.
How hive in danger? demanded Elksfoot, who was
very much of a matter-of-fact person. No see him, no
hear himelse get some honey.
Honey you can have for the asking, for I've plenty of
it already in my cabin, though it's somewhat 'arly in the
season to begin to break in upon the store. In general,
the bee-hunters keep back till August, for they think it
better to commence work when the creatures,this word
Ben pronounced as accurately as if brought up at St.
James', making it neither `creatur nor `creat
oo
re'to
commence work when the creatures have had time to fill
up, after their winter's feed. But I like the old stock, and,
what is more, I feel satisfied this is not to be a common
summer, and so I thought I would make an early start.
As Ben said this, he glanced his eyes at Pigeonswing,
who returned the look in a way to prove there was already
a secret intelligence between them, though neither had
ever seen the other an hour before.
Waal! exclaimed Gershom, this is cur'ous, I'll allow
that;
yes, it's cur'ousbut we've got an article at Whiskey
Centre that'll put the sweetest honey bee ever suck'd,
altogether
out o' countenance!
An article of which you suck your share, friend, I'll
answer for it, judging by the sign you carry between the
windows of your face, returned Ben, laughing; but
hush, men, hush. That first bee is filled, and begins to
think of home. He'll soon be off for
Honey
Centre, and
I must keep my eye on him. Now, stand a little aside,
friends, and give me room for my craft.
The men complied, and le Bourdon was now all intense
attention to his business. The bee first taken had, indeed,
filled itself to satiety, and at first seemed to be too heavy
to rise on the wing. After a few moments of preparation,
however, up it went, circling around the spot, as if
uncertain
what course to take. The eye of Ben never left it,
and when the insect darted off, as it soon did, in an air-line,
he saw it for fifty yards after the others had lost sight of it.
Ben took the range, and was silent fully a minute while he
did so.
That bee may have lighted in the corner of yonder
swamp, he said, pointing, as he spoke, to a bit of low
land that sustained a growth of much larger trees than
those which grew in the opening, or it has crossed the
point of the wood, and struck across the prairie beyond,
and made for a bit of thick forest that is to be found about
three miles further. In the last case, I shall have my
trouble for nothing.
What t'other do? demanded Elksfoot, with very
obvious
curiosity.
Sure enough; the other gentleman must be nearly
ready for a start, and we'll see what road
he
travels. 'T is
always an assistance to a bee-hunter to get one creature
fairly off, as it helps him to line the next with greater
sartainty
.
Ben
would
say ac
tyve
, and s
ar
tain, though he was above
saying creatoore, or creatur'. This is the difference between
a Pennsylvanian and a Yankee. We shall not stop,
however
,
to note all these little peculiarities in these individuals,
but use the proper or the peculiar dialect, as may happen
to be most convenient to ourselves.
But there was no time for disquisition, the second bee
being now ready for a start. Like his companion, this
insect
rose and encircled the stump several times, ere it
darted away towards its hive, in an air-line. So small was
the object, and so rapid its movement, that no one but the
bee-hunter saw the animal after it had begun its journey in
earnest. To
his
disappointment, instead of flying in the
same direction as the bee first taken, this little fellow went
buzzing off fairly at a right angle! It was consequently
clear that there were two hives, and that they lay in very
different directions.
Without wasting his time in useless talk, le Bourdon now
caught another bee, which was subjected to the same
process
as those first taken. When this creature had filled
itself, it rose, circled the stump as usual, as if to note the
spot for a second visit, and darted away, directly in a line
with the bee first taken. Ben noted its flight most
accurately
,
and had his eye on it, until it was quite a hundred
yards from the stump. This he was enabled to do, by
means of a quick sight and long practice.
We'll move our quarters, friends, said Buzzing Ben,
good-humouredly, as soon as satisfied with this last
observation
,
and gathering together his traps for a start. I must
angle for that hive, and I fear it will turn out to be across
the prairie, and quite beyond my reach for to-day.
The prairie alluded to was one of those small natural
meadows, or pastures, that are to be found in Michigan,
and may have contained four or five thousand acres of open
land. The heavy timber of the swamp mentioned, jutted
into it, and the point to be determined was, to ascertain
whether the bees had flown
over
these trees, towards which
they had certainly gone in an air-line, or whether they had
found their hive among them. In order to settle this
material
question, a new process was necessary.
I must `angle' for them chaps, repeated le Bourdon;
and if you will go with me, strangers, you shall soon see
the nicest part of the business of bee-hunting. Many a
man who can `line' a bee, can do nothing at an `angle.'
As this was only gibberish to the listeners, no answer
was made, but all prepared to follow Ben, who was soon
ready to change his ground. The bee-hunter took his way
across the open ground to a point fully a hundred rods
distant
from his first position, where he found another stump
of a fallen tree, which he converted into a stand. The
same process was gone through with, as before, and le
Bourdon was soon watching two bees that had plunged
their heads down into the cells of the comb. Nothing
could exceed the gravity and attention of the Indians, all
this time. They had fully comprehended the business of
lining the insects towards their hives, but they could
not understand the virtue of the angle. The first bore
so strong an affinity to their own pursuit of game, as to be
very obvious to their senses; but the last included a
species
of information to which they were total strangers. Nor
were they much the wiser after le Bourdon had taken his
angle; it requiring a sort of induction to which they
were not accustomed, in order to put the several parts of
his proceedings together, and to draw the inference. As
for Gershom, he affected to be familiar with all that was
going on, though he was just as ignorant as the Indians
themselves. This little bit of hypocrisy was the homage
he paid to his white blood; it being very unseemly,
according
to his view of the matter, for a pale-face not to
know more than a red-skin.
The bees were some little time in filling themselves. At
length one of them came out of his cell, and was evidently
getting ready for his flight. Ben beckoned to the
spectators
to stand farther back, in order to give him a fair
chance, and, just as he had done so, the bee rose. After
humming around the stump for an instant, away the insect
flew, taking a course almost at right angles to that in which
le Bourdon had expected to see it fly. It required half a
minute for him to recollect that this little creature had gone
off in a line nearly parallel to that which had been taken
by the second of the bees, which he had seen quit his
original
position. The line led across the neighbouring prairie,
and any attempt to follow these bees was hopeless.
But the second creature was also soon ready, and when
it darted away le Bourdon, to his manifest delight, saw
that it held its flight towards the point of the swamp,
into
,
or
over
which two of his first captives had also gone. This
settled the doubtful matter. Had the hive of these bees
been
beyond
that wood, the angle of intersection would
not have been there, but at the hive across the prairie.
The reader will understand that creatures which obey an
instinct, or such a reason as bees possess, would never
make a curvature in their flights without some strong
motive
for it. Thus, two bees taken from flowers that stood
half a mile apart, would be certain not to cross each other's
tracks, in returning home, until they met at the common
hive: and wherever the intersecting angle in their
respective
flights might be, there would that hive be also. As
this repository of sweets was the game le Bourdon had in
view, it is easy to see how much he was pleased when the
direction taken by the last of his bees gave him the
necessary
assurance that its home would certainly be found in
that very point of dense wood.
CHAPTER II.
How skilfully it builds its cell,
How neat it spreads the wax,
And labours hard to store it well,
With the sweet food it makes.
Watts' Hymns for Children
.
The
next thing was to ascertain which was the
particular
tree in which the bees had found a shelter. Collecting
his implements, le Bourdon was soon ready, and, with a
light elastic tread, he moved off towards the point of the
wood, followed by the whole party. The distance was
about half a mile, and men so much accustomed to use
their limbs made light of it. In a few minutes all were
there, and the bee-hunter was busy in looking for his tree.
This was the consummation of the whole process, and Ben
was not only provided for the necessities of the case, but
he was well skilled in all the signs that betokened the
abodes of bees.
An uninstructed person might have passed that point of
wood a thousand times, without the least consciousness of
the presence of a single insect of the sort now searched
for. In general, the bees flew too high to be easily
perceptible
from the ground, though a practised eye can discern
them at distances that would almost seem to be marvellous.
But Ben had other assistants than his eyes. He knew that
the tree he sought must be hollow, and such trees usually
give outward signs of the defect that exists within. Then,
some species of wood are more frequented by the bees than
others, while the instinct of the industrious little creatures
generally enables them to select such homes as will not be
very likely to destroy all the fruits of their industry by an
untimely fall. In all these particulars, both bees and
bee-hunter
were well versed, and Ben made his search
accordingly
.
Among the other implements of his calling, le Bourdon
had a small spy-glass; one scarcely larger than those that
are used in theatres, but which was powerful and every
way suited to its purposes. Ben was not long in selecting
a tree, a half-decayed elm, as the one likely to contain the
hive; and by the aid of his glass he soon saw bees flying
among its dying branches, at a height of not less than
seventy
feet from the ground. A little further search directed
his attention to a knot-hole, in and out of which the glass
enabled him to see bees passing in streams. This decided
the point; and putting aside all his implements but the
axe, Buzzing Ben now set about the task of felling the
tree.
Stranger
, said Gershom, when le Bourdon had taken
out the first chip, perhaps you'd better let
me
do that
part of the job. I shall expect to come in for a share of
the honey, and I'm willing to 'arn all I take. I was brought
up on axes, and jack-knives, and sich sort of food, and can
cut,
or
whittle, with the best chopper, or the neatest
whittler
,
in or out of New England.
You can try your hand, if you wish it, said Ben,
relinquishing
the axe. I can fell a tree as well as yourself,
but have no such love for the business as to wish to keep
it all to myself.
Waal, I can say, I
like
it, answered Gershom, first
passing his thumb along the edge of the axe, in order to
ascertain its state; then swinging the tool, with a view to
try its `hang.'
I can't say much for your axe,
stranger
, for this helve
has no tarve to't, to my mind; but, sich as it is, down
must come this elm, though ten millions of bees should
set upon me for my pains.
This was no idle boast of Waring's. Worthless as he
was in so many respects, he was remarkably skilful with
the axe, as he now proved by the rapid manner in which
he severed the trunk of the large elm on which he was at
work. He inquired of Ben where he should `lay the tree,'
and when it came clattering down, it fell on the precise
spot indicated. Great was the confusion among the bees
at this sudden downfall of their long-cherished home. The
fact was not known to their enemy, but they had inhabited
that tree for a long time; and the prize now obtained was
the richest he had ever made in his calling. As for the
Vol. I.  3
insects, they filled the air in clouds, and all the invaders
deemed it prudent to withdraw to some little distance for a
time, lest the irritated and wronged bees should set upon
them and take an ample revenge. Had they known their
power, this might easily have been done, no ingenuity of
man being able to protect him against the assaults of this
insignificant-looking animal, when unable to cover
himself
,
and the angry little heroes are in earnest. On the
present occasion, however, no harm befel the marauders.
So suddenly had the hive tumbled, that its late occupants
appeared to be astounded, and they submitted to their fate
as men yield to the power of tempests and earthquakes.
In half an hour most of them were collected on an adjacent
tree, where doubtless a consultation on the mode of future
proceedings was held, after their fashion.
The Indians were more delighted with le Bourdon's
ingenious
mode of discovering the hive than with the
richness
of the prize; while Ben, himself, and Gershom,
manifested
most satisfaction at the amount of the earnings.
When the tree was cut in pieces, and split, it was
ascertained
that years of sweets were contained within its
capacious
cavities, and Beu estimated the portion that fell to
his share at more than three hundred pounds of good
honeycomb includedafter deducting the portions that
were given to the Indians, and which were abstracted by
Gershom. The three last, however, could carry but little,
as they had no other means of bearing it away than their
own backs.
The honey was not collected that night. The day was
too far advanced for that; and le Bourdoncertainly never
was name less merited than this
sobriquet
, as applied to the
active young bee-hunterbut, le Bourdon, to give him his
quaint appellation, offered the hospitalities of his own cabin
to the strangers, promising to put them on their several
paths the succeeding day, with a good store of honey in
each knapsack.
They do say there ar' likely to be troublesome times,
he continued, with simple earnestness, after having given
the invitation to partake of his homely fare; and I should
like to hear what is going on in the world. From Whiskey
Centre I do not expect to learn much, I will own; but I
am mistaken if the Pigeonswing, here, has not a message
that will make us all open our ears.
The Indians ejaculated their assent; but Gershom was
a man who could not express anything sententiously. As
the bee-hunter led the way towards his cabin, or shanty, he
made his comments with his customary freedom. Before
recording what he communicated, however, we shall digress
for one moment in order to say a word ourselves
concerning
this term shanty. It is now in general use
throughout
the whole of the United States, meaning a cabin that
has been constructed in haste, and for temporary purposes.
By a license of speech, it is occasionally applied to more
permanent residences, as men are known to apply familiar
epithets to familiar objects. The derivation of the word
has caused some speculation. The term certainly came
from the westperhaps from the north-westand the best
explanation we have ever heard of its derivation is to
suppose
shanty, as we now spell it, a corruption of
chicnt
,
which it is thought may have been a word in Canadian
French phrase to express a dog-kennel. Chenil, we
believe, is the true French term for such a thing, and our
own word is said to be derived from itmeute meaning
a kennel of dogs, or a pack of hounds, rather than
their dwelling. At any rate, chiente is so plausible a
solution of the difficulty, that one may hope it is the true
one, even though he has no better authority for it than a
very vague rumour. Curious discoveries are sometimes
made by these rude analogies, however, though they are
generally thought not to be very near akin to learning.
For ourselves, now, we do not entertain a doubt that the
sobriquet
of yankees, which is in every man's mouth,
and of which the derivation appears to puzzle all our
philologists
,
is nothing but a slight corruption of the word
yengeese, the term applied to the English, by the
tribes to whom they first became known. We have no
other authority for this derivation than conjecture, and
conjectures that are purely our own; but it is so very
plausible as almost to carry conviction, of itself.
[2]
[2]
Since writing the above, the author has met with an allusion
that has induced him to think he may not have been the first to
suggest this derivation of the word yankee. With himself, the
suggestion is perfectly original, and has long since been published
by him; but nothing is more probable than the fact that a solution
so very natural, of this long-disputed question in language, may
have suggested itself to various minds.
The chient, or shanty of le Bourdon, stood quite
near to the banks of the Kalamazoo, and in a most
beautiful
grove of the burr oak. Ben had selected the site with
much taste, though the proximity of a spring of delicious
water had probably its full share in influencing his decision.
It was necessary, moreover, that he should be near the
river, as his great movements were all made by water, for
the convenience of transporting his tools, furniture, &c.,
as well as his honey. A famous bark canoe lay in a little
bay, out of the current of the stream, securely moored,
head and stern, in order to prevent her beating against any
object harder than herself.
The dwelling had been constructed with some attention
to security. This was rendered necessary, in some
measure
,
as Ben had found by experience, ou account of two
classes of enemiesmen and bears. From the first, it is
true, the bee-hunter had hitherto apprehended but little.
There were few human beings in that region. The
northern
portions of the noble peninsula of Michigan are
somewhat
low and swampy, or are too broken and savage to
tempt the native hunters from the openings and prairies that
then lay, in such rich profusion, further south and west.
With the exception of the shores, or coasts, it was seldom
that the northern half of the peninsula felt the footstep of
man. With the southern half, however, it was very different;
the openings, and glades, and water-courses, offering
almost as many temptations to the savage, as they have
since done to the civilized man. Nevertheless, the bison,
or the buffalo, as the animal is erroneously, but very
generally
termed throughout the country, was not often found
in the vast herds of which we read, until one reached the
great prairies west of the Mississippi. There it was that
the red men most loved to congregate; though always
bearing, in numbers, but a trifling proportion to the surface
they occupied. In that day, however, near as to the date,
but distant as to the events, the Chippewas, Ottawas, and
Pottawattamies, kindred tribes, we believe, had still a
footing
in Michigan proper, and were to be found in
considerable
numbers in what was called the St. Joseph's country,
or along the banks of the stream of that name; a region
that almost merits the lofty appellation of the garden of
America. Le Bourdon knew many of their warriors, and
was much esteemed among them; though he had never
met with either of those whom chance now had thrown in
his way. In general, he suffered little wrong from the red
men, who wondered at his occupation, while they liked his
character; but he had sustained losses, and even ill
treatment
,
from certain outcasts of the tribes, as well as from
vagrant whites, who occasionally found their way to his
temporary dwellings. On the present occasion, le Bourdon
felt far more uneasiness from the circumstance of having
his abode known to Gershom Waring, a countryman, and
fellow-christian, in one sense, at least, than from its being
known to the Chippewa and the Pottawattamie.
The bears were constant and dangerous sources of
annoyance
to the bee-hunter. It was not often that an armed
man  and le Bourdon seldom moved without his rifle
has much to apprehend from the common brown bear of
America. Though a formidable-looking animal, especially
when full grown, it is seldom bold enough to attack a
human being, nothing but hunger, or care for its young,
ever inducing it to go so much out of the ordinary track
of its habits. But the love of the bear for honey amounts
to a passion. Not only will it devise all sorts of bearish
expedients to get at the sweet morsels, but it will scent
them from afar. On one occasion, a family of Bruins had
looked into a shanty of Ben's, that was not constructed
with sufficient care, and consummated their burglary by
demolishing the last comb. That disaster almost ruined
the adventurer, then quite young in his calling; and ever
since its occurrence, he had taken the precaution to build
such a citadel as should at least set teeth and paws at
defiance
.
To one who had an axe, with access to young
pines, this was not a difficult task, as was proved by the
present habitation of our hero.
This was the second season that le Bourdon had
occupied
Castle Meal, as he himself called the shanty. This
appellation was a corruption of
Chateau au Miel
, a
3*
name given to it by a wag of a
voyageur
, who had aided
Ben in ascending the Kalamazoo the previous summer, and
had remained long enough with him to help him put up his
habitation. The building was just twelve feet square, in
the interior, and somewhat less than fourteen on its exterior.
It was made of pine logs, in the usual mode, with the
additional
security of possessing a roof of squared timbers, of
which the several parts were so nicely fitted together, as to
shed rain. This unusual precaution was rendered
necessary
to protect the honey, since the bears would have
unroofed
the common bark coverings of the shanties, with
the readiness of human beings, in order to get at stores as
ample as those which the bee-hunter had soon collected
beneath his roof. There was one window of glass, which
le Bourdon had brought in his canoe; though it was a
single sash of six small lights, that opened on hinges; the
exterior being protected by stout bars of riven oak, securely
let into the logs. The door was made of three
thicknesses
of oaken plank, pinned well together, and swinging
on stout iron hinges, so secured as not to be easily
removed
.
Its outside fastening was made by means of two
stout staples, a short piece of ox-chain, and an unusually
heavy padlock. Nothing short of an iron bar, and that
cleverly applied, could force this fastening. On the inside,
three bars of oak rendered all secure, when the master was
at home.
You set consid'rable store by your honey, I guess,
stranger
, said Gershom, as le Bourdon unlocked the
fastenings
and removed the chain, if a body may judge by
the kear (care) you take on't! Now, down our way, we
an't half so partic'lar; Dolly and Blossom never so much
as putting up a bar to the door, even when I sleep out,
which is about half the time, now the summer is fairly set
in.
And whereabouts is `down our way,' if one may be
so bold as to ask the question? returned le Bourdon,
holding
the door half-opened, while he turned his face towards
the other, in expectation of the answer.
Why, down at Whiskey Centre, to be sure, as the
v'y'gerers and other boatmen call the place.
And where is Whiskey Centre? demanded Ben, a
little pertinaciously.
Why, I thought everybody would a' known that,
answered
Gershom; sin' whiskey is as drawin' as a blister.
Whiskey Centre is just where
I
happen to live; bein' what
a body may call a travellin' name. As I'm now down at
the mouth of the Kalamazoo, why Whiskey Centre's there,
too.
I understand the matter, now, answered le Bourdon,
composing his well-formed mouth in a sort of contemptuous
smile. You and whiskey being sworn friends, are always
to be found in company. When I came into the river,
which was the last week in April, I saw nothing like
whiskey, nor anything like a Centre at the mouth.
If you'd a' be'n a fortnight later,
stranger
, you'd a'
found both. Travellin' Centres, and stationary, differs
somewhat, I guess; one is always to be found, while t'other
must be s'arched a'ter.
And pray who are Dolly and Blossom; I hope the last
is not a
whiskey
blossom?
Not sheshe never touches a spoonful, though I tell
her it never hurt mortal! She tries hard to reason me into
it that it hurts
me
but that's all a mistake, as anybody
can see that jest looks at me.
Ben
did
look at him; and, to say truth, came to a
somewhat different conclusion.
Is she so blooming that you call her `Blossom?'
demanded
the bee-hunter, or is she so young?
The gal's a little of both. Dolly is my wife, and
Blossom is my sister. The real name of Blossom is
Margery
Waring, but everybody calls her Blossom; and so I
gi'n into it, with the rest on'em.
It is probable that le Bourdon lost a good deal of his
interest
in this flower of the wilderness, as soon as he learned
she was so nearly related to the Whiskey Centre. Gershom
was so very uninviting an object, and had so many palpable
marks that he had fairly earned the nickname which, as it
afterwards appeared, the western adventurers had given
him
, as well as his
abode
, wherever the last might be, that
no one of decently sober habits could readily fancy anything
belonging to him. At any rate, the bee-hunter now led
the way into his cabin, whither he was followed without
annecessary ceremony, by all three of his guests.
The interior of the
chient
, to use the most poetical,
if not the most accurate word, was singularly clean for an
establishment set up by a bachelor, in so remote a part of
the world. The honey, in neat, well-constructed kegs, was
carefully piled along one side of the apartment, in a way
to occupy the minimum of room, and to be rather
ornamental
than unsightly. These kegs were made by le
Bourdon
himself, who had acquired as much of the art as was
necessary to that object. The woods always furnished the
materials; and a pile of staves that was placed beneath a
neighbouring tree, sufficiently denoted that he did not yet
deem that portion of his task completed.
In one corner of the hut was a pile of well-dressed bear
skins, three in number, each and all of which had been
taken from the carcasses of fallen foes, within the last two
months. Three more were stretched on saplings, near by,
in the process of curing. It was a material part of the
bee-hunter's craft to kill this animal, in particular; and the
trophies of his conflicts with them were proportionably
numerous
.
On the pile already prepared, he usually slept.
There was a very rude table, a single board set up on
sticks; and a bench or two, together with a wooden chest
of some size, completed the furniture. Tools were
suspended
from the walls, it is true; and no less than three
rifles, in addition to a very neat double-barrelled
shot-gun
,
or fowling-piece, were standing in a corner. These
were arms collected by our hero in his different trips, and
retained quite as much from affection, as from necessity,
or caution. Of ammunition, there was no very great
amount visible; only three or four horns and a couple of
pouches being suspended from pegs: but Ben had a secret
store, as well as another rifle, carefully secured, in a natural
magazine and arsenal, at a distance sufficiently great from
the
chient
, to remove it from all danger of sharing in the
fortunes of his citadel, should disaster befall the last.
The cooking was done altogether out of doors. For
this essential comfort, le Bourdon had made very liberal
provision. He had a small oven, a sufficiently convenient
fire-place, and a store-house, at hand; all placed near the
spring, and beneath the shade of a magnificent elm. In
the store-house he kept his barrel of flour, his barrel of
salt, a stock of smoked or dried meat, and that which the
woodsman, if accustomed in early life to the settlements,
prizes most highly, a half-barrel of pickled pork. The
bark canoe had sufficed to transport all these stores, merely
ballasting handsomely that ticklish craft; and its owner
relied on the honey to perform the same office on the return
voyage, when trade or consumption should have disposed
of the various articles just named.
The reader may smile at the word trade, and ask
where were those to be found who could be parties to the
traffic. The vast lakes and innumerable rivers of that
region
,
however, remote as it then was from the ordinary
abodes of civilized man, offered facilities for
communication
that the active spirit of trade would be certain not to
neglect. In the first place, there were always the Indians
to barter skins and furs against powder, lead, rifles,
blankets
,
and unhappily fire-water. Then, the white men
who penetrated to those semi-wilds, were always ready to
dicker and to swap, and to trade rifles, and watches,
and whatever else they might happen to possess, almost to
their wives and children.
But, we should be doing injustice to le Bourdon, were
we in any manner to confound him with the dickering
race. He was a bee-hunter quite as much through love
of the wilderness, and love of adventure, as through love
of gain. Profitable he had certainly found the employment,
or he probably would not have pursued it; but there was
many a man who  nay, most men, even in his own
humble
class in life  would have deemed his liberal earnings
too hardly obtained, when gained at the expeuse of all
intercourse
with their own kind. But Buzzing Ben loved
the solitude of his situation, its hazards, its quietude,
relieved
by passing moments of high excitement; and, most
of all, the self-reliance that was indispensable equally to
his success and his happiness. Woman, as yet, had never
exercised her witchery over him, and every day was his
passion for dwelling alone, and for enjoying the strange,
but certainly most alluring, pleasures of the woods,
increasing
and gaining strength in his bosom. It was seldom,
now, that he held intercourse even with the Indian tribes
that dwelt near his occasional places of hunting; and
frequently
had he shifted his ground in order to avoid
collision
,
however friendly, with whites who, like himself, were
pushing their humble fortunes along the shores of those
inland seas, which, as yet, were rarely indeed whitened by
a sail. In this respect, Boden and Waring were the very
antipodes of each other; Gershom being an inveterate
gossip, in despite of his attachment to a vagrant and
border
life.
The duties of hospitality are rarely forgotten among
border-men. The inhabitant of a town may lose his
natural
disposition to receive all who offer at his board, under
the pressure of society; but it is only in most extraordinary
exceptions that the frontier man is ever known to be
inhospitable
.
He has little to offer, but that little is seldom withheld, either through prudence or niggardliness. Under
this feeling, we might call it habit also, le Bourdon now
set himself at work to place on the table such food as he
had at command and ready cooked. The meal which he
soon pressed his guests to share with him, was composed
of a good piece of cold boiled pork, which Ben had luckily
cooked the day previously, some bear's meat roasted, a
fragment of venison steak, both lean and cold, and the
remains
of a duck that had been shot the day before, in the
Kalamazoo, with bread, salt, and what was somewhat
unusual
in the wilderness, two or three onions, raw. The
last dish was highly relished by Gershom, and was slightly
honoured by Ben; but the Indians passed it over with cold
indifference. The dessert consisted of bread and honey,
which were liberally partaken of by all at table.
Little was said by either host or guests, until the supper
was finished, when the whole party left the chient, to
enjoy their pipes, in the cool evening air, beneath the oaks
of the grove in which the dwelling stood. Their
conversation
began to let the parties know something of each other's
movements and characters.
You
are a Pottawattamie, and
you
a Chippewa, said
le Bourdon, as he courteously handed to his two red guests pipes of their's, that he had just stuffed with some of his
own tobaccoI believe you are a sort of cousins, though
your tribes are called by different names.
Nation, Ojebway, returned the elder Indian, holding
up a finger, by way of enforcing attention.
Tribe, Pottawattamie, added the runner, in the same
sententious manner.
Baccy, good  put in the senior, by way of showing
he was well contented with his comforts.
Have you nothin' to drink? demanded Whiskey
Centre
,
who saw no great merit in anything but `fire-water.'
There is the spring, returned le Bourdon, gravely;
a gourd hangs against the tree.
Gershom made a wry face, but he did not move.
Is there any news stirring among the tribes? asked
the bee-hunter, waiting, however, a decent interval, lest he
might be supposed to betray a womanly curiosity.
Elksfoot puffed away some time, before he saw fit to
answer
,
reserving a salvo in behalf of his own dignity. Then
he removed the pipe, shook off the ashes, pressed down the
fire a little, gave a reviving draught or two, and quietly
replied
Ask my young brotherhe runnerhe know.
But Pigeonswing seemed to be little more communicative
than the Pottawattamie. He smoked on in quiet dignity,
while the bee-hunter patiently waited for the moment when
it might suit his younger guest to speak. That moment
did not arrive for some time, though it came at last. Almost
five minutes after Elksfoot had made the allusion
mentioned
,
the Ojebway, or Chippewa, removed his pipe, also, and
looking courteously round at his host, he said with
emphasis
Bad summer come soon. Palefaces call young men
togedder, and dig up hatchet.
I had heard something of this, answered le Bourdon,
with a saddened countenance, and was afraid it might
happen.
My brother dig up hatchet too, eh? demanded
Pigeonswing
.
Why should I? I am alone here, on the Openings,
and it would seem foolish in me to wish to fight.
Got no tribeno Ojebwayno Pottawattamie, eh?
I have my tribe, as well as another, Chippewa, but can
see no use I can be to it, here. If the English and
Americans
fight, it must be a long way from this wilderness,
and on, or near the great salt lake.
Don't knownebber know, 'till see. English warrior
plenty in Canada.
That may be; but American warriors are not plenty,
here. This country is a wilderness, and there are no
soldiers
,
hereabouts, to cut each other's throats.
What you t'ink him? asked Pigeonswing, glancing
at Gershom; who, unable to forbear any longer, had gone
to the spring to mix a cup from a small supply that still
remained of the liquor with which he had left home. Got
pretty good scalp?
I suppose it is as good as another'sbut he and I are
countrymen, and we cannot raise the tomahawk on one
another.
Don't t'ink so. Plenty yankee, him!
Le Bourdon smiled at this proof of Pigeonswing's
sagacity
,
though he felt a good deal of uneasiness at the
purport
of his discourse.
You are right enough in
that
he answeredbut
I'm plenty of yankee, too.
No  don't say so  returned the Chippewa  no,
mustn't say
dat.
English; no yankee.
Him
not a bit
like you.
Why, we are unlike each other, in some respects, it is
true, though we are countrymen, notwithstanding. My
Great Father lives at Washington, as well as his.
The Chippewa appeared to be disappointed; perhaps he
appeared sorry, too; for le Bourdon's frank and manly
hospitality had disposed him to friendship instead of
hostilities
,
while his admissions would rather put him in an
antagonist
position. It was probably with a kind motive that
he pursued the discourse in a way to give his host some
insight into the true condition of matters in that part of
the world.
Plenty Breetish in woods, he said, with marked
deliberation
and point. Yankee no come yet.
Let me know the truth, at once, Chippewa, exclaimed
le Bourdon. I am but a peaceable bee-hunter, as you see,
and wish no man's scalp, or any man's honey, but my own.
Is there to be a war between America and Canada, or not?
Some say, yes; some say, no; returned Pigeonswing,
evasively. My part, don't know. Go, now, to see. But
plenty Montreal belt among red-skins; plenty rifle; plenty
powder, too.
I heard something of this as I came up the lakes,
rejoined Ben; and fell in with a trader, an old
acquaintance
,
from Canada, and a good friend, too, though he is to
be my enemy, accordin' to law, who gave me to understand
that the summer would not go over without blows. Still,
they all seemed to be asleep at Mackinaw (
Michillimackinac
)
as I passed there!
Wake up pretty soon. Canada warrior take fort.
If I thought that, Chippewa, I would be off this blessed
night to give the alarm.
Not'ink better of dat.
Go, I would, if I died for it the next hour!
T'ink betterbe no such fool, I tell you.
And I tell you, Pigeonswing, that go I would, if the
whole Ojebway nation was on my trail. I am an American,
and mean to stand by my own people, come what will.
T'ought you only peaceable bee-hunter, just now,
retorted
the Chippewa, a little sarcastically.
By this time le Bourdon had somewhat cooled, and he
became conscious of his indiscretion. He knew enough
of the history of the past, to be fully aware that, in all
periods
of American history, the English, and, for that matter,
the French, too, so long as they had possessions on this
continent, never scrupled about employing the savages in
their conflicts. It is true, that these highly polished,
and, we may justly add, humane nations  (for each is
out of all question entitled to that character in the scale
of comparative humanity as between communities, and
each, if you will take its own account of the matter, stands
at the head of civilization in this respect)would,
notwithstanding
these high claims, carry on their
American
wars
by the agency of the tomahawk, the scalping-knife, and the
brand. Eulogies, though pronounced by ourselves on
ourselves
,
cannot erase the stains of blood. Even down to
the present hour, a cloud does not obscure the political
Vol. I.  4
atmosphere between England and America, that its
existence
may not be discovered on the prairies, by a movement
among the Indians. The pulse that is to be felt
there
, is
a sure indication of the state of the relations between the
parties. Every one knows that the savage, in his warfare,
slays both sexes and all ages; that the door-post of the
frontier cabin is defiled by the blood of the infant, whose
brains have been dashed against it; and that the
smouldering
ruins of log-houses, oftener than not, cover the remains
of their tenants. But, what of all that? Brutus is still
an honourable man, and the American, who has not
this sin to answer for among his numberless transgressions,
is reviled as a semi-barbarian! The time is at hand, when
the Lion of the West will draw his own picture, too; and
fortunate will it be for the characters of some who will
gather around the easel, if they do not discover traces of
their own lineaments among his labours.
The feeling engendered by the character of such a
warfare
,
is the secret of the deeply-seated hostility which
pervades
the breast of the
Western
American against the land
of his ancestors. He never sees the Times, and cares not
a rush for the mystifications of the Quarterly Review; but
he remembers where his mother was brained, and his father
or brother tortured; ay, and by whose instrumentality the
foul deeds were mainly done. The man of the world can
understand that such atrocities may be committed, and the
people of the offending nation remain ignorant of their
existence, and, in a measure, innocent of the guilt; but
the sufferer, in his provincial practice, makes no such
distinction
,
confounding all alike in his resentments, and
including
all that bear the hated name in his maledictions.
It is a fearful thing to awaken the anger of a nation; to
excite in it a desire for revenge; and thrice is that danger
magnified, when the people thus aroused, possess the
activity
,
the resources, the spirit, and the enterprise of the
Americans. We have been openly derided, and that
recently
,
because, in the fullness of our sense of power and
sense of right, language that exceeds any direct exhibition
of the national strength, has escaped the lips of legislators,
and, perhaps justly, has exposed them to the imputation of
boastfulness. That derision, however, will not soon be
repeated. The scenes enacting in Mexico, faint as they
are in comparison with what would have been seen, had
hostilities taken another direction, place a perpetual gag in
the mouths of all scoffers. The child is passing from the
gristle into the bone, and the next generation will not even
laugh, as does the present, at any idle and ill-considered
menaces to coerce this republic; strong in the
consciousness
of its own power, it will treat all such
fanfaronades
,
if any future statesman should be so ill-advised as to renew
them, with silent indifference.
Now, le Bourdon was fully aware that one of the surest
pulses of approaching hostilities between England and
America, was to be felt in the far west. If the Indians
were in movement, some power was probably behind the
scenes to set them in motion. Pigeonswing was well known
to him by reputation; and there was that about the man
which awakened the most unpleasant apprehensions, and
he felt an itching desire to learn all he could from him,
without betraying any more of his own feelings, if that
were possible.
I do not think the British will attempt Mackinaw,
Ben remarked, after a long pause, and a good deal of
smoking, had enabled him to assume an air of safe
indifference
.
Got him, I tell you, answered Pigeonswing, pointedly.
Got what, Chippewa?
HimMac-nawgot fort  got so'gers  got whole
island. Know dat, for been dere.
This was astounding news, indeed! The commanding
officer of that ill-starred garrison could not himself have
been more astonished, when he was unexpectedly summoned
to surrender by an enemy who appeared to start out of the
earth, than was le Bourdon, at hearing this intelligence. To
western notions, Michillimackinac was another Gibraltar,
although really a place of very little strength, and
garrisoned
by only one small company of regulars. Still, habit
had given the fortress a sort of sanctity among the
adventurers
of that region; and its fall, even in the settled parts
of the country, sounded like the loss of a province. It is
now known that, anticipating the movements of the
Americans
,
some three hundred whites, sustained by more than
twice that number of Indians, including warriors from
nearly every adjacent tribe, had surprised the post on the
17th of July, and compelled the subaltern in command,
with some fifty odd men, to surrender. This rapid, and
highly military measure, on the part of the British,
completely
cut off the post of Chicago, at the head of Lake
Michigan, leaving it isolated, on what was then a very
remote
wilderness. Chicago, Mackinac, and Detroit, were
the three grand stations of the Americans on the upper
lakes, and here were two of them virtually gone at a blow!
CHAPTER III.
_____ Ho! who's here?
If any thing that's civil, speak; if savage,
Take, or lend_____
Cymbeline
.
Not
another syllable did le Bourdon utter to the
Chippewa
,
or the Chippewa to him, in that sitting, touching the
important event just communicated. Each carefully avoided
manifesting any further interest in the subject, but the
smoking continued for some time after the sun had set.
As the shades of evening began to gather, the
Pottawattamie
arose, shook the ashes from his pipe, gave a grunt, and
uttered a word or two, by way of announcing his
disposition
to retire. On this hint, Ben went into the cabin,
spread his skins, and intimated to his guests that their beds
were ready for them. Few compliments pass among border
men on such occasions, and one after another dropped off,
until all were stretched on the skins but the master of the
place. He remained up two hours later, ruminating on
the state of things; when, perceiving that the night was
wearing on, he also found a nest, and sought his repose.
Nothing occurred to disturb the occupants of Castle
Meal, as le Bourdon laughingly called his cabin, until the
return of day. If there were any bears scenting around
the place, as often occurred at night, their instinct must
have apprised them that a large reinforcement was present,
and caused them to defer their attack to a more favourable
opportunity. The first afoot next morning was the
bee-hunter
himself, who arose and left his cabin just as the
earliest
streaks of day were appearing in the east. Although
dwelling in a wilderness, the openings had not the
character
of ordinary forests. The air circulates freely
beneath
their oaks, the sun penetrates in a thousand places,
and grass grows, wild but verdant. There was little of the
dampness of the virgin woods; and the morning air, though
cool, as is ever the case, even in midsummer, in regions
still covered with trees, was balmy; and, at that particular
spot, it came to the senses of le Bourdon loaded with the
sweets of many a wide glade of his favourite white clover.
Of course, he had placed his cabin near those spots where
the insect he sought most abounded; and a fragrant site
it proved to be, in favourable conditions of the atmosphere.
Ben had a taste for all the natural advantages of his abode,
and was standing in enjoyment of its placid beauties, when
some one touched his elbow. Turning, quick as thought,
he perceived the Chippewa at his side. That young Indian
had approached with the noiseless tread of his people, and
was now anxious to hold a private communication with him.
Pottawattamie got long ear  come fudder  said
Pigeonswing; go cook-houset'ink we want breakfast.
Ben did as desired; and the two were soon side by side
at the spring, in the outlet of which they made their
ablutions
the
red-skin being totally without paint. When this
agreeable office was performed, each felt in better
condition
for a conference.
Elkfoot got belt from Canada Fadder, commenced
the Chippewa, with a sententious allusion to the British
propensity to keep the savages in pay.
Know
he got him
know
he keep him.
And you, Pigeonswingby your manner of talking I
had set you down for a King's Injin, too.
Talk
sono
feel
bit so.
My
heart Yankee.
And have you not had a belt of wampum sent you, as
well as the rest of them?
Dat truegot himdon't keep him.
4*
What! did you dare to send it back?
An't fool, dough young. Keep him; no keep him.
Keep him for Canada Fadder; no keep him for Chippewa
brave.
What have you then done with your belt?
Bury him where nobody find him dis war. No
Waubkenewh no hole in heart to let king in.
Pigeonswing, as this young Indian was commonly called
in his tribe, in consequence of the rapidity of his
movements
when employed as a runner, had a much more
respectable
name, and one that he had fairly earned in some
of the forays of his people, but which the commonalty had
just the same indisposition to use, as the French have to
call Marshal Soult the Duc de Dalmatie. The last may be
the most honourable title, but it is not that by which he is
the best known to his countrymen. Waub-ke-newh was
an appellation, notwithstanding, of which the young
Chippewa
was justly proud; and he often asserted his right to
use it, as sternly as the old hero of Toulouse asserted his
right to his duchy, when the Austrians wished to style him
le Marchal
Duc
Soult.
And you are friendly to the yankees, and an enemy to
the red-coats?
Waubkenewh grasped the hand of le Bourdon, and
squeezed it firmly. Then he said, warily
Take careElkfoot friend of Blackbird; like to look
at Canada belt. Got medal of king, too. Have yankee
scalp, bye'm by. Take caremust speak low, when
Elkfoot
near.
I begin to understand you, Chippewa: you wish me to
believe that
you
are a friend to America, and that the
Pottawattamie
is not. If this be so, why have you held the
speech that you did last night, and seemed to be on a
war-path
against
my countrymen?
Dat good way, eh? Elkfoot den t'ink me
his
friend
dat very good in war-time.
But is it true, or false, that Mackinaw is taken by the
British?
Dat, too truegone, and warrior all prisoner. Plenty
Winnebago, plenty Pottawattamie, plenty Ottowa, plenty
red-skin, dere.
And the Chippewas?
Some Ojebway, tooanswered Pigeonswing, after a
reluctant pause. Can't all go on same path, this war.
Hatchets, somehow, got two handle  one strike yankee;
one strike king George.
But what is your business here, and where are you
now going, if you are friendly to the Americans. I make
no secret of my feelings  I am for my own people, and I
wish proof that you are a friend, and not an enemy.
Too many question, one time, returned the Chippewa,
a little distastefully. No good have so long tongue. Ask
one question, answer himask anoder, answer
him
, too.
Well, then, what is your business, here?
Go to Chicago, for gen'ral.
Do you mean that you bear a message from some
American general to the commandant at Chicago?
Just sodat my business. Guess him, right off; he,
he, he.
It is so seldom that an Indian laughs that the bee-hunter
was startled.
Where is the general who has sent you on this errand?
he demanded.
He at Detroitgot whole army dere  warrior plenty
as oak in opening.
All this was news to the bee-hunter, and it caused him
to muse a moment, ere he proceeded.
What is the name of the American general, who has
sent you on this path? he then demanded.
Hell, answered the Ojebway, quietly.
Hell! You mean to give his Indian title, I suppose, to
show that he will prove dangerous to the wicked. But how
is he called in our own tongue?
Helldat he namegood name for so'ger, eh?
I believe I understand you, Chippewa  Hull is the
name of the governor of the territory, and you must have
mistaken the soundis it not so?
Hull  Hell  don't know  just same  one good as
t'other.
Yes, one will do as well as the other, if a body only
understands you. So governor Hull has sent you here?
No gubbernor  gen'ral, tell you. Got big army
plenty warrioreat Breesh up!
Now, Chippewa, answer me one thing to my likin', or
I shall set you down as a man with a forked tongue, though
you do call yourself a friend of the yankees. If you have
been sent from Detroit to Chicago, why are you as far
north as this? Why are you here, on the banks of the
Kalamazoo, when your path ought to lead you more
towards
the St. Joseph's?
Been to Mackinaw. Gen'ral say, first go to Mackinaw
and see wid own eye how garrison doden go to Chicago,
and tell warrior dere what happen, and how he best
manage
.
Understan' dat, Bourdon?
Ay, it all sounds well enough, I will acknowledge.
You have been to Mackinaw to look about you, there, and
having seen things with your own eyes, have started for
Chicago to give your knowledge to the commandant at
that place. Now, red-skin, have you any proof of what
you say?
For some reason that the bee-hunter could not yet
fathom, the Chippewa was particularly anxious either to
obtain his confidence, or to deceive him. Which he was
attempting, was not yet quite apparent; but that one or
other was uppermost in his mind, Ben thought was beyond
dispute. As soon as the question last named was put,
however, the Indian looked cautiously around him, as if to
be certain there were no spectators. Then he carefully
opened his tobacco-pouch, and extricated from the centre
of the cut weed, a letter that was rolled into the smallest
compass to admit of this mode of concealment, and which
was encircled by a thread. The last removed, the letter
was unrolled, and its superscription exposed. The address
was to Captain  Heald, U. S. Army, commanding
at Chicago. In one corner were the words on public
service, by Pigeonswing. All this was submitted to the
bee-hunter, who read it with his own eyes.
Dat goodasked the Chippewa, pointedlydat tell
trut'b'lieve
him?
Le Bourdon grasped the hand of the Indian, and gave it
a hearty squeeze. Then he said frankly, and like a man
who no longer entertained any doubts
I put faith in all you say, Chippewa. That is an
officer's
letter, and I now see that you are on the right side.
You play'd so deep a game, at first, how'sever, that I didn't
know exactly what to make of you. Now, as for the
Pottawattamie
do you set him down as friend or foe, in
reality?
Enemytake your scalptake my scalp, in minute
only can't catch him. He got belt from Montreal, and it
look handsome in his eye.
Which way d'ye think he's travelling? As I
understood
you, he and you fell into the same path within a mile
of this very spot. Was the meeting altogether friendly?
Yes; friendlybut ask too many questiontoo much
squawask one question, den stop for answer.
Very trueI will remember that an Indian likes to do
one thing at a time. Which way, then, do you think he's
travelling?
Don't knowon'y guessguess he on path to
Blackbird
.
And where is Blackbird, and what is he about?
Two question, dat! returned the Chippewa, smiling,
and holding up two of his fingers, at the same time, by
way of rebuke. Blackbird on war-path;when warrior
on dat path, he take scalp if can get him.
But where is his enemy? There are no whites in this
part of the country, but here and there a trader, or a
trapper
,
or a bee-hunter, or a
voyageur
.
Take
his
scalp  all scalp good, in war time. An't
partic'lar, down at Montreal. What you call garrison at
Chicago?
Blackbird, you then think, may be moving upon
Chicago
.
In that case, Chippewa, you should outrun this
Pottawattamie, and reach the post in time to let its men
know the danger.
Start, as soon as eat breakfast. Can't go straight,
nudder, or Pottawattamie see print of moccasin. Must
t'row him off trail.
Very true; but I'll engage you're cunning enough to
do that twice over, should it be necessary.
Just then Gershom Waring came out of the cabin, gaping
like a hound, and stretching his arms, as if fairly wearied
with sleep. At the sight of this man the Indian made a
gesture of caution, saying, however, in an under tone
How his heart  Yankee or Breeshlove Montreal,
eh? Pretty good scalp! Love king George, eh?
I rather think not, but am not certain. He is a poor
paleface, however, and it's of no great account how he
stands. His scalp would hardly be worth the taking,
whether
by English or American.
Sell, down at Montrealbetter look out for
Pottawattamie
.
Don't like dat Injin.
We'll be on our guard against him; and there he
comes, looking as if his breakfast would be welcome, and
as if he was already thinking of a start.
Le Bourdon had been busy with his pots, during the
whole time this discourse was going on, and had warmed
up a sufficiency of food to supply the wants of all his guests.
In a few minutes each was busy quietly eating his
morning's
meal, Gershom having taken his bitters aside, and, as
he fancied, unobserved. This was not so much owing to
niggardliness, as to a distrust of his having a sufficient
supply of the liquor that long indulgence had made, in a
measure, necessary to him, to last until he could get back
to the barrels that were still to be found in his cabin, down
on the shore of the lake.
During the breakfast little was said, conversation
forming
no material part of the entertainment, at the meals of
any but the cultivated. When each had risen, however,
and by certain preliminary arrangements it was obvious
that the two Indians intended to depart, the Pottawattamie
advanced to le Bourdon, and thrust out a hand.
Thankee  he said, in the brief way in which he
clipped his English  Good supper  good sleep  good
breakfast. Now, go. Thankeewhen any friend come to
Pottawattamie village, good wigwam dere, and no door.
I thank you, Elksfootand should you pass this away,
ag'in, soon, I hope you'll just step into this chient and
help yourself if I should happen to be off on a hunt. Good
luck to you, and a happy sight of home.
The Pottawattamie then turned and thrust out a hand to
each of the others, who met his offered leave-taking with
apparent friendship. The bee-hunter observed that neither
of the Indians said anything to the other touching the path
he was about to travel, but that each seemed ready to
pursue
his own way as if entirely independent, and without
the expectation of having a companion.
Elksfoot left the spot the first. After completing his
adieus, the Pottawattamie threw his rifle into the hollow
of his arm, felt at his belt, as if to settle it into its place,
made some little disposition of his light summer covering,
and moved off in a south-westerly direction, passing through
the open glades, and almost equally unobstructed groves,
as steady in his movements as if led by an instinct.
There he goes, on a bee-line, said le Bourdon, as the
straight form of the old savage disappeared at length,
behind
a thicket of trees. On a bee-line for the St. Joseph's
river, where he will shortly be, among friends and
neighbours
,
I do not doubt. What, Chippewa! are you in
motion
too?
Must go, now, returned Pigeonswing, in a friendly
way. Bye'm by come back and eat more honeybring
sweet news, hope  no Canada here, placing a finger on
his heartall yankee.
God be with you, ChippewaGod be with you. We
shall have a stirring summer of it, and I expect to hear of
your name in the wars, as of a chief who knows no fear.
Pigeonswing waved his hand, cast a glance, half friendly,
half contemptuously, at Whiskey Centre, and glided away.
The two who remained standing near the smouldering fire
remarked, that the direction taken by the Chippewa was
towards the lake, and nearly at right angles to that taken
by the Pottawattamie. They also fancied that the
movement
of the former was about half as fast again as that of
the latter. In less than three minutes the young Indian
was concealed in the openings, though he had to cross
a glade of considerable width in order to reach them.
The bee-hunter was now alone with the only one of his
guests who was of the colour and race to which he
himself
belonged. Of the three, he was the visiter he least
respected; but the dues of hospitality are usually sacred in
a wilderness, and among savages, so that he could do
nothing
to get rid of him. As Gershom manifested no
intention
to quit the place, le Bourdon set about the business of
the hour, with as much method and coolness as if the other
had not been present. The first thing was to bring home
the honey discovered on the previous day; a task of no
light labour; the distance it was to be transported being so
considerable, and the quantity so large. But our
bee-hunter
was not without the means of accomplishing such
an object, and he now busied himself in getting ready. As
Gershom volunteered his assistance, together they toiled in
apparent amity and confidence.
The Kalamazoo is a crooked stream; and it wound from
the spot where le Bourdon had built his cabin, to a point
within a hundred yards of the fallen tree, in which the bees
had constructed their hive. As a matter of course, Ben
profited by this circumstance to carry his canoe to the latter
place, with a view to render it serviceable in transporting
the honey. First securing everything in and around the
chient
, he and Gershom embarked, taking with them no
less than four pieces of fire-arms; one of which was, to
use the language of the west, a double-barrelled
shot-gun
.
Before quitting the place, however, the bee-hunter
went to a large kennel made of logs, and let out a mastiff
of great power and size. Between this dog and himself
there existed the best possible intelligence; the master
having paid many visits to the prisoner since his return,
feeding and caressing him. Glad, indeed, was this fine
animal to be released, bounding back and forth, and leaping
about le Bourdon in a way to manifest his delight. He
had been cared for in his kennel, and well cared for, too;
but there is no substitute for liberty, whether in man or
beast, individuals or communities.
When all was ready, le Bourdon and Gershom got into
the canoe, whither the former now called his dog, using
the name of Hive, an appellation that was doubtless
derived
from his own pursuit. As soon as the mastiff leaped
into the canoe, Ben shoved off, and the light craft was
pushed up the stream by himself and Gershom without
much difficulty, and with considerable rapidity. But little
drift-wood choked the channel; and, after fifteen minutes
of moderate labour, the two men came near to the point
of low wooded land, in which the bee-tree had stood. As
they drew nigh, certain signs of uneasiness in the dog
attracted his master's attention, and he pointed them out
to Gershom.
There's game in the wind, answered Whiskey Centre,
who had a good knowledge of most of the craft of border
life, notwithstanding his ungovernable propensity to drink,
and who, by nature, was both shrewd and resolute. I
shouldn't wonder  a common expression of his class
if we found bears prowling about that honey!
Such things have happened in my time, answered the
bee-hunter; and twice in my experience I've been driven
from the field, and forced to let the devils get my 'arnin's.
That was when you had no comrade,
stranger
,
returned
Gershom, raising a rifle, and carefully examining
its flint and its priming. It will be a large family on 'em
that drives
us
from that tree; for my mind is made up to
give Doll and Blossom a taste of the sweets.
If this was said imprudently, as respects ownership in
the prize, it was said heartily, so far as spirit and
determination
were concerned. It proved that Whiskey Centre
had points about him which, if not absolutely redeeming,
served in some measure to lessen the disgust which one
might otherwise have felt for his character. The
bee-hunter
knew that there was a species of hardihood that
belonged to border men as the fruits of their habits, and,
apparently, he had all necessary confidence in Gershom's
disposition to sustain him, should there be occasion for a
conflict with his old enemies.
The first measure of the bee-hunter, after landing and
securing his boat, was to quiet Hive. The animal being
under excellent command, this was soon done; the mastiff
maintaining the position assigned him, in the rear, though
evidently impatient to be let loose. Had not le Bourdon
known the precise position of the fallen tree, and through
that the probable position of his enemies, he would have
placed the mastiff in advance, as a pioneer or scout; but
he deemed it necessary, under the actual circumstances,
to hold him as a reserve, or a force to be directed whither
occasion might require. With this arrangement, then, le
Bourdon and Whiskey Centre advanced, side by side, each
carrying two pieces, from the margin of the river towards
the open land that commanded a view of the tree. On
Vol. I.  5
reaching the desired point, a halt was called, in order to
reconnoitre.
The reader will remember that the bee-elm had stood on
the edge of a dense thicket, or swamp, in which the trees
grew to a size several times exceeding those of the oaks
in the openings; and le Bourdon had caused it to fall upon
the open ground, in order to work at the honey with greater
case to himself. Consequently, the fragments lay in full
view of the spot where the halt was made. A little to
Gershom's surprise, Ben now produced his spy-glass, which
he levelled with much earnestness towards the tree. The
bee-hunter, however, well knew his business, and was
examining
into the state of the insects whom he had so
violently
invaded the night before. The air was filled with
them flying above and around the tree; a perfect cloud of
the little creatures hovering directly over the hole, as if to
guard its treasure.
Waal, said Gershom, in his drawling way, when le
Bourdon had taken a long look with the glass, I don't
see much use in spy-glassin' in that fashion. Spy-glassin'
may do out on the lake, if a body has only the tools to do
it with; but here, in the openin's, natur's eyes is about as
good as them a body buys in the stores.
Take a look at them bees, and see what a fret they're
in, returned Ben, handing the glass to his companion.
As long as I've been in the business, I've never seen a
colony in such a fever. Commonly, a few hours after the
bees find that their tree is down, and their plans broken into,
they give it up, and swarm; looking for a new hive, and
setting
about the making more food for the next winter; but,
here are all the bees yet, buzzing above the hole, as if
they meant to hold out for a siege.
There's an onaccountable grist on 'em  Gershom
was never very particular in his figures of speech, usually
terming anything in quantities a grist; and meaning in
the present instance by onaccountable, a number not to
be countedan onaccountable grist on 'em, I can tell
you, and if you mean to charge upon sich enemies, you
must look out for somebody besides Whiskey Centre for
your van-guard. What in natur' has got into the critters!
They can't expect to set that tree on its legs ag'in!
Do you see a flight of them just in the edge of the
forest  here, more to the southward? demanded le
Bourdon.
Sure enough! There is a lot on 'em there, too, and
they seem to be comin' and goin' to the tree, like folks
Gershom
would
put his noun of multitude into the plural,
Nova-Anglice
comin' and goin' like folks carryin' water
to a fire. A body would think, by the stir among 'em,
them critter's' barrel was empty!
The bears are there, coolly returned the bee-hunter.
I've seen such movements before, and know how to
account
for them. The bears are in the thicket, but don't
like to come out in the face of such a colony. I have
heard of bears being chased miles by bees, when their
anger was up!
Mortality! They have a good deal of dander (
dandruff
)
for sich little vipers! But what are
we
to do,
Bourdon
?
for Doll and Blossom
must
taste that honey! Half's
mine, you know, and I don't like to give it up.
The bee-hunter smiled at the coolness with which
Gershom
assigned to himself so large a portion of his property;
though he did not think it worth his while, just then, to
demur to his declaration, as the lawyers might have it.
There was a sort of border rule, which gave all present
equal shares in any forest captures; just as vessels in sight
come in for prize-money, taken in time of war by public
cruisers. At any rate, the honey of a single tree was not
of sufficient value to induce a serious quarrel about it. If
there should be any extra trouble or danger in securing
the present prize, every craft in view might, fairly enough,
come in for its share.
Doll shall not be forgotten, if we can only house our
honey, answered the bee-hunter; not Blossom, neither.
I've a fancy, already, for that blossom of the wilderness,
and shall do all I can to make myself agreeable to her. A
man cannot approach a maiden with anything sweeter than
honey.
Some gals like sugar'd words better; but, let me tell
you one thing,
stranger
You have eaten bread and salt with me, Whiskey, and
both are scarce articles in a wilderness; and you've slept
under my roof: is it not almost time to call me something
else than stranger?
Well, Bourdon, if you prefer that name; though
stran
ger is a name I like, it has sich an up and off sound to it.
When a man calls all he sees
stran
gers, it's a sign he don't
let the grass grow in the road for want of movin'; and a
movin' man for me, any day, before your stationaries. I
was born on the sea-shore, in the Bay State; and here I
am, up among the fresh-water lakes, as much nat'ralized
as any muskelunge that was ever cotch'd in Huron, or
about Mackinaw. If I can believe my eyes, Bourdon,
there is the muzzle of a bear to be seen, jist under that
heavy hemlockhere, where the bees seem thickest!
No doubt in the world, answered le Bourdon, coolly;
though he had taken the precaution to look to the priming
of each of his pieces, as if he expected there would soon
be occasion to use them. But what was that you were
about to say concernin' Blossom? It would not be civil
to the young woman to overlook her, on account of a bear
or two.
You take it easy,
stran
gerBourdon, I should say
you take it easy! What I was about to say was this:
that the whull lake country, and that's a wide stretch to foot
it over, I know; but, big as it is, the whull lake country
don't contain Blossom's equal. I'm her brother, and
perhaps ought to be a little modest in sich matters; but I
an't a bit, and let out jist what I think. Blossom's a
di'mond
,
if there be di'monds on 'arth.
And yonder is a bear, if there be bears on earth!
exclaimed
le Bourdon, who was not a little amused with
Gershom's account of his family, but who saw that the
moment was now arrived when it would be necessary to
substitute deeds for words. There they come, in a drove,
and they seem in earnest.
This was true enough. No less than eight bears, half
of which, however, were quite young, came tumbling over
the logs, and bounding up towards the fallen tree, as if
charging the citadel of the bees by preconcert. Their
appearance was the signal for a general rally of the insects;
and by the time the foremost of the clumsy animals had
reached the tree, the air above and around him was
absolutely
darkened by the cloud of bees that was collected to
defend their treasures. Bruin trusted too much to the
thickness of his hide and to the defences with which he
was provided by nature, besides being too much incited by
the love of honey, to regard the little heroes, but thrust his
nose in at the hole, doubtless hoping to plunge it at once
into the midst of a mass of the sweets. A growl, a start
backwards, and a flourishing of the fore-paws, with sundry
bites in the air, at once announced that he had met with
greater resistance than he had anticipated. In a minute,
all the bears were on their hind-legs, beating the air with
their fore-paws, and nipping right and left with their jaws,
in vigorous combat with their almost invisible foes.
Instinct
supplied the place of science, and spite of the hides
and the long hair that covered them, the bees found the
means of darting their stings into unprotected places, until
the quadrupeds were fairly driven to rolling about on the
grass in order to crush their assailants. This last process
had some effect, a great many bees being destroyed by the
energetic rollings and tumblings of the hears; but, as in
the tide of battle, the places of those who fell were
immediately
supplied by fresh assailants, until numbers seemed
likely to prevail over power, if not over discipline. At this
critical instant, when the bears seemed fatigued with their
nearly frantic saltations, and violent blows upon nothing,
le Bourdon deemed it wise to bring his forces into the
combat
.
Gershom having been apprised of the plan, both fired
at the same instant. Each ball took effect; one killing the
largest of all the bears, dead on the spot, while the other
inflicted a grievous wound on a second. This success was
immediately followed by a second discharge, wounding two
more of the enemy, while Ben held the second barrel of his
shot-gun in reserve. While the hurt animals were
hobbling
off, the men reloaded their pieces; and by the time
the last were ready to advance on the enemy, the ground
was cleared of bears and bees alike, only two of the former
remaining, of which one was already dead and the other
dying. As for the bees, they followed their retreating
enemies in a body, making a mistake that sometimes
happens
to still more intelligent beings; that of attributing to
5*
themselves, and their own prowess, a success that had been
gained by others.
The bee-hunter and his friend now set themselves at
work to provide a reception for the insects, the return of
which might shortly be expected. The former lighted a
fire, being always provided with the means, while Gershom
brought dry wood. In less than five minutes a bright blaze
was gleaming upwards; and when the bees returned, as
most of them soon did, they found this new enemy
entrenched
,
as it might be, behind walls of flame. Thousands of
the little creatures perished by means of this new invention
of man, and the rest soon after were led away by their
chiefs to seek some new deposit for the fruits of their
industry
.
CHAPTER IV.
The sad butterfly,
Waving his lacker'd wings, darts quickly on,
And, by his free flight, counsels us to speed
For better lodgings, and a scene more sweet,
Than these dear borders offer us to-night.
Simms
.
It
was noon before Ben and Gershom dared to commence
the process of cutting and splitting the tree, in order to
obtain the honey. Until then, the bees lingered around
their fallen hive, and it would have been dangerous to
venture beyond the smoke and heat, in order to
accomplish
the task. It is true, le Bourdon possessed several
secrets, of more or less virtue, to drive off the bees when
disposed to assault him, but no one that was as certain as
a good fire, backed by a dense column of vapour. Various
plants are thought to be so offensive to the insects, that
they avoid even their odour; and the bee-hunter had faith
in one or two of them; but none of the right sort happened
now to be near, and he was obliged to trust, first to a
powerful heat, and next to the vapour of damp wood.
As there were axes, and wedges, and a beetle in the
canoe, and Gershom was as expert with those implements
as a master of fencing is with his foil, to say nothing of the
skill of le Bourdon, the tree was soon laid open, and its
ample stores of sweets exposed. In the course of the
afternoon
the honey was deposited in kegs, the kegs were
transferred
to the canoe, and the whole deposited in the
chient
.
The day had been one of toil, and when our two
border-men
sat down near the spring, to take their evening meal,
each felt glad that his work was done.
I believe this must be the last hive I line, this
summer
,
said le Bourdon, while eating his supper. My
luck has been good so far, but in troublesome times one
had better not be too far from home. I am surprised,
Waring, that you have ventured so far from your family,
while the tidings are so gloomy.
That's partly because you don't know
me
, and partly
because you don't know
Dolly
, As for leaving hum, with
any body to kear for it, I should like to know who is more
to the purpose than Dolly Waring? I haven't no idee that
even bees would dare get upon
her!
If they did, they'd
soon get the worst on't. Her tongue is all-powerful, to
say nawthin' of her arm; and if the so'gers can only handle
their muskets as she can handle a broom, there is no need
of new regiments to carry on this war.
Now, nothing could be more false than this character;
but a drunkard has little regard to what he says.
I am glad your garrison is so strong, answered the
bee-hunter, thoughtfully; but mine is too weak to stay
any longer, out here in the openings. Whiskey Centre, I
intend to break up, and to return to the settlements, before
the red-skins break loose, in earnest. If you will stay, and
lend me a hand to embark the honey and stores, and help
to carry the canoe down the river, you shall be well paid
for your trouble.
Waal, I'd about as lief do that, as do anything else.
Good jobs is scarce, out here in the wilderness, and when
a body lights of one, he ought to profit by it. I come up
here thinkin' to meet you, for I heer'n tell from a voyager
that you was a-beeing it, out in the openin's, and there's
nawthin' in natur' that Dolly takes too with a greater
relish
than good wild honey. `Try whiskey,' I've told her
a thousand times, `and you'll soon get to like
that
better
than all the rest of creation;' but not a drop could I ever
get her, or Blossom, to swallow. It's true, that leaves so
much the more for me; but I'm a companionable crittur',
and don't think I've drunk as much as I want, unless I
take it society-like. That's one reason I've taken so
mightily to you, Bourdon; you're not much at a pull, but
you an't downright afeard of a jug, neither.
The bee-hunter was glad to hear that all the family had
not this man's vice, for he now plainly foresaw that the
accidents of his position must bring him and these strangers
much in contact, for some weeks, at least. Le Bourdon,
though not absolutely `afraid of a jug,' as Whiskey Centre
had expressed it, was decidedly a temperate man;
drinking
but seldom, and never to excess. He too well knew
the hazards by which he was surrounded, to indulge in
this way, even had he the taste for it; but he had no taste
that way, one small jug of brandy forming his supply for a
whole season. In these days of exaggeration in all things,
exaggeration in politics, in religion, in temperance, in
virtue
,
and even in education, by putting `new wine into old
bottles,' that one little jug might have sufficed to give him
a bad name; but five-and-thirty years ago men had more
real independence than they now possess, and were not as
much afraid of that
croquemitaine
, public opinion, as they
are to-day. To be sure, it was little to le Bourdon's taste
to make a companion of such a person as Whiskey Centre;
but there was no choice. The man was an utter stranger
to him; and the only means he possessed of making sure
that he did not carry off the property that lay so much at
his mercy, was by keeping near him. With many men, the
bee-hunter would have been uneasy at being compelled to
remain alone with them in the woods; for cases in which
one had murdered another, in order to get possession of
the goods, in these remote regions, were talked of among
the other rumours of the borders; but Gershom had that
in his air and manner that rendered Ben confident his
delinquencies
,
at the most, would scarcely reach bloodshed.
Pilfer he might; but murder was a crime which he did not
appear at all likely to commit.
After supping in company, our two adventurers secured
everything; and, retiring to the
chient
, they went to sleep.
No material disturbance occurred, but the night passed in
tranquillity; the bee-hunter merely experiencing some slight
interruption to his slumbers, from the unusual circumstance
of having a companion. One as long accustomed to be
alone as himself, would naturally submit to some such
sensation
,
our habits getting so completely the mastery, as
often to supplant even nature.
The following morning the bee-hunter commenced his
preparations for a change of residence. Had he not been
discovered, it is probable that the news received from the
Chippewa would not have induced him to abandon his
present position, so early in the season; but he thought
the risk of remaining was too great, under all the
circumstances
.
The Pottawattamie, in particular, was a subject
of great distrust to him, and he believed it highly possible
some of that old chief's tribe might be after his scalp ere
many suns had risen. Gershom acquiesced in these opinions,
and, as soon as his brain was less under the influence of
liquor than was common with him, he appeared to be quite
happy in having it in his power to form a species of
alliance
,
offensive and defensive, with a man of his own colour
and origin. Great harmony now prevailed between the
two, Gershom improving vastly in all the better qualities,
the instant his intellect and feelings got to be a little
released
from the thraldom of the jug. His own immediate
store of whiskey was quite exhausted, and le Bourdon kept
the place in which his own small stock of brandy was
secured
,
a profound secret. These glimmerings of returning
intellect, and of reviving principles, are by no means
unusual
with the sot, thus proving that so long as there is
life, there is hope, for the moral, as well as for the
physical
being. What was a little remarkable, Gershom grew
less vulgar, even in his dialect, as he grew more sober,
showing that in all respects he was becoming a greatly
improved person.
The men were several hours in loading the canoe, not
only all the stores and ammunition, but all the honey being
transferred to it. The bee-hunter had managed to conceal
his jug of brandy, reduced by this time to little more than
a quart, within an empty powder-keg, into which he had
crammed a beaver-skin or two, that he had taken, as it
might be incidentally, in the course of his rambles. At
length everything was removed and stowed in its proper
place, on board the capacious canoe, and Gershom expected
an announcement on the part of Ben, of his readiness to
embark. But there still remained one duty to perform.
The bee-hunter had killed a buck only the day before the
opening of our narrative, and shouldering a quarter, he
had left the remainder of the animal suspended from the
branches of a tree, near the place where it had been shot
and cleaned. As venison might be needed before they
could reach the mouth of the river, Ben deemed it advisable
that he and Gershom should go and bring in the remainder
of the carcase. The men started on this undertaking
accordingly
,
leaving the canoe about two in the afternoon.
The distance between the spot where the deer had been
killed, and the
chient
, was about three miles; which was
the reason why the bee-hunter had not brought home the
entire animal, the day he killed it; the American
woodsman
often carrying his game great distances in preference
to leaving it any length of time in the forest. In the latter
case there is always danger from beasts of prey, which are
drawn from afar by the scent of blood. Le Bourdon thought
it possible they might now encounter wolves; though he
had left the carcase of the deer so suspended as to place it
beyond the reach of most of the animals of the wilderness.
Each of the men, however, carried a rifle; and Hive was
allowed to accompany them, by an act of grace on the part
of his master.
For the first half hour, nothing occurred out of the usual
course of events. The bee-hunter had been conversing
freely with his companion, who, he rejoiced to find,
manifested
far more common sense, not to say good sense, than
he had previously shown; and from whom he was deriving
information touching the number of vessels, and the other
movements on the lakes, that he fancied might be of use
to himself when he started for Detroit. While thus
engaged
,
and when distant only a hundred rods from the place
where he had left the venison, le Bourdon was suddenly
struck with the movements of the dog. Instead of
doubling
on his own tracks, and scenting right and left, as was
the animal's wont, he was now advancing cautiously, with
his head low, seemingly feeling his way with his nose, as
if there was a strong taint in the wind.
Sartain as my name is Gershom, exclaimed Waring,
just after he and Ben had come to a halt, in order to look
around themyonder is an Injin! The crittur' is seated
at the foot of the large oakhereaway, more to the right
of the dog, and Hive has struck his scent. The fellow is
asleep, with his rifle across his lap, and can't have much
dread of wolves or bears!
I see him, answered le Bourdon, and am as much
surprised as grieved to find him there. It is a little
remarkable
that I should have so many visiters, just at this
time, on my hunting-ground, when I never had any at all
before yesterday. It gives a body an uncomfortable feeling,
Waring, to live so much in a crowd! Well, wellI'm about
to move, and it will matter little twenty-four hours hence.
The chap's a Winnebagoe by his paint, added
Gershom
but
let's go up and give him a call.
The bee-hunter assented to this proposal, remarking as
they moved forward, that he did not think the stranger of
the tribe just named; though he admitted that the use of
paint was so general and loose among these warriors, as to
render it difficult to decide.
The crittur' sleeps soundly! exclaimed Gershom,
stopping within ten yards of the Indian, to take another
look at him.
He'll never awake; put in the bee-hunter, solemnly
the man is dead. See; there is blood on the side of
his head, and a rifle-bullet has left its hole there.
Even while speaking, the bee-hunter advanced, and
raising
a sort of shawl, that once had been used as an
ornament
,
and which had last been thrown carelessly over the
head of its late owner, he exposed the well-known features
of Elksfoot, the Pottawattamie, who had left them little
more than twenty-four hours before! The warrior had
been shot by a rifle-bullet directly through the temple, and
had been scalped. The powder had been taken from his
horn, and the bullets from his pouch; but, beyond this, he
had not been plundered. The body was carefully placed
against a tree, in a sitting attitude, the rifle was laid across
its legs, and there it had been left, in the centre of the
openings, to become food for beasts of prey, and to have
its bones bleached by the snows and the rains!
The bee-hunter shuddered, as he gazed at this fearful
memorial of the violence, against which even a wilderness
could afford no sufficient protection. That Pigeonswing
had slain his late fellow-guest, le Bourdon had no doubt,
and he sickened at the thought. Although he had himself
dreaded a good deal from the hostility of the
Pottawattamie
,
he could have wished this deed undone. That there
was a jealous distrust of each other between the two
Indians
had been sufficiently apparent; but the bee-hunter
could not have imagined that it would so soon lead to
results
as terrible as these!
After examining the body, and noting the state of things
around it, the men proceeded, deeply impressed with the
necessity, not only of their speedy removal, but of their
standing by each other in that remote region, now that
violence
had so clearly broken out among the tribes. The
bee-hunter had taken a strong liking to the Chippewa, and
he regretted so much the more to think that he had done
this deed. It was true, that such a state of things might
exist as to justify an Indian warrior, agreeably to his own
notions, in taking the life of any one of a hostile tribe; but
le Bourdon wished it had been otherwise. A man of gentle
and peaceable disposition himself, though of a profoundly
enthusiastic temperament in his own peculiar way, he had
ever avoided those scenes of disorder and bloodshed, which
are of so frequent occurrence in the forest and on the
prairies
;
and this was actually the first instance in which he
had ever beheld a human body that had fallen by human
hands. Gershom had seen more of the peculiar life of the
frontiers than his companion, in consequence of having
lived so closely in contact with the fire-water; but even
he
was greatly shocked with the suddenness and nature of
the Pottawattamie's end.
No attempt was made to bury the remains of Elksfoot,
inasmuch as our adventurers had no tools fit for such a
purpose, and any merely superficial interment would have
been a sort of invitation to the wolves to dig the body up
again.
Let him lean ag'in the tree, said Waring, as they
moved on towards the spot where the carcass of the deer
was left, and I'll engage nothin' touches him. There's
that about the face of man, Bourdon, that skears the beasts;
and if a body can only muster courage to stare them full
in the eye, one single human can drive before him a whull
pack of wolves.
I've heard as much, returned the bee-hunter, but
should not like to be the `human' to try the experiment.
That the face of man may have terrors for a beast, I think
likely; but hunger would prove more than a match for such
fear. Yonder is our venison, Waring; safe where I left it.
The carcase of the deer was divided, and each man
shouldering his burthen, the two returned to the river,
taking care to avoid the path that led by the body of the
dead Indian. As both laboured with much earnestness,
everything was soon ready, and the canoe speedily left the
shore. The Kalamazoo is not in general a swift and
turbulent
stream, though it has a sufficient current to carry
away its waters without any appearance of sluggishness.
Of course, this character is not uniform, reaches occurring
in which the placid water is barely seen to move; and
others, again, are found, in which something like rapids,
and even falls, appear. But, on the whole, and more
especially in the part of the stream where it was, the canoe
had little to disturb it, as it glided easily down, impelled
by a light stroke of the paddle.
The bee-hunter did not abandon his station without
regret
.
He had chosen a most agreeable site for his
chient
,
consulting air, shade, water, verdure, and groves, as well
as the chances of obtaining honey. In his regular pursuit
he had been unusually fortunate; and the little pile of kegs
in the centre of his canoe was certainly a grateful sight to
his eyes. The honey gathered this season, moreover, had
proved to be of an unusually delicious flavour, affording
the promise of high prices and ready sales. Still, the
bee-hunter
left the place with profound regret. He loved his
calling; he loved solitude to a morbid degree, perhaps;
and he loved the gentle excitement that naturally attended
his bee-lining, his discoveries, and his gains. Of all
the pursuits that are more or less dependent on the chances
Vol. I.  6
of the hunt and the field, that of the bee-hunter is of the
most quiet and placid enjoyment. He has the stirring
motives
of uncertainty and doubt, without the disturbing
qualities
of bustle and fatigue; and, while his exercise is
sufficient
for health, and for the pleasures of the open air, it is
seldom of a nature to weary or unnerve. Then the study
of the little animal that is to be watched, and if the reader
will, plundered, is not without a charm for those who
delight
in looking into the wonderful arcana of nature. So
great was the interest that le Bourdon sometimes felt in his
little companions, that, on three several occasions that very
summer, be had spared hives after having found them,
because
he had ascertained that they were composed of young
bees, and had not yet got sufficiently colonized, to render
a new swarming more than a passing accident. With all
this kindness of feeling towards his victims, Boden had
nothing of the transcendental folly that usually
accompanies
the sentimentalism of the exaggerated, but his feelings
and impulses were simple and direct though so often gentle
and humane. He knew that the bee, like all the other
inferior
animals of creation, was placed at the disposition of
man, and did not scruple to profit by the power thus
beneficently
bestowed, though he exercised it gently, and with
a proper discrimination between its use and its abuse.
Neither of the men toiled much, as the canoe floated
down the stream. Very slight impulses served to give their
buoyant craft a reasonably swift motion, and the current
itself was a material assistant. These circumstances gave
an opportunity for conversation, as the canoe glided
onward
.
A'ter all, suddenly exclaimed Waring, who had been
examining the pile of kegs for some time in silencea'ter
all, Bourdon, your trade is an oncommon one! A most
extr'ornary and oncommon callin'!
More so, think you, Gershom, than swallowing whiskey,
morning, noon, and night? answered the bee-hunter, with
a quiet smile.
Ay, but that's not a rig'lar callin'; only a likin'! Now
a man may have a likin' to a hundred things in which he
don't deal. I set nothin' down as a business, which a man
don't live by.
Perhaps you're right, Waring. More die by whiskey
than live by whiskey.
Whiskey Centre seemed struck with this remark, which
was introduced so aptly, and was uttered so quietly. He
gazed earnestly at his companion for near a minute, ere he
attempted to resume the discourse.
Blossom has often said as much as this, he then slowly
rejoined; and even Dolly has prophesized the same.
The bee-hunter observed that an impression had been
made, and he thought it wisest to let the reproof already
administered produce its effect, without endeavouring to
add to its power. Waring sat with his chin on his breast,
in deep thought, while his companion, for the first time
since they had met, examined the features and aspect of
the man. At first sight, Whiskey Centre certainly offered
little that was inviting; but a closer study of his
countenance
showed that he had the remains of a singularly
handsome man. Vulgar as were his forms of speech, coarse
and forbidding as his face had become, through the
indulgence
which was his bane, there were still traces of this
truth. His complexion had once been fair almost to
effeminacy
,
his cheeks ruddy with health, and his blue eye
bright and full of hope. His hair was light; and all these
pecularities strongly denoted his Saxon origin. It was not so
much Anglo-Saxon as Americo-Saxon, that was to be seen in
the physical outlines and hues of this nearly self-destroyed
being. The heaviness of feature, the ponderousness of
limb and movement, had all long disappeared from his race,
most probably under the influence of climate, and his nose
was prominent and graceful in outline, while his mouth
and chin might have passed for having been under the
chisel of some distinguished sculptor. It was, in truth,
painful to examine that face, steeped as it was in liquor,
and fast losing the impress left by nature. As yet, the
body retained most of its power, the enemy having
insidiously
entered the citadel, rather than having actually
subdued
it. The bee-hunter sighed as he gazed at his moody
companion, and wondered whether Blossom had aught of
this marvellous comeliness of countenance, without its
revolting
accompaniments.
All that afternoon, and the whole of the night that
succeeded
,
did the canoe float downward with the current.
Occasionally, some slight obstacle to its progress would
present itself; but, on the whole, its advance was steady
and certain. As the river necessarily followed the
formation
of the land, it was tortuous and irregular in its course,
though its general direction was towards the north-west,
or west a little northerly. The river-bottoms being much
more heavily `timbered'to use a woodsman termthan
the higher grounds, there was little of the park-like `
openings'
on its immediate banks, though distant glimpses were
had of many a glade and of many a charming grove.
As the canoe moved towards its point of destination, the
conversation did not lag between the bee-hunter and his
companion. Each gave the other a sort of history of his
life; for, now that the jug was exhausted, Gershom could
talk not only rationally, but with clearness and force.
Vulgar
he was, and, as such, uninviting and often repulsive;
still his early education partook of that peculiarity of New
England which, if it do not make her children absolutely
all they are apt to believe themselves to be, seldom leaves
them in the darkness of a besotted ignorance. As usually
happens with this particular race, Gershom had acquired a
good deal for a man of his class in life; and this
information
,
added to native shrewdness, enabled him to maintain
his place in the dialogue with a certain degree of credit.
He had a very lively perception  fancied or real  of all
the advantages of being born in the land of the puritans,
deeming everything that came of the great Blarney Stone
superior to everything else of the same nature elsewhere;
and, while much disposed to sneer and rail at all other
parts of the country, just as much indisposed to take,
as disposed to give. Ben Boden soon detected this
weakness
in his companion's character, a weakness so very
general as scarce to need being pointed out to any
observant
man, and which is almost inseparable from
half-way
intelligence and provincial self-admiration; and Ben
was rather inclined to play on it, whenever Gershom laid
himself a little more open than common, on the subject.
On the whole, however, the communications were
amicable
;
and the dangers of the wilderness rendering the
parties
allies, they went their way with an increasing confidence
in each other's support. Gershom, now that he was
thoroughly
sober, could impart much to Ben that was useful;
while Ben knew a great deal that even his companion,
coming as he did from the chosen people, was not sorry to
learn. As has been already intimated, each communicated
to the other, in the course of this long journey on the river,
an outline of his past life.
The history of Gershom Waring was one of every-day
occurrence. He was born of a family in humble
circumstances
in Massachusetts, a community in which, however,
none are so very humble as to be beneath the paternal
watchfulness of the state. The common schools had done
their duty by him; while, according to his account of the
matter, his only sister had fallen into the hands of a female
relative, who was enabled to impart an instruction slightly
superior to that which is to be had from the servants of the
public. After a time, the death of this relative, and the
marriage of Gershom, brought the brother and sister
together
again, the last still quite young. From this period the
migratory life of the family commenced. Previously to the
establishment of manufactories within her limits, New
England systematically gave forth her increase to the states
west and south of her own territories. A portion of this
increase still migrates, and will probably long continue so
to do; but the tide of young women, which once flowed so
steadily from that region, would now seem to have turned,
and is setting back in a flood of factory girls. But the
Warings lived at too early a day to feel the influence of
such a pass of civilization, and went west, almost as a
matter of course. With the commencement of his
migratory
life, Gershom began to dissipate, as it has got to be
matter of convention to term `drinking.' Fortunately,
Mrs. Waring had no children, thus lessening in a measure
the privations to which those unlucky females were obliged
to submit. When Gershom left his birth-place he had a
sum of money exceeding a thousand dollars in amount, the
united means of himself and sister; but, by the time he
had reached Detroit, it was reduced to less than a hundred.
Several years, however, had been consumed by the way,
the habits growing worse and the money vanishing, as the
family went further and further towards the skirts of
society
.
6*
At length Gershom attached himself to a sutler,
who was going up to Michillimackinac, with a party of
troops; and finally he left that place to proceed, in a canoe
of his own, to the head of Lake Michigan, where was a
post on the present site of Chicago, which was then known
as Fort Dearborn.
In quitting Mackinac for Chicago, Waring had no very
settled plan. His habits had completely put him out of
favour at the former place; and a certain restlessness urged
him to penetrate still farther into the wilderness. In all
his migrations and wanderings the two devoted females
followed his fortunes; the one because she was his wife,
the other because she was his sister. When the canoe
reached the mouth of the Kalamazoo, a gale of wind drove
it into the river; and finding a deserted cabin, ready built,
to receive him, Gershom landed, and had been busy with
the rifle for the last fortnight, the time he had been on
shore. Hearing from some voyageurs who had gone down
the lake, that a bee-hunter was up the river, he had
followed
the stream in its windings until he fell in with le
Bourdon.
Such is an outline of the account which Whiskey Centre
gave of himself. It is true, he said very little of his
propensity
to drink, but this his companion was enabled to
conjecture from the context of his narrative, as well as
from what he had seen. It was very evident to the
bee-hunter
,
that the plans of both parties for the summer were
about to be seriously deranged by the impending hostilities,
and that some decided movement might be rendered
necessary
,
even for the protection of their lives. This much
he communicated to Gershom, who heard his opinions with
interest, and a concern in behalf of his wife and sister that
at least did some credit to his heart. For the first time in
many months, indeed, Gershom was now
perfectly
sober,
a circumstance that was solely owing to his having had no
access to liquor for eight-and-forty hours. With the return
of a clear head, came juster notions of the dangers and
difficulties in which he had involved the two self-devoted
women who had accompanied him so far, and who really
seemed ready to follow him in making the circuit of the
earth.
It's troublesome times, exclaimed Whiskey Centre,
when his companion had just ended one of his strong and
lucid statements of the embarrassments that might environ
them, ere they could get back to the settled portions of the
country  it's troublesome times, truly! I see all you
would say, Bourdon, and wonder I ever got my foot so
deep into it, without thinkin' of all, beforehand! The best
on us will make mistakes, hows'ever, and I suppose I've
been called on to make mine, as well as another.
My trade speaks for itself, returned the bee-hunter,
and any man can see why one who looks for bees must
come where they're to be found; but, I will own, Gershom,
that your speculation lies a little beyond my
understanding
.
Now, you tell me you have two full barrels of
whiskey
Had, Bourdon
had
one of them is pretty nearly
half used, I am afeard.
Well
had
, until you began to be your own customer.
But here you are, squatted at the mouth of the Kalamazoo,
with a barrel and a
half
of liquor, and nobody but
yourself
to drink it! Where the profits are to come from,
exceeds
Pennsylvany calculations; perhaps a yankee can tell.
You forget the Injins. I met a man at Mackinaw,
who only took out in his canoe
one
barrel, and he brought
in skins enough to set up a grocery, at Detroit. But I
was on the trail of the soldiers, and meant to make a
business
on't, at Fort Dearborn. What between the soldiers
and the red-skins, a man might sell gallons a day, and at
fair prices.
It's a sorry business at the best, Whiskey; and now
you're fairly sober, if you'll take my advice you'll remain
so. Why not make up your mind, like a man, and vow
you'll never touch another drop.
Maybe I will, when these two barrels is emptiedI've
often thought of doin' some sich matter; and, ag'in and
ag'in, has Dolly and Blossom advised me to fall into the
plan; but it's hard to give up old habits, all at once. If I
could only taper off on a pint a day, for a year or so, I
think I might come round in time. I know as well as you
do, Bourdon, that sobriety is a good thing, and dissipation
a bad thing; but it's hard to give up all, at once.
Lest the instructed reader should wonder at a man's
using the term dissipation in a wilderness, it may be
well to explain that, in common American parlance,
dissipation
has got to mean drunkenness. Perhaps half
of the whole country, if told that a man, or a woman, might
be exceedingly dissipated and never swallow anything
stronger than water, would stoutly deny the justice of
applying
the word to such a person. This perversion of the
meaning of a very common term, has probably arisen from
the circumstance that there is very little dissipation in the
country that is not connected with hard drinking. A
dissipated
woman is a person almost unknown in America;
or, when the word is applied, it means a very different
degree
of misspending of time, from that which is understood
by the use of the same reproach, in older and more
sophisticated
states of society. The majority rules in this country,
and with the majority excess usually takes this particular
aspect; refinement having very little connection with the
dissipation of the masses, anywhere.
The excuses of his companion, however, caused le
Bourdon
to muse, more than might otherwise have been the
case, on Whiskey Centre's condition. Apart from all
considerations
connected with the man's own welfare, and the
happiness of his family, there were those which were
inseparable
from the common safety, in the present state of the
country. Boden was a man of much decision and firmness
of character, and he was clear-headed as to causes and
consequences. The practice of living alone had induced
in him the habits of reflection; and the self-reliance
produced
by his solitary life, a life of which he was fond almost
to a passion, caused him to decide warily, but to act promptly.
As they descended the river together, therefore, he went
over the whole of Gershom Waring's case and prospects,
with great impartiality and care, and settled in his own
mind what ought to be done, as well as the mode of doing
it. He kept his own counsel, however, discussing all sorts
of subjects that were of interest to men in their situation,
as they floated down the stream, avoiding any recurrence
to this theme, which was possibly of more importance to
them both, just then, than any other that could be presented.
CHAPTER V.
He was a wight of high renown,
And thou art but of low degree:
'T is pride that pulls the country down
Then take thine auld cloak about thee.
Shakspeare
.
The
canoe did not reach the mouth of the river until
near evening of the third day of its navigation. It was
not so much the distance, though that was considerable,
as it was the obstacles that lay in the way, which brought
the travellers to the end of their journey at so late a period.
As they drew nearer and nearer to the place where
Gershom
had left his wife and sister, le Bourdon detected in
his companion signs of an interest in the welfare of the
two last, as well as a certain feverish uneasiness lest all
might not be well with them, that said something in favour
of his heart, whatever might be urged against his prudence
and care in leaving them alone in so exposed a situation.
I'm afeard a body don't think as much as he ought to
do, when liquor is in him, said Whiskey Centre, just as
the canoe doubled the last point, and the hut came into
view; else I never
could
have left two women by
themselves
in so lonesome a place. God be praised! there is
the
chient
at any rate; and there's a smoke comin' out
of it, if my eyes don't deceive me! Look, Bourdon, for
I can scarcely see, at all.
There is the house; and, as you say, there is certainly
a smoke rising from it.
There's comfort in that! exclaimed the truant
husband
and brother, with a sigh that seemed to relieve a very
loaded breast. Yes, there's comfort in that! If there's
a fire, there must be them that lighted it; and a fire at this
season, too, says that there's somethin' to eat. I should
be sorry, Bourdon, to think I'd left the women folks
without
food; though, to own the truth, I don't remember
whether I did or not.
The man who drinks, Gershom, has commonly but a
very poor memory.
That's trueyes, I'll own that; and I wish it warn't
as true as it is; but reason and strong drink do
not
travel
far in company
Gershom suddenly ceased speaking; dropping his paddle
like one beset by a powerless weakness. The bee-hunter
saw that he was overcome by some unexpected occurrence,
and that the man's feelings were keenly connected with
the cause, whatever that might be. Looking eagerly around
in quest of the explanation, le Bourdon saw a female
standing
on a point of land that commanded a view of the river
and its banks for a considerable distance, unequivocally
watching the approach of the canoe.
There she is, said Gershom, in a subdued tone
that's Dolly; and there she has been, I'll engage, half
the time of my absence, waitin' to get the first glimpse of
my miserable body, as it came back to her. Sich is woman,
Bourdon; and God forgive me, if I have ever forgotten
their natur', when I was bound to remember it. But we
all have our weak moments, at times, and I trust mine will
not be accounted ag'in me more than them of other men.
This is a beautiful sight, Gershom, and it almost makes
me your friend! The man for whom a woman can feel so
much concernthat a womannay, women; for you tell
me your sister is one of the familybut the man whom
decent
women can follow to a place like this, must have
some good p'ints about him. That woman is a weepin';
and it must be for joy at your return.
'T would be jist like Dolly to do soshe's done it
before, and would be likely to do so ag'in, answered
Gershom
,
nearly choked by the effort he made to speak
without
betraying his own emotion. Put the canoe into the
p'int, and let me land there. I must go up and say a kind
word to poor Dolly; while you can paddle on, and let
Blossom know I'm near at hand.
The bee-hunter complied in silence, casting curious
glances upward at the woman while doing so, in order to
ascertain what sort of a female Whiskey Centre could
possibly
have for a wife. To his surprise, Dorothy Waring
was not only decently, but she was neatly clad, appearing
as if she had studiously attended to her personel
appearance
,
in the hope of welcoming her wayward and
unfortunate
husband back to his forest home. This much le
Bourdon saw, by a hasty glance, as his companion landed,
for a feeling of delicacy prevented him from taking a
longer look at the woman. As Gershom ascended the
bank to meet his wife, le Bourdon paddled on, and landed
just below the grove in which was the
chient
. It might
have been his long exclusion from all of the other sex, and
most especially from that portion of it which retains its
better looks, but the being which now met the bee-hunter,
appeared to him to belong to another world, rather than
to that in which he habitually dwelt. As this was Margery
Waring, who was almost uniformly called Blossom, by her
acquaintances, and who is destined to act an important
part in this legend of the openings, it may be well to
give a brief description of her age, attire, and personal
appearance, at the moment when she was first seen by le
Bourdon.
In complexion, colour of the hair, and outline of face,
Margery Waring bore a strong family resemblance to her
brother. In spite of exposure, and the reflection of the
sun's rays from the water of the lake, however,
her
skin
was of a clear, transparent white, such as one might look
for in a drawing-room, but hardly expect to find in a
wilderness
;
while the tint of her lips, cheeks, and, in a
diminished
degree, of her chin and ears, were such as one
who wielded a pencil might long endeavour to catch
without
succeeding. Her features had the chiselled outline
which was so remarkable in her brother; while in
her
countenance, in addition to the softened expression of her
sex and years, there was nothing to denote any physical or
moral infirmity, to form a drawback to its witchery and
regularity. Her eyes were blue, and her hair as near
golden as human tresses well could be. Exercise, a life
of change, and of dwelling much in the op n air, had given
to this unusually charming girl, not only health, but its
appearance. Still, she was in no respect coarse, or had
anything in the least about her that indicated her being
accustomed to toil, with some slight exception in her hands,
perhaps, which were those of a girl who did not spare
herself
,
when there was an opportunity to be of use. In this
particular, the vagrant life of her brother had possibly been
of some advantage to her, as it had prevented her being
much employed in the ordinary toil of her condition in
life. Still, Margery Waring had that happy admixture of
delicacy and physical energy, which is, perhaps, oftener to
be met in the American girl of her class, than in the girl
of almost any other nation; and far oftener than in the
young American of her sex, who is placed above the
necessity
of labour.
As a stranger approached her, the countenance of this
fair creature expressed both surprise and satisfaction;
surprise
that any one should have been met by Gershom, in
such a wilderness, and satisfaction that the stranger proved
to be a white man, and seemingly one who did not drink.
You are Blossom, said the bee-hunter, taking the
hand of the half-reluctant girl, in a way so respectful and
friendly, that she could not refuse it, even while she
doubted the propriety of thus receiving an utter stranger
the Blossom of whom Gershom Waring speaks so
often, and so affectionately?
You are then my brother's friend, answered Margery,
smiling so sweetly, that le Bourdon gazed on her with
delight
.
We are
so
glad that he has come back! Five
terrible nights have sister and I been here alone, and we
have believed every bush was a red man!
That danger is over, now, Blossom; but there is still
an enemy near you that must be overcome.
An enemy! There is no one, here, but Dolly and
myself. No one has been near us, since Gershom went
after the bee-hunter, whom we heard was out in the
openings
.
Are you that bee-hunter?
I am, beautiful Blossom; and I tell you there is an
enemy here, in your cabin, that must be looked to.
We fear no enemies but the red men, and we have
seen none of them since we reached this river. What is
the name of the enemy you so dread, and where is he to
be found?
His name is Whiskey, and he is kept somewhere in
this hut, in casks. Show me the place, that I may destroy
him, before his friend comes to his assistance.
A gleam of bright intelligence flashed into the face of
the beautiful young creature. First she reddened almost
to scarlet; then her face became pale as death.
Compressing
her lips intensely, she stood irresolutenow gazing
at the pleasing, and seemingly well-disposed stranger
before
her, now looking earnestly towards the still distant
forms of her brother and sister, which were slowly
advancing
in the direction of the cabin.
Dare you? Margery at length asked, pointing towards
her brother.
I dare: he is now quite sober, and may be reasoned
with. For the sake of us all, let us profit by this
advantage
.
He keeps the liquor in two casks that you will find
under the shed, behind the hut.
This said, the girl covered her face with both her
hands, and sunk on a stool, as if afraid to be a witness of
that which was to follow. As for le Bourdon, he did not
delay a moment, but passed out of the cabin by a second
door, that opened in its rear. There were the two barrels,
and by their side an axe. His first impulse was to dash
in the heads of the casks where they stood; but a
moment's
reflection told him that the odour, so near the
cabin, would be unpleasant to every one, and might have
a tendency to exasperate the owner of the liquor. He
cast about him, therefore, for the means of removing the
casks, in order to stave them, at a distance from the
dwelling.
Fortunately, the cabin of Whiskey Centre stood on the
brow of a sharp descent, at the bottom of which ran a
brawling brook. At another moment, le Bourdon would
have thought of saving the barrels; but time pressed, and
he could not delay. Seizing the barrel next to him, he
rolled it without difficulty to the brow of the declivity, and
set it off with a powerful shove of his foot. It was the
half-empty cask, and away it went, the liquor it contained
washing about as it rolled over and over, until hitting a
rock about half-way down the declivity, the hoops gave
way, when the staves went over the little precipice, and
the water of the stream was tumbling through all that
remained
of the cask, at the next instant. A slight
exclamation
Vol. I.  7
of delight behind him caushed the bee-hunter to
look round, and he saw that Margery was watching his
movements with an absorbed interest. Her smile was one
of joy, not unmingled with terror; and she rather whispered
than said aloudThe otherthe other
that
is fullbe
quick; there is no time to lose. The bee-hunter seized
the second cask and rolled it towards the brow of the
rocks. It was not quite as easily handled as the other
barrel, but his strength sufficed, and it was soon bounding
down the declivity after its companion. This second cask
hit the same rock as the first, whence it leaped off the
precipice, and, aided by its greater momentum, it was
literally
dashed in pieces at its base.
Not only was this barrel broken into fragments, but its
hoops and staves were carried down the torrent, driving
before them those of the sister cask, until the whole were
swept into the lake, which was some distance from the
cabin.
That job is well done! exclaimed le Bourdon, when
the last fragment of the wreck was taken out of sight.
No man will ever turn himself into a beast by means of
that
liquor.
God be praised! murmured Margery. He is
so
different, stranger, when he has been drinking, from what
he is when he has not! You have been sent by
Providence
to do us this good.
I can easily believe that, for it is so with us all. But
you must not call me stranger, sweet Margery; for, now
that you and I have this secret between us, I am a stranger
no longer.
The girl smiled and blushed; then she seemed anxious
to ask a question. In the mean time they left the shed,
and took seats, in waiting for the arrival of Gershom and
his wife. It was not long ere the last entered; the
countenance
of the wife beaming with a satisfaction she made
no effort to conceal. Dolly was not as beautiful as her
sister-in-law
;
still, she was a comely woman, though one who had
been stricken by sorrow. She was still young, and might
have been in the pride of her good looks, had it not been
for the manner in which she had grieved over the fall of
Gershom. The joy that gladdens a woman's heart,
however
,
was now illuminating her countenance, and she
welcomed
le Bourdon most cordially, as if aware that he had
been of service to her husband. For months she had not
seen Gershom quite himself, until that evening.
I have told Dolly all our adventur's, Bourdon, cried
Gershom, as soon as the brief greetings were over, and
she tells me all's right, hereabouts. Three canoe-loads
of Injins passed along shore, goin' up the lake, she tells
me, this very a'ternoon; but they didn't see the smoke,
the fire bein' out, and must have thought the hut empty;
if, indeed, they knew anythin' of it, at all.
The last is the most likely, remarked Margery; for
I watched them narrowly from the beeches on the shore,
and there was no pointing, or looking up, as would have
happened had there been any one among them who could
show the others a cabin. Houses an't so plenty, in this
part of the country, that travellers pass without turning
round to look at them. An Injin has curiosity as well as
a white man, though he manages so often to conceal it.
Didn't you say, Blossom, that one of the canoes was
much behind the others, and that a warrior in that canoe
did
look up towards this grove, as if searching for the
cabin? asked Dorothy.
Either it was so, or my fears made it
seem
so. The
two canoes that passed first were well filled with Injins,
each having eight in it; while the one that came last held
but four warriors. They were a mile apart, and the last
canoe seemed to be trying to overtake the others. I did
think that nothing but their haste prevented the men in
the last canoe from landing; but my fears may have made
that seem so that was not so.
As the cheek of the charming girl flushed with
excitement
,
and her face became animated, Margery appeared
marvellously handsome; more so, the bee-hunter fancied,
than any other female he had ever before seen. But her
words impressed him quite as much as her looks; for he
at once saw the importance of such an event, to persons
in their situation. The wind was rising on the lake, and
it was ahead for the canoes; should the savages feel the
necessity of making a harbour, they might return to the
mouth of the Kalamazoo; a step that would endanger all
their lives, in the event of these Indians proving to belong
to those, whom there was now reason to believe were in
British pay. In times of peace, the intercourse between
the whites and the red men was usually amicable, and
seldom led to violence, unless through the effects of
liquor; but, a price being placed on scalps, a very
different
state of things might be anticipated, as a
consequence
of the hostilities. This was then a matter to be
looked to; and, as evening was approaching, no time was
to be lost.
The shores of Michigan are generally low, nor are
harbours
either numerous, or very easy of access. It would
be difficult, indeed, to find, in any other part of the world,
so great an extent of coast, that possesses so little
protection
for the navigator, as that of this very lake. There
are a good many rivers, it is true, but usually they have
bars, and are not easy of entrance. This is the reason
why that very convenient glove, the Constitution, which
can be made to fit any hand, has been discovered to have
an extra finger in it, which points out a mode by which
the Federal Government can create ports wherever nature
has forgotten to perform this beneficent office. It is a
little extraordinary that the fingers of so many of the great
expounders turn out to be thumbs, however;
exhibiting
clumsiness, rather than that adroit lightness which
usually characterizes the dexterity of men who are in the
habit of rummaging other people's pockets, for their own
especial purposes. It must be somewhat up-hill work to
persuade any disinterested and clear-headed man, that a
political power to regulate commerce goes the length
of making harbours; the one being in a great measure a
moral, while the other is exclusively a physical agency;
any more than it goes the length of making warehouses,
and cranes, and carts, and all the other physical
implements
for carrying on trade. Now, what renders all this
thumbing of the Constitution so much the more absurd,
is the fact, that the very generous compact interested does
furnish a means, by which the poverty of ports on the
great lakes may be remedied, without making any more
unnecessary rents in the great national glove. Congress
clearly possesses the power to create and maintain a navy,
which includes the power to create all sorts of necessary
physical appliances; and, among others, places of refuge
for that navy, should they be actually needed. As a vessel
of war requires a harbour, and usually a better harbour
than a merchant-vessel, it strikes us the expounders
would do well to give this thought a moment's attention.
Behind it will be found the most unanswerable argument
in favour of the light-houses, too.
But, to return to the narrative: The Kalamazoo could
be entered by canoes, though it offered no very available
shelter for a vessel of any size. There was no other shelter
for the savages for several miles to the southward; and,
should the wind increase, of which there were strong
indications
,
it was not only possible, but highly probable,
that the canoes would return. According to the account
of the females, they had passed only two hours before, and
the breeze had been gradually gathering strength ever
since. It was not unlikely, indeed, that the attention paid
to the river by the warrior in the last canoe, may have had
reference to this very state of the weather; and his haste
to overtake his companions been connected with a desire
to induce them to seek a shelter. All this presented itself
to the bee-hunter's mind, at once; and it was discussed
between the members of the party, freely, and not without
some grave apprehensions.
There was one elevated pointelevated comparatively,
if not in a very positive sensewhence the eye could
command a considerable distance along the lake shore.
Thither Margery now hastened to look after the canoes.
Boden accompanied her; and together they proceeded,
side by side, with a new-born, but lively and increasing
confidence, that was all the greater, in consequence of
their possessing a common secret.
Brother must be much better than he was, the girl
observed, as they hurried on, for he has not once been
into the shed to look at the barrels! Before he went into
the openings, he never entered the house without drinking;
and, sometimes, he would raise the cup to his mouth as
often as three times in the first half-hour. Now, he does
not seem even to think of it!
It may be well that he can find nothing to put into his
7*
cup, should he fall into his old ways. One is never sure
of a man of such habits, until he is placed entirely out
of harm's way.
Gershom is such a different being when he has not
been drinking! rejoined the sister, in a touching manner.
We love him, and strive to do all we can to keep him
up, but it
is
hard.
I am surprised that
you
should have come into this
wilderness with any one of bad habits!
Why not? He is my brother, and I have no parents
he is all to me: and what would become of Dorothy if
I were to quit her, too! She has lost most of her friends,
since Gershom fell into these ways, and it would quite
break her heart, did I desert her.
All this speaks well for you, pretty Margery, but it is
not the less surprisingah, there is my canoe, in plain
sight of all who enter the river;
that
must be concealed,
Injins or no Injins.
It is only a step further to the place where we can get
a look-out. Just there, beneath the burr oak. Hours and
hours have I sat on that spot, with my sewing, while
Gershom
was gone into the openings.
And Dollywhere was she while you were here?
Poor Dolly!I do think she passed quite half her
time up at the beach tree, where you first saw her, looking
if brother was not coming home. It is a cruel thing to a
wife to have a truant husband!
Which I hope may never be your case, pretty
Margery
,
and which I think never
can
.
Margery did not answer: but the speech must have
been heard, uttered as it was in a much lower tone of
voice than the young man had hitherto used; for the
charming maiden looked down and blushed. Fortunately,
the two now soon arrived at the tree, and their
conversation
naturally reverted to the subject which had brought
them there. Three canoes were in sight, close in with
the land, but so distant as to render it for some time
doubtful which way they were moving. At first, the
bee-hunter
said that they were still going slowly to the
southward
;
but he habitually carried his little glass, and, on
levelling that, it was quite apparent that the savages were
paddling before the wind, and making for the mouth of
the river. This was a very grave fact; and, as Blossom
flew to communicate it to her brother and his wife, le
Bourdon moved towards his own canoe, and looked about
for a place of concealment.
Several considerations had to be borne in mind, in
disposing
of the canoes; for that of Gershom was to be
secreted
,
as well as that of the bee-hunter. A tall aquatic
plant, that is termed wild rice, and which we suppose to
be the ordinary rice-plant, unimproved by tillage, grows
spontaneously about the mouths and on the flats of most
of the rivers of the part of Michigan of which we are
writing; as, indeed, it is to be found in nearly all the
shallow
waters of those regions. There was a good deal of
this rice at hand; and the bee-hunter, paddling his own
canoe and towing the other, entered this vegetable thicket,
choosing a channel that had been formed by some
accident
of nature, and which wound through the herbage in
a way soon to conceal all that came within its limits.
These channels were not only numerous, but exceedingly
winding; and the bee-hunter had no sooner brought his
canoes to the firm ground and fastened them there, than
he ascended a tree, and studied the windings of these
narrow passages, until he had got a general idea of their
direction and characters. This precaution taken, he
hurried
back to the hut.
Well, Gershom, have you settled on the course to be
taken? were the first words uttered by the bee-hunter
when he rejoined the family of Whiskey Centre.
We haven't, answered the husband. Sister begs us
to quit the
chient
, for the Indians must soon be here; but
wife seems to think that she
must
be safe, now I'm at
home, ag'in.
Then wife is wrong, and sister is right. If you will
take my advice, you will hide all your effects in the woods,
and quit the cabin as soon as possible. The Injins cannot
fail to see this habitation, and will be certain to destory
all they find in it, and that they do not carry off. Besides,
the discovery of the least article belonging to a white
man will set them on our trail; for scalps will soon bear
a price at Montreal. In half an hour, all that is here can
be removed into the thicket that is luckily so near; and
by putting out the fire with care, and using proper caution,
we may give the place such a deserted look that the
savages will suspect nothing.
If they enter the river, Bourdon, they will not 'camp
out with a wigwam so near by; and should they come
here, what is to prevent their seein' the foot-prints we
shall leave behind us?
The night, and that only. Before morning their own
footsteps will be so plenty as to deceive them. Luckily
we all wear moccasins, which is a great advantage just
now. But every moment is precious, and we should be
stirring. Let the women take the beds and bedding,
while you and I shoulder this chest. Up it goes, and
away with it!
Gershom had got to be so much under his companion's
influence, that he complied, though his mind suggested
various objections to the course taken, to which his tongue
gave utterance as they busied themselves in this task.
The effects of Whiskey Centre had been gradually
diminishing
in quantity, as well as in value, for the last three
years, and were now of no great amount, in any sense.
Still, there were two chests, one large, and one small. The
last contained all that a generous regard for the growing
wants of the family had left to Margery; while the first
held the joint wardrobes of the husband and wife, with a
few other articles that were considered as valuable.
Among other things were half a dozen of very thin silver
tea-spoons, which had fallen to Gershom on a division of
the family plate. The other six were carefully wrapped
up in paper and put in the till of Margery's chest, being
her portion of this species of property. The Americans,
generally, have very little plate; though here and there
marked exceptions do exist; nor do the humbler classes
lay out much of their earnings in jewelry, while they
commonly dress far beyond their means in all other ways.
In this respect, the European female of the same class in
life frequently possesses as much in massive golden personal
ornaments as would make an humble little fortune, while
her attire is as homely as cumbrous petticoats, coarse cloth,
and a vile taste can render it. On the other hand, the
American matron that has not a setone half-dozenof
silver tea-spoons must be poor indeed, and can hardly be
said to belong to the order of housekeepers at all. By
means of a careful mother, both Gershom and his sister
had the half-dozen mentioned; and they were kept more
as sacred memorials of past and better days than as articles
of any use. The household goods of Waring would have
been limited by his means of transportation, if not by his
poverty. Two common low-post maple bedsteads were soon
uncorded and carried off, as were the beds and bedding.
There was scarcely any crockery, pewter and tin being its
substitutes; and as for chairs there was only one, and that
had rockers: a practice of New England that has gradually
diffused itself over the whole country, looking down
ridicule
,
the drilling of boarding-schools, the comments of
elderly ladies of the old school, the sneers of nurses, and,
in a word, all that venerable ideas of decorum could
suggest
,
until this appliance of domestic ease has not only
fairly planted itself in nearly every American dwelling, but
in a good many of Europe also!
It required about twenty minutes for the party to clear
the cabin of every article that might induce an Indian to
suspect the presence of white men. The furniture was
carried to a sufficient distance to be safe from everything
but a search; and care was had to avoid as much as
possible
making a trail, to lead the savages to the place selected
for the temporary store-room. This was merely a close
thicket, into which there was a narrow but practicable
entrance
on the side the least likely to be visited. When all
was accomplished the four went to the look-out to ascertain
how far the canoes had come. It was soon ascertained
that they were within a mile, driving down before a strong
breeze and following sea, and impelled by as many paddles
as there were living beings in them. Ten minutes would
certainly bring them up with the bar, and five more fairly
within the river. The question now arose, where the party
was to be concealed during the stay of the savages. Dolly,
as was perhaps natural to the housewife, wished to remain
by her worldly goods, and pretty Margery had a strong
feminine leaning to do the same. But neither of the men
approved of the plan. It was risking too much in one
spot; and a suggestion that the bee-hunter was not long
in making, prevailed.
It will be remembered that le Bourdon had carried the
canoes within the field of wild rice, and bestowed them
there with a good deal of attention to security. Now
these canoes offered, in many respects, better places of
temporary refuge under all the circumstances than any
other that could readily be found on shore. They were
dry; and by spreading skins, of which Boden had so many,
comfortable beds might be made for the females, which
would be easily protected from the night air and dews by
throwing a rug over the gunwales. Then, each canoe
contained many articles that would probably be wanted;
that of the bee-hunter in particular furnishing food in
abundance, as well as divers other things that would be
exceedingly useful to persous in their situation. The great
advantage of the canoes, however, in the mind of le
Bourdon
,
was the facilities they offered for flight. He hardly
hoped that Indian sagacity would be so far blinded as to
prevent the discovery of the many foosteps they must have
left in their hurried movements, and he anticipated that
with the return of day something would occur to render it
necessary for them to seek safety by a stealthy removal from
the spot. This might be done, he both hoped and believed,
under cover of the rice, should sufficient care be taken to
avoid exposure. In placing the canoes, he had used the
precaution to leave them where they could not be seen from
the cabin or its vicinity, or, indeed, from any spot in the
vicinity of the ground that the savages would be likely to
visit during their stay. All these reasons le Bourdon now
rapidly laid before his companions, and to the canoes the
whole party retired as fast as they could walk.
There was great judgment displayed on the part of the
bee-hunter in selecting the wild rice as a place of shelter.
At that season it was sufficiently grown to afford a complete
screen to everything within it that did not exceed the height
of a man, or which was not seen from some adjacent
elevation
.
Most of the land near the mouth of the river was
low, and the few spots which formed exceptions had been
borne in mind when the canoes were taken into the field.
But just as Gershom was on the point of putting a foot into
his own canoe, with a view to arrange it for the reception
of his wife, he drew back, and exclaimed after the manner
of one to whom a most important idea suddenly occurs
Land's sake! I've forgotten all about them barrels!
They'll fall into the hands of the savages, and an awful
time they'll make with them! Let me pass, Dolly; I must
look after the barrels this instant.
While the wife gently detained her eager husband, the
bee-hunter quietly asked to what barrels he alluded.
The whiskey casks, was the answer. There's two
on 'em in the shed behind the hut, and whiskey enough to
set a whole tribe in commotion. I wonder I should have
overlooked the whiskey!
It is a sign of great improvement, friend Waring, and
will lead to no bad consequences, returned le Bourdon,
coolly. I foresaw the danger, and rolled the casks down
the hill, where they were dashed to pieces in the brook,
and the liquor has long since been carried into the lake
in the shape of grog.
Waring seemed astounded; but was so completely
mystified
as not to suspect the truth. That his liquor should be
hopelessly lost was bad enough; but even that was better
than to have it drunk by savages without receiving any
returns
.
After groaning and lamenting over the loss for a
few minutes, he joined the rest of the party in making some
further dispositions, which le Bourdon deemed prudent, if
not necessary.
It had occurred to the bee-hunter to divide his own cargo
between the two canoes, which was the task that the whole
party was now engaged in. The object was to lighten his
own canoe in the event of flight, and, by placing his effects
in two parcels, give a chance to those in the boat which
might escape, of having wherewithal to comfort and
console
themselves. As soon as this new arrangement was
completed, le Bourdon ran up to a tree that offered the
desired
facilities, and springing into its branches, was soon
high enough to get a view of the bar and the mouth of the
river. By the parting light of day, he distinctly saw
four
canoes coming up the stream; which was one more than
those reported to him by Margery as having passed.
CHAPTER VI.
And long shall timorous fancy see,
The painted chief and pointed spear;
And reason's self shall bow the knee,
To shadows and delusions here.
Freneau
.
A BRIGHT moon reflected on the earth for about an hour
the light of the sun, as the latter luminary disappeared.
By its aid the bee-hunter, who still continued in the tree,
was enabled to watch the movements of the canoes of the
Indians, though the persons they contained soon got to be
so indistinct as to render it impossible to do more than
count their numbers. The last he made out to be five each
in three of the canoes, and six in the other, making
twenty-one
individuals in all. This was too great an odds to think
of resisting, in the event of the strangers turning out to be
hostile; and the knowledge of this disparity in force
admonished
all the fugitives of the necessity of being wary
and prudent.
The strangers landed just beneath the hut, or at the
precise
spot where Whiskey Centre was in the habit of keeping
his canoe, and whence Boden had removed it only an hour
or two before. The savages had probably selected the
place on account of its shores being clear of the wild rice,
and because the high ground near it promised both a
lookout
and comfortable lodgings. Several of the party strolled
upward, as if searching for an eligible spot to light their
fire, and one of them soon discovered the cabin. The
warrior announced his success by a whoop, and a dozen of
the Indians were shortly collected in and about the
chient
.
All this proved the prudence of the course taken by the
fugitives.
Blossom stood beneath the tree, and the bee-hunter told
her, as each incident occurred, all that passed among the
strangers, when the girl communicated the same to her
brother and his wife, who were quite near at hand in one
of the canoes. As there was no danger of being
over-heard
,
conversation in an ordinary tone passed between
the parties, two of whom at least were now fond of holding
this sort of communion.
Do they seem to suspect the neighbourhood of the
occupants
of the cabin? asked Margery, when the bee-hunter
had let her know the manner in which the savages had
taken possession of her late dwelling.
One cannot tell. Savages are always distrustful and
cautious when on a war-path; and these seem to be
scenting
about like so many hounds which are nosing for a trail.
They are now gathering sticks to light a fire, which is
better than burning the
chient
.
That
they will not be likely to do until they have no
further need of it. Tell me, Bourdon, do any go near the
thicket of alders where we have hidden our goods?
Not as yet; though there is a sudden movement and
many loud yells among them!
Heaven send that it may not be at having discovered
anything we have forgotten. The sight of even a lost
dipper or cup would set them blood-hounds on our path, as
sure as we are white and they are savages!
As I live, they scent the whiskey! There is a rush
towards, and a pow-wow in and about the shedyes, of a
certainty they smell the liquor! Some of it has escaped
in rolling down the hill, and their noses are too keen to
pass over a fragrance that to them equals that of roses.
Well, let them
scent
as they mayeven an Injin does not
get drunk through his
nose
.
You are quite right, Bourdon: but is not this a most
unhappy scent for us, since the smell of whiskey can hardly
be there without their seeing it did not grow in the woods
of itself, like an oak or a beech?
I understand you, Margery, and there is good sense in
what you say. They will never think the liquor grew
there, like a blackberry or a chestnut, though the place
is
called Whiskey Centre!
It is hard enough to know that a family has deserved
such a name, without being reminded of it by those that
call themselves friends, answered the girl pointedly, after
a pause of near a minute, though she spoke in sorrow
rather than in anger.
Vol. I.  8
In an instant the bee-hunter was at pretty Margery's
side, making his peace by zealous apologies and winning
protestations of respect and concern. The mortified girl
was soon appeased; and, after consulting together for a
minute, they went to the canoe to communicate to the
husband
and wife what they had seen.
The whiskey after all is likely to prove our worst
enemy, said the bee-hunter as he approached. It would
seem that in moving the barrels some of the liquor has
escaped, and the nose of an Injin is too quick for the odour
it leaves not to scent it.
Much good may it do them, growled Gershom
they've lost me that whiskey, and let them long for it
without gettin' any as a punishment for the same. My
fortun' would have been made could I only have got them
two barrels as far as Fort Dearborn before the troops
moved!
The
barrels
might have been got there, certainly,
answered
le Bourdon, so much provoked at the man's regrets
for the destroyer which had already come so near to
bringing
want and ruin on himself and family, as momentarily
to forget his recent scene with pretty Margery; but
whether anything would have been
in
them is another
question
.
One of those I rolled to the brow of the hill was
half empty as it was.
Gershom is so troubled with the ague, if he don't take
stimulants in this new country, put in the wife, in the
apologetic manner in which woman struggles to conceal
the failings of him she loves. As for the whiskey, I
don't grudge
that
in the least; for it's a poor way of
getting
rich to be selling it to soldiers, who want all the
reason
liquor has left 'em, and more too. Still, Gershom
needs bitters; and ought not to have every drop he has
taken thrown into his face.
By this time le Bourdon was again sensible of his
mistake
,
and he beat a retreat in the best manner he could,
secretly resolving not to place himself any more between
two fires, in consequence of further blunders on this
delicate
subject. He now found that it was a very different
thing to joke Whiskey Centre himself on the subject of
his great failing, from making even the most distant allusion
to it in the presence of those who felt for a husband's and
a brother's weakness, with a liveliness of feeling that brutal
indulgence had long since destroyed in the object of their
solicitude. He accordingly pointed out the risk there was
that the Indians should make the obvious inference, that
human beings must have recently been in the hut, to leave
the fresh scent of the liquor in question behind them. This
truth was so apparent that all felt its force, though to no
one else did the danger seem so great as to the bee-hunter.
He had greater familiarity with the Indian character than
any of his companions, and dreaded the sagacity of the
savages in a just proportion to his greater knowledge. He
did not fail, therefore, to admonish his new friends of the
necessity for vigilance.
I will return to the tree and take another look at the
movements of the savages, le Bourdon concluded by
saying
.
By this time their fire must be lighted; and by the
aid of my glass, a better insight may be had into their plans
and feelings.
The bee-hunter now went back to his tree, whither he
was slowly followed by Margery; the girl yielding to a
feverish desire to accompany him, at the very time she was
half restrained by maiden bushfulness; though anxiety and
the wish to learn the worst as speedily as possible prevailed.
They have kindled a blazing fire, and the whole of the
inside of the house is as bright as if illuminated, said le
Bourdon, who was now carefully bestowed among the
branches of his small tree. There are lots of the red
devils moving about the
chient
, inside and out; and they
seem to have fish as well as venison to cook. Ay, there
goes more dry brush on the fire to brighten up the picture,
and daylight is almost eclipsed. As I live, they have a
prisoner among 'em!
A prisoner! exclaimed Margery, in the gentle tones
of female pityNot a white person, surely?
Nohe is a red-skin like all of thembutwait a
minute till I can get the glass a little more steady. Yes
it is soI was right at first!
What is so, Bourdonand in what are you right?
You may remember, Blossom, that your brother and I
spoke of two Injins who visited me in the openings. One
was a Pottawattamie and the other a Chippewa. The first
we found dead and scalped, after he had left us; and the
last is now in yonder hut, bound and a prisoner. He has
taken to the lake on his way to Fort Dearborn, and has,
with all his craft and resolution, fallen into enemy's hands.
Well will it be for him if his captors do not learn what
befel the warrior who was slain near my cabin, and left
seated against a tree!
Do you think these savages mean to revenge the death
of their brother on this unfortunate wretch?
I know that he is in the pay of our general at Detroit,
while the Pottawattamies are in the pay of the English.
This of itself would make them enemies, and has no doubt
been the cause of his being taken; but I do not well see
how Injins on the lake here can know anything of what
has happened some fifty miles or so up in the openings.
Perhaps the savages in the canoes belong to the same
party as the warrior you call Elksfoot, and that they have
had the means of learning his death, and by whose hand
he fell.
The bee-hunter was surprised at the quickness of the
girl's wit, the suggestion being as discreet as it was
ingenious
.
The manner in which intelligence flies through the
wilderness had often surprised him, and certainly it was
possible that the party now before him might have heard
of the fate of the chief whose body he had found in the
openings, short as was the time for the news to have gone
so far. The circumstance that the canoes had come from
the northward was against the inference, however, and after
musing a minute on the facts, le Bourdon mentioned this
objection to his companion.
Are we certain these are the same canoes as those
which I saw pass this afternoon? asked Margery, who
comprehended the difficulty in an instant. Of those I
saw, two passed first, and one followed; while here are
four
that have landed.
What you say may be true enough. We are not to
suppose that the canoes you saw pass are all that are on
the lake. But let the savages be whom they may, prudence
tells us to keep clear of them if we can; and this more so
than ever, now I can see that Pigeonswing, who I know to
be an American Injin, is treated by them as an enemy.
How are the savages employed now, Bourdon? Do
they prepare to eat, or do they torture their prisoner?
No fear of their attempting the last to-night. There
is an uneasiness about them, as if they still smelt the liquor;
but some are busy cooking at the fire. I would give all
my honey, pretty Margery, to be able to save Pigeonswing!
He is a good fellow for a savage, and is heart and hand
with us in this new war, that he tells me has begun
between
us and the English!
You surely would not risk your own life to save a
savage
,
who kills and scalps at random, as this man has
done!
In that he has but followed the habits of his colour
and race. I dare say
we
do things that are quite as bad,
according to Injin ways of thinking. I
do
believe,
Margery
,
was that man to see
me
in the hands of the
Pottawattamies
,
as I now see
him
, he would undertake something
for my relief.
But what can you, a single man, do when there are
twenty against you? asked Margery, a little reproachfully
as to manner, speaking like one who had more interest in
the safety of the young bee-hunter than she chose very
openly to express.
No one can say what he can do till he tries. I do not
like the way they are treating that Chippewa, for it looks
as if they meant to do him harm. He is neither fed, nor
suffered to be with his masters; but there the poor fellow
is, bound hand and foot near the cabin door, and lashed to
a tree. They do not even give him the relief of suffering
him to sit down.
The gentle heart of Margery was touched by this account
of the manner in which the captive was treated, and she
inquired into other particulars concerning his situation,
with a more marked interest than she had previously
manifested
in his state. The bee-hunter answered her
questions
as they were put; and the result was to place the girl
in possession of a minute detail of the true manner in
which Pigeonswing was treated.
Although there was probably no intention on the part
8*
of the captors of the Chippewa to torture him before his
time, tortured he must have been by the manner in which
his limbs and body were confined. Not only were his
arms fastened behind his back at the elbows, but the hands
were also tightly bound together in front. The legs had
ligatures in two places, just above the knees and just below
the ancles. Around the body was another fastening, which
secured the captive to a beech that stood about thirty feet
from the door of the cabin, and so nearly in a line with the
fire within and the look-out of le Bourdon, as to enable the
last distinctly to note these particulars, aided as he was by
his glass. Relying on the manner in which they had
secured
their prisoner, the savages took little heed of him;
but each appeared bent on attending to his own comfort,
by means of a good supper, and by securing a dry lair in
which to pass the night. All this le Bourdon saw and
noted too, ere he dropped lightly on his feet by the side of
Margery, at the root of the tree.
Without losing time that was precious, the bee-hunter
went at once to the canoes and communicated his intention
to Waring. The moon had now set, and the night was
favourable to the purposes of le Bourdon. At the first
glance it might seem wisest to wait until sleep had fallen
upon the savages, ere any attempt were made to approach
the hut; but Boden reasoned differently. A general silence
would succeed as soon as the savages disposed of themselves
to sleep, which would be much more likely to allow his
footsteps to be overheard, than when tongues and bodies
and teeth were all in active movement. A man who eats
after a long march, or a severe paddling, usually
concentrates
his attention on his food, as le Bourdon knew by
long experience; and it is a much better moment to steal
upon the hungry and weary, to do so when they feed, than
to do so when they sleep, provided anything like a watch
be kept. That the Pottawattamies would neglect this latter
caution le Bourdon did not believe; and his mind was
made up, not only to attempt the rescue of his Chippewa
friend, but to attempt it at once.
After explaining his plan in a few words, and requesting
Waring's assistance, le Bourdon took a solemn leave of the
party, and proceeded at once towards the hut. In order
to understand the movements of the bee-hunter, it may be
well now briefly to explain the position of the
chient
, and
the nature of the ground on which the adventurer was
required
to act. The hut stood on a low and somewhat
abrupt
swell, being surrounded on all sides by land so low, as
to be in many places wet and swampy. There were a good
many trees on the knoll, and several thickets of alders and
other bushes on the lower ground; but, on the whole, the
swamps were nearly devoid of what is termed timber.
Two sides of the knoll were abrupt; that on which the
casks had been rolled into the lake, and that opposite,
which was next to the tree whence Boden had so long been
watching the proceedings of the savages. The distance
between the hut and this tree was somewhat less than a
mile. The intervening ground was low, and most of it
was marshy; though it was possible to cross the marsh by
following a particular course. Fortunately this course,
which was visible to the eye by daylight, and had been taken
by the fugitives on quitting the hut, might be dimly traced
at night by one who understood the ground, by means of
certain trees and bushes, that formed so many finger-posts
for the traveller. Unless this particular route were taken,
however, a circuit of three or four miles must be made, in
order to pass from the
chient
to the spot where the family
had taken refuge. As le Bourdon had crossed this firm
ground by daylight, and had observed it well from his tree,
he thought himself enough of a guide to find his way
through it in the dark, aided by the marks just mentioned.
The bee-hunter had got as far as the edge of the marsh
on his way towards the hut, when pausing an instant to
examine the priming of his rifle, he fancied that he heard
a light footstep behind him. Turning, quick as thought,
he perceived that pretty Margery had followed him thus
far. Although time pressed, he could not part from the
girl without showing that he appreciated the interest she
manifested in his behalf. Taking her hand, therefore, he
spoke with a simplicity and truth, that imparted to his
manner a natural grace that one bred in courts might have
envied. What was more, with a delicacy that few in courts
would deem necessary under the circumstances, he did not
in his language so much impute to concern on his own
account this movement of Margery's, as to that she felt for
her brother and sister; though in his inmost heart a
throbbing
hope prevailed that he had his share in it.
Do not be troubled on account of Gershom and his
wife, pretty Margery, said the bee-hunter, which, as I
perceive, is the main reason why you have come here; and
as for myself, be certain that I shall not forget who I have
left behind, and how much her safety depends on my
prudence
.
Margery was pleased, though a good deal confused. It
was new to her to hear allusions of this sort, but nature
supplied the feeling to appreciate them.
Is it not risking too much, Bourdon? she said. Are
you sure of being able to find the crossing in the marsh,
in a night so very dark? I do not know but looking so
long at the bright light in the cabin may blind me, but it
does
seem as if I never saw a darker night!
The darkness increases, for the star-light is gone; but
I can see where I go, and so long as I can do that there is
not much fear of losing my way. I do not like to expose
you to danger, but
Never mind me, Bourdonset me to do anything in
which you think I can be of use! exclaimed the girl,
eagerly.
Well then, Margery, you may do this: Come with me
to the large tree in the centre of the marsh, and I will set
you on a duty that may possibly save my life. I will tell
you my meaning when there.
Margery followed with a light, impatient step; and, as
neither stopped to speak or to look around, the two soon
stood beneath the tree in question. It was a large elm that
completely overshadowed a considerable extent of firm
ground. Here a full and tolerably near view could be
had of the hut, which was still illuminated by the blazing
fire within. For a minute both stood silently gazing at the
strange scene; then le Bourdon explained to his companion
the manner in which she might assist him.
Once at the elm, it was not so difficult to find the way
across the marsh, as it was to reach that spot, coming
from
the
chient
. As there were several elms scattered about in
the centre of the marsh, the bee-hunter was fearful that he
might not reach the right tree; in which case he would be
compelled to retrace his steps, and that at the imminent
hazard of being captured. He carried habitually a small
dark lantern, and had thought of so disposing of it in the
lower branches of this very elm, as to form a focus of it,
but hesitated about doing that which might prove a guide
to his enemies as well as to himself. If Margery would
take charge of this lantern, he could hope to reap its
advantages
without incurring the hazard of having a light
suspended in the tree for any length of time. Margery
understood the lessons she received, and promised to obey
all the injunctions by which they were accompanied.
Now, God bless you, Margery, added the bee-hunter.
Providence has brought me and your brother's family
together
in troublesome times; should I get back safe from
this adventure, I shall look upon it as a duty to do all I can
to help Gershom place his wife and sister beyond the reach
of harm.
God bless you, Bourdon! half whispered the agitated
girl. I know it is worth some risk to save a human life,
even though it be that of an Injin, and I will not try to
persuade you from this undertaking; but do not attempt
more than is necessary, and rely on my using the lantern
just as you have told me to use it.
Those young persons had not yet known each other a
single day, yet both felt that confidence which years alone,
in the crowds of the world, can ordinarily create in the
human mind. The cause of the sympathy which draws
heart to heart, which generates friendships, and love, and
passionate attachments, is not obvious to all who choose to
talk of it. There is yet a profound mystery in our
organization
,
which has hitherto escaped the researches of both
classes of philosophers, and which it probably was the
design
of the Creator should not be made known to us until
we draw nearer to that great end which, sooner or later, is
to be accomplished in behalf of our race, when
knowledge
will abound, and we shall better understand our
being and its objects than is permitted to us in this our
day of ignorance. But while we cannot trace the causes
of a thousand things, we know and feel their effects.
Among the other mysteries of our nature is this of sudden
and strong sympathies, which, as between men for men, and
women for women, awaken confidence and friendship; and
as between those of different sexes, excite passionate
attachments
that more or less colour their future lives. The
great delineator of our common nature, in no one of the
many admirable pictures he has drawn of men, manifests
a more profound knowledge of his subject, than in that in
which he pourtrays the sudden and nearly ungovernable
inclination which Romeo and Juliet are made to display
for each other; an inclination that sets reason, habit,
prejudice
,
and family enmities, at defiance. That such an
attachment
is to be commended, we do not say; that all can
feel it, we do not believe; that connections formed under its
influence can always be desirable, we are far from thinking:
but that it may exist we believe is just as certain as any
of the incomprehensible laws of our wayward and yet
admirable
nature. We have no Veronese tale to relate here,
however, but simply a homely legend, in which human
feeling
may occasionally be made to bear an humble
resemblance
to that world-renowned picture which had its scenes
in the beautiful capital of Venetian Lombardy.
When le Bourdon left his companion, now so intensely
interested in his success, to pick his way in the darkness
across the remainder of the marsh, Margery retired behind
the tree, where the first thing she did was to examine her
lantern, and to see that its light was ready to perform the
very important office which might so speedily be required
of it. Satisfied on this point, she turned her eyes anxiously
in the direction of the hut. By this time every trace of
the bee-hunter was lost, the hillock in his front forming too
dark a back-ground to admit of his being seen. But the
fire still blazed in the
chient
, the savages not having yet
finished their cooking, though several had satisfied their
appetites, and had already sought places where they might
stretch themselves for the night. Margery was glad to see
that these last individuals bestowed themselves within the
influence of the fire, warm as was the night. This was
done most probably to escape from the annoyance of the
musquitoes, more or less of which are usually found in the
low lands of the new countries, and near the margins of
rivers.
Margery could distinctly see the Chippewa, erect and
bound to his tree. On him she principally kept her looks
riveted, for near his person did she expect first again to
find the bee-hunter. Indeed, there was no chance of seeing
one who was placed beneath the light of the fire, since the
brow of the acclivity formed a complete cover, throwing
all below it into deep shade. This circumstance was of
the greatest importance to the adventurer, however,
enabling
him to steal quite near to his friend, favoured by a
darkness that was getting to be intense. Quitting Margery,
we will now rejoin le Bourdon, who by this time was
approaching
his goal.
The bee-hunter had some difficulty in finding his way
across the marsh; but floundering through the impediments,
and on the whole preserving the main direction, he got out
on the firm ground quite as soon as he had expected to
do. It was necessary for him to use extreme caution.
The Indians according to their custom had dogs, two of
which had been in sight, lying about half-way between the
prisoner and the door of the hut. Boden had seen a savage
feeding these dogs; and it appeared to him at the time as
if the Indian had been telling them to be watchful of the
Chippewa. He well knew the services that the red men
expected of these animals, which are kept rather as
sentinels
than for any great use they put them to in the hunts.
An Indian dog is quick enough to give the alarm, and he
will keep on a trail for a long run and with considerable
accuracy, but it is seldom that he closes and has his share
in the death, unless in the case of very timid and powerless
creatures.
Nevertheless, the presence of these dogs exacted extra
caution in the movements of the bee-hunter. He had
ascended the hill a little out of the stream of light which
still issued from the open door of the hut, and was soon
high enough to get a good look at the state of things on
the bit of level land around the cabin. Fully one-half of
the savages were yet up and in motion; though the
processes
of cooking and eating were by this time nearly
ended. These men had senses almost as acute as those of
their dogs, and it was very necessary to be on his guard
against them also. By moving with the utmost caution, le
Bourdon reached the edge of the line of light, where he
was within ten yards of the captive. Here he placed his
rifle against a small tree, and drew his knife, in readiness
to cut the prisoner's thongs. Three several times, while
the bee-hunter was making these preparations, did the two
dogs raise their heads and scent the air; once, the oldest
of the two gave a deep and most ominous growl. Singular
as it may seem, this last indication of giving the alarm was
of great service to le Bourdon and the Chippewa. The
latter heard the growl, and saw two of the movements of
the animals' heads, from all which he inferred that there
was some creature, or some danger behind him. This
naturally
enough induced him to bestow a keen attention in
that direction, and being unable to turn body, limbs, or
head, the sense of hearing was his only means of
watchfulness
.
It was while in this state of profound listening that
Pigeonswing fancied he heard his own name, in such a
whisper as one raises when he wishes to call from a short
distance with the least possible expenditure of voice.
Presently
the words Pigeonswing, and Chippewa, were
succeeded by those of bee-hunter, Bourdon. This
was enough: the quick-witted warrior made a low
ejaculation
,
such as might be mistaken for a half-suppressed
murmur that proceeded from pain, but which one keenly
on the watch, and who was striving to communicate with
him, would be apt to understand as a sign of attention.
The whispering then ceased altogether, and the prisoner
waited the result with the stoic patience of an American
Indian. A minute later the Chippewa felt the thongs giving
way, and his arms were released at the elbows. An arm
was next passed round his body, and the fastenings at the
wrist were cut. At this instant a voice whispered in his
earBe of good heart, Chippewayour friend, Bourdon,
is here. Can you stand?
No stand, answered the Indian in a low whispertoo much tie.
At the next moment the feet of the Chippewa were
released
,
as were also his knees. Of all the fastenings none
now remained but that which bound the captive to the tree.
In not cutting this, the bee-hunter manifested his coolness
and judgment; for were the stout rope of bark severed,
the Indian would have fallen like a log, from total inability
to stand. His thongs had impeded the circulation of the
blood, and the usual temporary paralysis had been the
consequence. Pigeonswing understood the reason of his
friend's forbearance, and managed to rub his hands and
wrists together, while the bee-hunter himself applied
friction
to his feet, by passing his own arms around the bottom
of the tree. The reader may imagine the intense anxiety
of Margery the while; for she witnessed the arrival of le
Bourdon at the tree, and could not account for the long
delay which succeeded.
All this time, the dogs were far from being quiet or
satisfied
.
Their masters, accustomed to being surrounded
at night by wolves and foxes, or other beasts, took little
heed, however, of the discontent of these creatures, which
were in the habit of growling in their lairs. The
bee-hunter
,
as he kept rubbing at his friend's legs, felt now but
litle apprehension of the dogs, though a new source of
alarm presented itself by the time the Chippewa was barely
able to sustain his weight on his feet, and long before he
could use them with anything like his former agility. The
manner in which the savages came together in the hut, and
the gestures made by their chief, announced pretty plainly
that a watch was about to be set for the night. As it was
probable that the sentinel would take his station near the
prisoner, the bee-hunter was at a loss to decide whether it
were better to commence the flight before or after the rest
of the savages were in their lairs. Placing his mouth as
close to the ear of Pigeonswing as could be done without
bringing his head into the light, the following dialogue
passed between le Bourdon and the captive.
Do you see, Chippewa, the bee-hunter commenced,
the chief is telling one of his young men to come and
keep guard near you?
See him, well 'nough. Make too many sign, no to
see.
What think you  shall we wait till the warriors are
asleep, or try to be off before the sentinel comes?
Bess wait, if one t'ing. You got riflegot tomahawk
got knife, eh?
Vol. I.  9
I have them all, though my rifle is a short distance
behind
me, and a little down the hill.
Dat badnebber let go rifle on war-path. Well
you
tomahawk him
I
scalp himdat 'll do.
I shall kill no man, Chippewa, unless there is great
occasion for it. If there is no other mode of getting you
off, I shall choose to cut this last thong, and leave you to
take care of yourself.'
Give him tomahawk, dengive him knife, too.
Not for such a purpose. I do not like to shed blood
without a good reason for it.
No call war good reason, eh? Bess reason in world.
Pottawattamie dig up hatchet ag'in Great Fadder at
Wash'ton
dat
no good reason why take his scalp, eh?
In whispering these last words the Chippewa used so
much energy, that the dogs again raised their heads from
between their fore paws and growled. Almost at that
instant
the chief and his few remaining wakeful companions
laid themselves down to sleep, and the young warrior
designated
as the sentinel left the hut and came slowly towards
the prisoner. The circumstances admitted of no delay;
le Bourdon pressed the keen edge of his knife across the
withe that bound the Indian to the tree; first giving him
notice, in order that he might be prepared to sustain his
own weight. This done, the bee-hunter dropped on the
ground, crawling away out of the light; though the brow
of the hill almost immediately formed a screen to conceal
his person from all near the hut. In another instant he
had regained his rifle, and was descending swiftly towards
the crossing at the marsh.
CHAPTER VII.
We call them savageOh, be just!
Their outraged feelings scan;
A voice comes forth, 't is from the dust
The savage was a man!
Sprague
.
As soon as le Bourdon reached the commencement of
that which might be called his path across the marsh, he
stopped and looked backward. He was now sufficiently
removed from the low acclivity to see objects on its summit,
and had no difficulty in discerning all that the waning
fire illuminated. There stood the Chippewa erect against
the tree as if still bound with thongs, while the sentinel
was slowly approaching him. The dogs were on their feet,
and gave two or three sharp barks, which had the effect to
cause five or six of the savages to lift their heads in their
lairs. One arose even and threw an armful of dried
branches on the fire, producing a bright blaze, that brought
everything around the hut, and which the light could touch,
into full view.
The bee-hunter was astonished at the immovable
calmness
with which Pigeonswing still stood to his tree,
awaiting
the approach of the sentinel. In a few moments the
latter was at his side. At first the Pottawattamie did not
perceive that the prisoner was unbound. He threw him
into shadow by his own person, and it required a close
look to note the circumstance. Boden was too far from
the spot to see all the minor movements of the parties, but
there was soon a struggle that could not be mistaken. As
the Pottawattamie was examining the prisoner, an
exclamation
that escaped him betrayed the sudden consciousness
that the Chippewa was unbound. The sound was no sooner
uttered than Pigeonswing made a grasp at the sentinel's
knife, which however he did not obtain, when the two closed
and fell, rolling down the declivity into the darkness. When
the Pottawattamie seized the Chippewa, he uttered a yell,
which instantly brought every man of his party to his feet.
As the savages now united in the whoops, and the dogs
began to bark wildly, an infernal clamour was made.
At first, le Bourdon did not know how to act. He greatly
feared the dogs, and could not but think of Margery, and
the probable consequences, should those sagacious animals
follow him across the marsh. But he did not like the idea
of abandoning Pigeonswing, when a single blow of his arm,
or a kick of his foot, might be the cause of his escape.
While deliberating in painful uncertainty, the sounds of the
struggle ceased, and he saw the sentinel rising again into
the light, limping like one who had suffered by a fall.
Presently
he heard a footstep near him, and, calling in a low
voice, he was immediately joined by Pigeonswing. Before
the bee-hunter was aware of his intention, the Chippewa
seized his rifle, and levelling it at the sentinel, who still
stood on the brow of the hill, drawn in all his savage
outlines
distinctly in the light of the flames, he fired. The cry,
the leap into the air, and the fall, announced the unerring
character of the aim. In coming to the earth, the wounded
man fell over the brow of the sharp acclivity, and was heard
rolling towards its base.
Le Bourdon felt the importance of now improving the
precious moments, and was in the act of urging his
companion
to follow, when the latter passed an arm around his
body, whipped his knife from the girdle and sheath, and
dropping the rifle into his friend's arms, bounded away in
the darkness, taking the direction of his fallen enemy.
There was no mistaking all this; the Chippewa, led by his
own peculiar sense of honour, risking everything to obtain
the usual trophy of victory. By this time, a dozen of the
savages stood on the brow of the hill, seemingly at a loss
to understand what had become of the combatants.
Perceiving
this, the bee-hunter profited by the delay and
reloaded
his rifle. As everything passed almost as swiftly as
the electric spark is known to travel, it was but a moment
after the Pottawattamie fell ere his conqueror was through
with his bloody task. Just as le Bourdon threw his rifle
up into the hollow of his arm, he was rejoined by his red
friend, who bore the reeking scalp of the sentinel at his
belt; though fortunately the bee-hunter did not see it on
account of the obscurity, else might he not have been so
willing to continue to act with so ruthless an ally.
Further stay was out of the question; for the Indians were now collected in a body on the brow of the hill,
where the chief was rapidly issuing his orders. In a
minute
the band dispersed, every man bounding into the
darkness
,
as if aware of the danger of remaining within the
influence of the bright light thrown from the fire. Then
came such a clamour from the dogs, as left no doubt in the
mind of the bee-hunter that they had scented and found
the remains of the fallen man. A fierce yell came from
the same spot, the proof that some of the savages had
already
discovered the body; and le Bourdon told his
companion
to follow, taking his way across the marsh as fast
as he could overcome the difficulties of the path.
It has already been intimated that it was not easy, if
indeed
it were possible, to cross that piece of low wet land
in a direct line. There was tolerably firm ground on it,
but it lay in an irregular form, its presence being generally
to be noted by the growth of trees. Le Bourdon had been
very careful in taking his land-marks, foreseeing the
probability
of a hasty retreat, and he had no difficulty for
some time in keeping in the right direction. But the dogs
soon left the dead body, and came bounding across the
marsh, disregarding its difficulties; though their plunges
and yells soon made it apparent that even they did not
escape altogether with dry feet. As for the savages, they
poured down the declivity in a stream, taking the dogs as
their guides; and safe ones they might well be accounted,
so far as the
scent
was concerned, though they did not
happen to be particularly well acquainted with all the
difficulties
of the path.
At length le Bourdon paused, causing his companion to
stop also. In the hurry and confusion of the flight, the
former had lost his land-marks, finding himself amidst a
copse of small trees, or large bushes, but not in the
particular
copse he sought. Every effort to get out of this
thicket, except by the way he had entered it, proved
abortive
,
and the dogs were barking at no great distance in his
rear. It is true that these animals no longer approached;
for they were floundering in the mud and water; but
9*
their throats answered every purpose to lead the pursuers
on, and the low calls that passed from mouth to mouth, let
the pursued understand that the Pottawattamies were at
their heels, if not absolutely on their trail.
The crisis demanded both discretion and decision;
qualities
in which the bee-hunter, with his forest training, was
not likely to be deficient. He looked out for the path by
which he had reached the unfortunate thicket, and having
found it, commenced a retreat by the way he had come.
Nerve was needed to move almost in a line towards the
dogs and their masters; but the nerve was forthcoming,
and the two advanced like veterans expecting the fire of
some concealed but well-armed battery. Presently, le
Bourdon stopped, and examined the ground on which he
stood.
Here
we must turn, Chippewa, he said, in a guarded
voice. This is the spot where I must have missed my
way.
Good place to turn 'bout, answered the Indiandog
too near.
We must shoot the dogs if they press us too hard,
returned the bee-hunter, leading off rapidly, now secure in
the right direction. They seem to be in trouble, just at
this time; but animals like them will soon find their way
across this marsh.
Bess shoot Pottawattamie, coolly returned
Pigeonswing
.
Pottawattamie got capital scalp  dog's ears no
good for nuttin', any more.
Yonder, I believe, is the tree I am in search of!
exclaimed
le Bourdon. If we can reach that tree, I think
all will go well with us.
The tree was reached, and the bee-hunter proceeded to
make sure of his course from that point. Removing from
his pouch a small piece of moistened powder that he had
prepared ere he liberated the Chippewa, he stuck it on a
low branch of the tree he was under, and on the side next
the spot where he had stationed Margery. When this was
done, he made his companion stand aside, and lighting
some spunk with his flint and steel, he fired his powder.
Of course, this little preparation burned like the fire-works
of a boy, making sufficient light, however, to be seen in a
dark night for a mile or more. No sooner was the wetted
powder hissing and throwing off its sparks, than the
bee-hunter
gazed intently into the now seemingly tangible
obscurity
of the marsh. A bright light appeared and
vanished
.
It was enough; the bee-hunter threw down his
own signal and extinguished it with his foot; and, as he
wished, the lantern of Margery appeared no more.
Assured
now of the accuracy of his position, as well as of
the course he was to pursue, le Bourdon bade his
companion
follow, and pressed anew across the marsh. A tree
was soon visible, and towards that particular object the
fugitives steadily pressed, until it was reached. At the
next instant Margery was joined; and the bee-hunter could
not refrain from kissing her, in the excess of his pleasure.
There is a dreadful howling of dogs, said
Margery
,
feeling no offence at the liberty taken, in a moment
like that, and it seems to me that a whole tribe is
following
at their heels. For Heaven's sake, Bourdon, let us
hasten to the canoes; brother and sister must think us
lost!
The circumstances pressed, and the bee-hunter took
Margery's arm, passing it through one of his own, with a
decided and protecting manner, that caused the girl's heart
to beat with emotions not in the least connected with fear,
leaving an impression of pleasure even at that perilous
moment
.
As the distance was not great, the three were soon
on the beach and near to the canoes. Here they met
Dorothy
,
alone, and pacing to and fro like a person distressed.
She had doubtless heard the clamour, and was aware that
the savages were out looking for their party. As Margery
met her sister, she saw that something more than common
had gone wrong, and in the eagerness of her apprehensions
she did not scruple about putting her questions.
What has become of brother?Where is Gershom?
demanded the sensitive girl, at once.
The answer was given in a low voice, and in that sort
of manner with which woman struggles to the last to
conceal
the delinquencies of him she loves.
Gershom is not himself, just now, half whispered the
wifehe has fallen into one of his old ways, ag'in.
Old ways! slowly repeated the sister, dropping her
own voice to tones similar to those in which the unpleasant
news had just been communicated. How is that possible,
now that all the whiskey is emptied?
It seems that Bourdon had a jug of brandy among his
stores, and Gershom found it out. I blame no one; for
Bourdon, who never abuses the gifts of Providence, had a
right to his comforts at least; but it
is
a pity that there was
anything of the sort in the canoes!
The bee-hunter was greatly concerned at this unwelcome
intelligence, feeling all its importance far more vividly than
either of his companions. They regretted as women; but
he foresaw the danger, as a man accustomed to exertion in
trying scenes. If Whiskey Centre had really fallen into
his old ways, so as to render himself an incumbrance,
instead
of being an assistant at such a moment, the fact was
to be deplored, but it could only be remedied by time.
Luckily they had the Indian with them, and he could
manage
one of the canoes, while he himself took charge of
the other. As no time was to be lost, the barking of the
dogs and the cries of the savages too plainly letting it be
known that the enemy was getting through the marsh by
some means or other, he hurried the party down to the
canoes
,
entering that of Whiskey Centre at once.
Le Bourdon found Gershom asleep, but with the heavy
slumbers of the drunkard. Dolly had removed the jug
and concealed it, as soon as the state of her husband
enabled
her to do so, without incurring his violence. Else
might the unfortunate man have destroyed himself, by
indulging
in a liquor so much more palatable than that he
was accustomed to use, after so long and compelled an
abstinence
.
The jug was now produced, however, and le
Bourdon emptied it in the river, to the great joy of the two
females, though not without a sharp remonstrance from the
Chippewa. The bee-hunter was steady, and the last drop
of the liquor of Gascony was soon mingling with the waters
of the Kalamazoo. This done, the bee-hunter desired the
women to embark, and called to the Chippewa to do the
same. By quitting the spot in the canoes, it was evident
their pursuers would be balked, temporarily at least, since
they must recross the marsh in order to get into their own
boats, without which further pursuit would be fruitless.
It might have been by means of a secret sympathy, or it
was possibly the result of accident, but, certain it is, that
the Chippewa was placed in the stern of Gershom's canoe,
while Margery found a place in that of le Bourdon. As
for Whiskey Centre, he lay like a log in the bottom of his
own light bark, cared for only by his affectionate wife, who
had made a pillow for his bead; but, fortunately, if no
assistance
just then, not any material hindrance to the
movements
of his friends. By the time le Bourdon and the
Chippewa had got their stations, and the canoes were free
of the bottom, it was evident by the sounds, that not only
the dogs, but divers of their masters, had floundered
through the swamp, and were already on the firm ground
east of it. As the dogs ran by scent, little doubt remained
of their soon leading the savages down to the place of
embarkation
.
Aware of this, the bee-hunter directed the
Chippewa to follow, and urged his own canoe away from
the shore, following one of three of the natural channels
that united just at that point.
The clamour now sensibly increased, and the approach
of the pursuers was much faster than it had previously
been, in consequence of there no longer being wet land
beneath their feet. At the distance of fifty yards from the
shore, however, the channel, or open avenue among the
rice plants, that the canoes had taken, made a short turn
to the northward; for all the events we have just been
recording
occurred on the northern, or leeward side of the
river. Once around this bend in the channel, the canoes
would have been effectually concealed from those on the
beach, had it even been broad daylight, and, of course,
were so much more hidden from view under the obscurity
of a very dark night. Perceiving this, and fearful that the
dip of the paddles might be heard, le Bourdon ceased to
urge his canoe through the water, telling the Chippewa to
imitate his example, and let the boats drift. In consequence
of this precaution the fugitives were still quite near the
shore when, first, the dogs, and then a party of their masters,
came rushing down to the very spot whence the canoes
had departed, scarcely two minutes before. As no
precautions
were taken to conceal the advance of the pursuers,
the pursued, or the individuals among them who alone
understood
the common language of the Great Ojebway
Nation
well, had an opportunity of hearing and understanding
all that was said. Le Bourdon had brought the two canoes
together; and the Chippewa, at his request, now translated
such parts of the discourse of their enemies as he deemed
worthy of communicating to the females.
Say, now, nobody dere! commenced the Indian,
coolly  T'ink he no great way off  mean to look for
himt'ink dog uneasywon'er why dog so uneasy.
Them dogs are very likely to scent us here in the
canoes
,
we are so near them, whispered le Bourdon.
S'pose he do, can't catch us, coolly answered the
Chippewabeside, shoot him, don't take carebad for
dog to chase warrior too much.
There is one speaking now, who seems to have
authority
.
Yeshe chiefknow he voicehear him too often
he mean to put Pigeonswing to torture. Well, let him
catch Pigeonswing fustswift bird do dat, eh?
But what says he?  it may be of importance to learn
what the chief says, just now.
Who care what he
say
can't
do
nuttin'if get good
chance, take
his
scalp, too.
Ay, that I dare saybut he is speaking earnestly, and
in a low voice; listen, and let us know what he says. I do
not well understand at this distance.
The Chippewa complied, and maintained an attentive
silence until the chief ceased to speak. Then he rendered
what had been said into such English as he could
command
,
accompanying the translation by the explanations
that naturally suggested themselves to one like himself.
Chief talk to young men, said the Chippewaall
chief talk to young mentell him dat Pigeonswing muss
get off in canoedon't see canoe, nudderbut, muss be
canoe, else he swim. T'ink more dan one Injin here
don't know, doughmaybe, maybe notcan't tell, till see
trail, morrow mornin'
Well, well: but what does he tell his young men to
do?
demanded the bee-hunter, impatiently.
Don't be squaw, Bourdontell all by'em bye. Tell
young men s'pose he get canoe, den he may get
our
canoe,
and carry 'em off  s'pose he swim; dat Chippewa devil
swim down stream and get
our
canoe dat fashionbess go
back, some of you, and see arter
our
canoedat what he
tell young men most.
That is a lucky thought! exclaimed le Bourdon
let us paddle down, at once, and seize all their canoes
before they can get there. The distance by water, owing
to this bend in the river, is not half as great as that by
land, and the marsh will double the distance to them.
Dat good council! said Pigeonswingyou goI
follow.
This was no sooner said, than the canoes were again
got in motion. The darkness might now have been a
sufficient
protection had there been no rice, but the plant
would have concealed the movement, even at noon-day.
The fire in the hut served as a beacon, and enabled le
Bourdon to find the canoes. When he reached the landing,
he could still hear the dogs barking on the marsh, and the
voices of those with them, calling in loud tones to two of
the savages who had remained at the
chient
, as a sort of
camp-guard.
What do them chaps say? asked le Bourdon of the
Chippewa. They yell as if striving to make the two men
at the door of the hut hear them. Can you make out what
they are bawling so loud?
Tell two warrior to come down and take care of canoe
dat alllet 'em comefind two here take care of
dem
got good scalp, dem two rascal Pottawattamie!
NonoPigeonswingwe must have no more of that
work to-night, but must set about towing these four canoes
off the shore as fast as we can. Have you got hitches on
your two?
Fast 'noughso fast, he follow, answered the Indian,
who, notwithstanding his preparations to help to remove the
canoes, was manifestly reluctant to depart without striking
another blow at his enemies. Now good time for dem
rascal to lose scalp!
Them rascals, as you call them, begin to understand
their friends in the marsh, and are looking to the priming
of their rifles. We must be moving, or they may see us,
and give us a shot. Shove off, Chippewa, and paddle at
once for the middle of the bay.
As le Bourdon was much in earnest, Pigeonswing was
fain to comply. Had the last possessed a rifle of his own,
or even a knife, it is highly probable he would have leaped
ashore, and found the means of stealing on some one of
his enemies unawares, and thus secured another trophy.
But the bee-hunter was determined, and the Chippewa,
however reluctant, was compelled to obey; for not only
had le Bourdon kept his rifle at his side, but he had used
the precaution of securing his knife and tomahawk, both
of which he carried habitually, the same as a red man.
The canoes had now a somewhat difficult task. The
wind still blew fresh, and it was necessary for one of these
light craft, pretty well loaded with its proper freight, and
paddled by only a single person, to tow two other craft of
equal size dead to windward. The weight in the towing
craft, and the lightness of those that were towed, rendered
this task, however, easier than it might otherwise have
proved. In the course of a couple of minutes all the
canoes
were far enough from the shore to be out of sight of
the two Indians, who, by that time, had got down to the
beach to look after their own craft. The yell these savages
raised on finding themselves too late, not only announced
their disappointment, but communicated the extent of the
disaster to their friends, who were still floundering through
the marsh.
The great advantage that the party of the bee-hunter
had now obtained must be very apparent to all. In
possession
of
all
the canoes, their enemies were, or would be
for some time at least, confined to the northern side of the
river, which was so wide near its mouth as to present an
effectual barrier between them and those who occupied the
opposite bank. The canoes, also, enabled the weaker
party to change their position at will, carrying with them
as many of their effects as were on board, and which
included
the whole of the property of le Bourdon; while
their loss deprived their enemies of all extra means of
motion
,
and would be very likely to induce them to proceed
on their expedition by land. The objects of that
expedition
could only be conjectured by the bee-hunter, until he
had questioned the Chippewa; a thing he did not fail to
do, as soon as he believed the party quite safe, under the
south shore. Here the fugitives landed, proceeding up a
natural channel in the wild rice in order to do so, and
selecting
a bit of dry beach for their purpose. Margery set
about lighting a fire, in order to keep the musquitoes at a
distance, selecting a spot to kindle it, behind a swell of the
land, that concealed the light from all on the other shore.
In the morning, it would be necessary to extinguish that
fire, lest its smoke should betray their position. It was
while these things were in progress, and after le Bourdon
had himself procured the fuel necessary to feed pretty
Margery's fire, that he questioned the Chippewa touching
his captivity.
Yes, tell all 'bout him, answered the Indian, as soon
as interrogated  no good to hide trail from friend.
'Member when say good bye up in openin' to Bourdon?
CertainlyI remember the very instant when you left
me. The Pottawattamie went on one path, and you went
on another. I was glad of that, as you seemed to think
he was not your friend.
Yes; good not to travel on same path as inimy, 'cause
he quarrel sometime, coolly returned the Indian. Dis
time, path come togedder, somehow; and Pottawattamie
los he scalp.
I am aware of all that, Pigeonswing, and wish it had
not been so. I found the body of Elksfoot sitting up
against a tree soon after you left me, and knew by whose
hands he had fallen.
Didn't find scalp, eh?
No, the scalp had been taken; though I accounted
that but for little, since the man's life was gone. There
is little gained by carrying on war in this manner, making
the woods, and the openings, and the prairies, alike unsafe.
You see, now, to what distress this family is reduced by
your Injin manner of making war.
How you make him, denwant to hear. Go kiss, and
give venison to inimy, or go get his scalp, eh? Which
bess fashion to make him afeard, and own you master?
All that may be done without killing single travellers,
or murdering women and children. The peace will be
Vol. I.  10
made none the sooner between England and America,
because
you have got the scalp of Elksfoot.
No haben't got him any longer; wish had
Pottawattamie
take him away, and say he bury him. Well, let him
hide him in a hole deep as white man's well, can't hide
Pigeonwing honour dere, too. Dat is safe as notch cut
on stick can make him!
This notch on a stick was the Indian mode of gazetting
a warrior; and a certain number of these notches was
pretty certain to procure for him a sort of savage brevet,
which answered his purpose quite as well as the modern
mode of brevetting at Washington answers our purpose.
Neither brings any pay, we believe, nor any command,
except in such cases as rarely occur, and then only to the
advantage of government. There are varieties in honour,
as in any other human interest: so are there many moral
degrees in warfare. Thus, the very individual who
admires
the occupation of Algiers, or that of Tahiti, or the
attack on Canton, together with the long train of Indian
events which have dyed the peninsulas of the East in
the blood of their people, sees an alarming enormity in the
knocking down of the walls of Vera Cruz, though the
breach opened a direct road into San Juan de Ulloa. In
the eyes of the same profound moralists, the garitas of
Mexico ought to have been respected, as so many doors
opening into the boudoirs of the beautiful dames of that
fine capital; it being a monstrous thing to fire a shot into
the streets of a town, no matter how many came out of
them. We are happy, therefore, to have it in our power
to add these touches of philosophy that came from
Pigeonswing
to those of the sages of the old world, by way of
completing a code of international morals on this
interesting
subject, in which the student shall be at a loss to say
which he most admiresthat which comes from the schools,
or that which comes direct from the wilderness.
So best, answered the bee-hunter. I wish I could
persuade you to throw away that disgusting thing at your
belt. Remember, Chippewa, you are now among Christians,
and ought to do as Christians wish.
What Christians
do
, eh? returned the Indian, with a
sneer. Get drunk, like Whiskey Centre, dere? Cheat
poor red man; den get down on knee and look up at
Manitou
?
Dat
what Christian do, eh?
They who do such things are Christians but in name
you must think better of such as are Christians in fact.
Ebbery body call himself Christian, tell youall
pale-face
Christian, dey say. Now, listen to Chippewa. Once
talk long talk wit' missionarytell all about Christian
what Christian dowhat Christian sayhow he eat, how
he sleep,
how
he drink!  all good  wish Pigeonwing
Christian  den 'member so'ger at garrison  no eat, no
sleep, no drink Christian fashiondo ebbery t'ing so'ger
fashionswear, fight, cheat, get drunkwuss dan Injin
dat Christian, eh?
No, that is not acting like a Christian; and I fear very
few of us who call ourselves by that name, act as if we
were Christians, in truth, said le Bourdon, conscious of
the justice of the Chippewa's accusation.
Just dat  now, I get him  ask missionary, one day,
where all Christian go to, so dat Injin can't find him
none in woodsnone on prairienone in garrisonnone
at Mack'naw  none at Detroit  where all go to, den, so
Injin can't find him, on'y in missionary talk?
I am curious to know what answer your missionary
made to that question.
Well, tell you  say, on'y one in ten t'ousant
raal
Christian 'mong pale-face, dough all call himself Christian!
Dat
what Injin t'ink queer, eh?
It is not easy to make a red man understand all the
ways of the pale-faces, Pigeonswing; but we will talk of
these things another time, when we are more at our ease.
Just now, I wish to learn all I can of the manner in which
you fell into the hands of the Pottawattamies.
Dat plain 'noughwish Christian talk half as plain.
You see, Bourdon, dat Elkfoot on scout, when we meet in
openin', up river. I know'd his ar'nd, and so took scalp.
Dem Pottawattamie his friendwhen dey come to meet
ole chief, no find him; but find Pigeonwing; got me when
tired and 'sleep; got Elkfoot scalp wid me  sorry for dat
know scalp by scalp-lock, which had grey hair, and some
mark. So put me in canoe, and meant to take Chippewa
to Chicago to torture himbut too much wind. So, when
meet friend in t'odder canoe, come back here to wait little
while.
This was the simple explanation of the manner in which
Pigeonswing had fallen into the hands of his enemies. It
would seem that Elksfoot had come in a canoe from the
mouth of the St. Joseph's to a point about half-way between
that river and the mouth of the Kalamazoo, and there
landed. What the object of the party was, does not
exactly
appear, though it is far from being certain that it was
not to seize the bee-hunter, and confiscate his effects.
Although le Bourdon was personally a stranger to Elksfoot,
news flies through the wilderness in an extraordinary
manner; and it was not at all unlikely that the fact of a
white American's being in the openings should soon spread,
along with the tidings that the hatchet was dug up, and
that a party should go out in quest of his scalp and the
plunder. It would seem that the savage tact of the
Chippewa
detected that in the manner of the Pottawattamie
chief, which assured him the intentions of the old warrior
were not amicable; and that he took the very summary
process which has been related, not only to secure
his
scalp, but effectually to put it out of his power to do any
mischief to one who was an ally, and, by means of recent
confidence, now a friend. All this the Indian explained
to his companion, in his usual clipped English, but with a
clearness sufficient to make it perfectly intelligible to his
listener. The bee-hunter listened with the most profound
attention, for he was fully aware of the importance of
comprehending
all the hazards of his own situation.
While this dialogue was going on, Margery had succeeded
in lighting her fire, and was busy in preparing some warm
compound, which she knew would be required by her
unhappy
brother after his debauch. Dorothy passed often
between the fire and the canoe, feeling a wife's anxiety in
the fate of her husband. As for the Chippewa,
intoxication
was a very venial offence in his eyes; though he had
a contempt for a man who would thus indulge while
on a war-path. The American Indian does possess this
merit of adapting his deportment to his circumstances.
When engaged in war, he usually prepares himself in the
coolest and wisest manner to meet its struggles, indulging
only in moments of leisure, and of comparative security,
It is true that the march of what is called civilization is
fast changing the red man's character, and he is very apt
now to do that which he sees done by the Christians
around him.
Le Bourdon, when his dialogue with the Chippewa was
over, and after a few words of explanation with Margery,
took his own canoe, and paddled through the rice plants
into the open water of the river, to reconnoitre. The
breadth of the stream induced him to float down before the
wind, until he reached a point where he could again
command
a view of the hut. What he there saw, and what he
next did, must be reserved for a succeeding chapter.
CHAPTER VIII.
The elfin cast a glance around,
As he lighted down from his courser toad,
Then round his breast his wings he wound,
And close to the river's brink he strode;
He sprang on a rock, he breathed a prayer,
Above his head his arm he threw,
Then tossed a tiny curve in air,
And headlong plunged in the water blue.
Drake
.
An
hour had intervened between the time when le
Bourdon
had removed the canoes of the Pottawattamies, and
the time when he returned alone to the northern side of the
river. In the course of that hour, the chief of the savages
had time to ascertain all the leading circumstances that
have just been related, and to collect his people in and
around the hut, for a passing council. The moment was
one of action, and not of ceremonies. No pipe was
smoked, nor any of the observances of the great councils
of the tribe attended to; the object was merely to glean
facts and to collect opinions. In all the tribes of this
part of North America, something very like a principle of
10*
democracy is the predominant feature of their polities. It
is not, however, that bastard democracy which is coming
so much in fashion among ourselves, and which looks into
the gutters solely for the people, forgetting that the
landlord has just as much right to protection as the tenant,
the master as the servant, the rich as the poor, the
gentleman
as the blackguard. The Indians know better than
all this. They understand, fully, that the chiefs are
entitled
to more respect than the loafers in their villages, and
listen to the former, while their ears are shut to the latter.
They appear to have a common sense, which teaches them
to avoid equally the exaggerations of those who believe in
blood, and of those who believe in blackguardism. With
them the doctrines of new men would sound as an
absurdity
,
for they never submit to change for change's sake.
On the contrary, while there is no positive hereditary rank,
there is much hereditary consideration; and we doubt if a
red man could be found in all America, who is so much of
a simpleton as to cite among the qualifications of any man
for a situation of trust and responsibility, that he had never
been
taught
how to perform its duties. They are not
guilty of the contradiction of elevating men
because
they
are self-taught, while they expend millions on schools.
Doubtless they have, after a fashion of their own,
demagogues
and Csars, but they are usually kept within
moderate
limits; and in rare instances, indeed, do either ever
seriously trespass on the rights of the tribe. As human
nature is everywhere the same, it is not to be supposed
that pure justice prevails even among savages; but one
thing would seem to be certain, that, all over the world,
man in his simplest and wildest state is more apt to respect
his own ordinances, than when living in what is deemed a
condition of high civilization.
When le Bourdon reached the point whence he could
get a good view of the door of the hut, which was still
illuminated by the fire within, he ceased using the paddle
beyond the slight effort necessary to keep the canoe nearly
stationary. He was quite within the range of a rifle, but
trusted to the darkness of the night for his protection.
That scouts were out, watching the approaches to the hut,
he felt satisfied; and he did not doubt that some were
prowling along the margin of the Kalamazoo, either
looking
for the lost boats, or for those who had taken them
away. This made him cautious, and he took good care
not to place his canoe in a position of danger.
It was very apparent that the savages were in great
uncertainty
as to the number of their enemies. Had not the
rifle been fired, and their warrior killed and scalped, they
might have supposed that their prisoner had found the
means of releasing his limbs himself, and thus effected his
escape; but they knew that the Chippewa had neither gun
nor knife, and as all their own arms, even to those of the
dead man, were still in their own possession, it was clear
that he had been succoured from without. Now, the
Pottawattamies
had heard of both the bee-hunter and Whiskey
Centre, and it was natural enough for them to ascribe some
of these unlooked-for feats to one or the other of these
agents. It is true, the hut was known to have been built
three or four years earlier, by an Indian trader, and no one
of the party had ever actually seen Gershom and his family
in possession; but the conjectures on this head were as
near the fact, as if the savages had passed and repassed
daily. There was only one point on which these close
calculators
of events were at fault. So thoroughly had
everything
been removed from the
chient
, and so carefully the
traces of its recent occupation concealed, that no one
among them suspected that the family had left the place
only an hour before their own arrival. The bee-hunter,
moreover, was well assured that the savages had not yet
blundered on the hiding-place of the furniture. Had this
been discovered, its contents would have been dragged to
light, and seen around the fire; for there is usually little
self-restraint among the red men, when they make a prize
of this sort.
Nevertheless, there was one point about which even those
keen-scented children of the forest were much puzzled,
and which the bee-hunter perfectly comprehended,
notwithstanding
the distance at which he was compelled to
keep himself. The odour of the whiskey was so strong, in
and about the
chient
, that the Pottawattamies did not know
what to make of it. That there should be the remains of
this peculiar smellone so fragrant and tempting to those
who are accustomed to indulge in the liquorin the hut
itself, was natural enough; but the savages were perplexed
at finding it so strong on the declivity, down which the
barrels had been rolled. On this subject were they
conversing
,
when le Bourdon first got near enough to observe
their proceedings. After discussing the matter for some
time, torches were lighted, and most of the party followed
a grim old warrior, who had an exceedingly true nose for
the scent of whiskey, and who led them to the very spot
where the half-barrel had been first stove, by rolling off a
rock, and where its contents had been mainly spilled. Here
the earth was yet wet, in places, and the scent was so strong,
as to leave no doubt of the recent nature of the accident
which had wasted so much of a liquor, that was very
precious
in Pottawattamie eyes; for accident they thought it
must be, since no sane man could think of destroying the
liquor intentionally.
All the movements, gestures, and genuflections of the
savages were plainly seen by the bee-hunter. We say the
genuflections, for nearly all of the Indians got on their
knees and applied their noses to the earth, in order to scent
the fragrance of the beloved whiskey; some out of
curiosity
,
but more because they loved even this tantalizing
indulgence, when no better could be had. But le Bourdon
was right in his conjectures, that the matter was not to end
here. Although most of the Indians scented the remains
of the whiskey out of love for the liquor, a few of their
number reasoned on the whole transaction, with quite as
much acuteness as could have been done by the shrewdest
natural philosopher living. To them it was very apparent
that no great length of time, a few hours at most, could
have elapsed since that whiskey was spilled; and human
hands must have brought it there, in the first place, and
poured it on the ground, in the second. There must have
been a strong reason for such an act, and that reason
presented
itself to their minds with unerring accuracy. Their
own approach must have been seen, and the liquor was
destroyed because it could not be removed in time to
prevent
its falling into their hands. Even the precise manner
in which the whiskey had been disposed of, was pretty
nearly conjectured by a few of the chiefs, acute and
practised
as they were; who, accustomed to this species of
exercise
of their wits, had some such dexterity in examining
facts of this nature, and in arriving at just results, as the
men of the schools manifest in the inquiries that more
especially belong to their habits and training. But their
conclusions were confined to themselves; and they were
also sufficiently enveloped in doubts, to leave those who
made them ready enough to receive new impressions on
the same subject.
All this, moreover, le Bourdon both saw and understood;
or, if not absolutely all, so much of it as to let him
comprehend
the main conclusions of the savages, as well as
the process by which they were reached. To obtam light,
the Indians made a fire near the charmed spot, which
brought themselves and their movements into plam view
from the canoe of the bee-hunter. Curiosity now became
strongly awakened in the latter, and he ventured in nearer
to the shore, in order to get the best possible view of what
was going on. In a manner, he was solving an enigma;
and he experienced the sort of pleasure we all feel at
exercising
our wits on difficulties of that nature. The
interest
he felt rendered the young man careless as respected
the position of his canoe, which drifted down before the
strong breeze, until le Bourdon found himself in the very
edge of the wild rice, which at this point formed but a
very narrow belt along the beach. It was this plant,
indeed
,
that contributed to make the young man so regardless
of his drift, for he looked upon the belt of rice as a species
of land-mark to warn him when to turn. But, at no other
spot along that whole shore, where the plant was to be
found at all, was its belt so narrow as at this, immediately
opposite to the new fire of the savages, and almost within
the influence of its rays. To le Bourdon's surprise, and
somewhat to his consternation, just as his little craft touched
the rice, the forms of two stout warriors passed along the
beach, between him and the light, their feet almost dipping
in the water. So near were these two warriors to him,
that, on listening intently, he heard not only their voices,
as they communicated their thoughts to each other in low
tones, but the tread of their moccasined feet on the ground.
Retreat, under the circumstances, would not be safe for
it must have been made under the muzzles of the rifles;
and but one resource presented itself. By grasping in his
hand two or three stalks of the rice-plant, and holding
them firmly, the drift of the canoe was arrested.
After a moment's reflection, le Bourdon was better
satisfied
with this new station than he had been on first gaining
it. To have ventured on such a near approach to his
enemies
,
he would have regarded as madness; but now he was
there, well concealed among the rice, he enjoyed the
advantages
of observation it gave him, and looked upon the
chance that brought him there, as lucky. He found a
thong of buckskin, and fastened his canoe to the stalks of
the plant, thus anchoring or mooring his little bark, and
leaving himself at liberty to move about in it. The rice
was high enough to conceal him, even when erect, and he
had some difficulty in finding places favourable to making
his observations through it. When the bee-hunter made
his way into the bow of his canoe, however, which he did
with a moccasined and noiseless foot, he was startled at
perceiving how small was his cover. In point of fact, he
was now within three feet of the inner edge of the
rice-plants
,
which grew within ten feet of the shore, where the
two warriors already mentioned were still standing, in close
communication with each other. Their faces were turned
towards the fire, the bright light from which, at times,
streamed over the canoe itself, in a way to illumine all it
contained. The first impulse of le Bourdon, on
ascertaining
how closely he had drifted to the shore, was to seize a
paddle and make off, but a second thought again told him
it would be far safer to remain where he was. Taking his
seat, therefore, on a bit of board laid athwart, from
gunwale
to gunwale, if such a craft can be said to have
gunwales
at all, he patiently awaited the course of events.
By this time, all or nearly all of the Pottawattamies had
collected at this spot, on the side of the hill. The hut was
deserted, its fire got to be low, and darkness reigned
around the place. On the other hand, the Indians kept
piling brush on their new fire, until the whole of that
hill-side
,
the stream at its foot, and the ravine through which
the latter ran, were fairly illuminated. Of course, all
within the influence of this light was to be distinctly seen,
and the bee-hunter was soon absorbed in gazing at the
movements of savage enemies, under circumstances so
peculiar.
The savages seemed to be entranced by the singular,
and to most of them unaccountable circumstance of the
earth's giving forth the scent of fresh whiskey, in a place
so retired and unknown. While two or three of the
numbers
had certain inklings of the truth, as has been stated,
to much the greater portion of their body it appeared to
be a profound mystery; and one that, in some inexplicable
manner, was connected with the recent digging up of the
hatchet. Ignorance and superstition ever go hand in hand,
and it was natural that many, perhaps that most of these
uninstructed beings should thus consider so unusual a
fragrance, on such a spot. Whiskey has unfortunately
obtained a power over the red men of this continent, that
it would require many Fathers Matthew to suppress, and
which can only be likened to that which is supposed to
belong to the influence of witchcraft. The Indian is quite
as sensible as the white man of the mischief that the
fire-water
produces; but, like the white man, he finds how
hard it is to get rid of a master passion, when we have
once submitted ourselves to its sway. The portion of the
band that could not account for the fact of the scent of
their beloved beverage's being found in such a place, and
it was all but three of their whole party, were quite
animated in their discussions on the subject, and many
and crude were the suggestions that fell from their lips.
The two warriors on the beach, were more deeply
impressed
than any of their companions, with the notion that
some medicine charm was connected with this
extraordinary
affair.
The reader will not be surprised to hear that le Bourdon
gazed on the scene before him with the most profound
attention. So near did he seem to be, and so near was he,
in fact, to the savages who were grouped around the fire,
that he fancied he could comprehend what they were
saying
,
by the expressions of their grim and swarthy
countenances
.
His conjectures were in part just, and
occasionally
the bee-hunter was absolutely accurate in his notions
of what was said. The frequency with which different
individuals knelt on the ground, to scent an odour that is
always so pleasant to the red man, would of itself have
given a clue to the general character of the discourse; but,
the significant and expressive gestures, the rapid
enunciation
,
and the manner in which the eyes of the speakers
glanced from the faces near themselves to the spot
consecrated
by whiskey, pretty plainly told the story. It was
while thus intently occupied in endeavouring to read the
singular impression made on the minds of most of those
wild beings, by an incident so much out of the usual track
of their experience, that le Bourdon suddenly found the
bow of his canoe thrusting itself beyond the inner margin
of the rice, and issuing into open water, within ten feet of
the very spot where the two nearest of the savages were
still conferring together, apart. The buckskin thong
which served as a fastening had got loosened, and the light
craft was again drifting down before the strong southerly
wind, which still continued to blow a little gale.
Had there been an opportunity for such a thing, the
bee-hunter would have made an effort to escape. But so
sudden and unexpected was this exposure, that he found
himself almost within reach of a rifle, before he was aware
of his approaching the two warriors on the shore, at all.
His paddle was in the stern of the canoe, and had he used
the utmost activity, the boat would have grounded on the
beach, ere he could have obtained it. In this situation,
therefore, he was absolutely without any other means, than
his hands, of stopping the canoe, had there even been time.
Le Bourdon understood his real situation without
stopping
to reflect; and, though his heart made one violent
leap as soon as he perceived he was out of cover, he
immediately
bethought him of the course he ought to pursue.
It would have been fatal to betray alarm, or to attempt
flight. As accident had thus brought him, as it might be
on a visit, to the spot, he at once determined to give his
arrival the character of a friendly call, and the better to
support the pretension, to blend with it, if possible, a little
of the oracular, or medicine manner, in order to impose
on the imaginations of the superstitious beings into whose
power he had so unwittingly fallen.
The instant the canoe touched the shore, and it was
only a moment after it broke through the cover, le Bourdon
arose, and extending his hand to the nearest Indian, saluted
him with the mongrel term of Sago. A slight
exclamation
from this warrior communicated to his companion an
arrival that was quite as much a matter of surprise to the
Indians as to their guest, and through this second warrior,
to the whole party on the hill-side. A little clamour
succeeded
,
and presently the bee-hunter was surrounded with
savages.
The meeting was marked by the self-command and
dignified
quiet that are so apt to distinguish the deportment
of Indian warriors, when they are on the war-path, and
alive to the duties of manhood. The bee-hunter shook
hands with several, who received his salutations with
perfect
calmness, if not with absolute confidence and amity.
This little ceremony gave our hero an opportunity to
observe the swarthy countenances by which he was
surrounded
,
most of which were fierce in their paint, as well
as to reflect a little on his own course. By a fortunate
inspiration he now determined to assume the character of
a medicine man, and to connect his prophecies and
juggleries
with this lucky accident of the whiskey.
Accordingly
,
he inquired if any one spoke English, not wishing
to trust his explanations to his own imperfect knowledge
of the Ojebway tongue, which is spoken by all the numerous
tribes of that widely-extended nation. Several could render
themselves intelligible in English, and one was so expert
as to render communication with him easy, if not very
agreeable. As the savages, however, soon insisted on
examining the canoe, and taking a look at its contents,
previously to listening to their visitor's explanations, le
Bourdon was fain to submit, and to let the young men
satisfy their curiosity.
The bee-hunter had come on his hazardous expedition
in his own canoe. Previously to quitting the south shore,
however, he had lightened the little craft, by landing
everything
that was not essential to his present purpose. As
nearly half of his effects were in the canoe of Whiskey
Centre, the task was soon performed, and lucky it was for
our hero that he had bethought him of the prudence of the
measure. His sole object had been to render the canoe
Vol. I.  11
swifter and lighter, in the event of a chase; but, as things
turned out, he saved no small portion of his property by
using the precaution. The Indians found nothing in the
canoe, but one rifle, with a horn and pouch, a few light
articles belonging to the bee-hunter's domestic economy,
and which he had not thought it necessary to remove, and
the paddles. All the honey, and the skins, and stores,
and spare powder and lead, and, in short, every thing else
that belonged to le Bourdon was still safe, on the other side
of the river. The greatest advantage gained by the
Pottawattamies
was in the possession of the canoe, itself, by
means of which they would now be enabled to cross the
Kalamazoo, or make any other similar expedition, by
water.
But, as yet, not a sign of hostility was betrayed by either
party. The bee-hunter seemed to pay no attention to his
rifle and ammunition, or even to his canoe, while the
savages
,
after having warily examined the last, together with
its contents, returned to their visitor, to re-examine him,
with a curiosity as lively as it was full of distrust. At this
stage in the proceeding, something like a connected and
intelligible conversation commenced between the chief who
spoke English, and who was known in most of the
north-western
garrisons of the Americans, by the name of
Thundercloud
,
or Cloud, by way of abbreviation, on account of
his sinister looks, though the man actually sustained a
tolerably fair reputation for one of those who, having been
wronged, was so certain to be calumniated. No man was
ever yet injured, that he has not been slandered.
Who kill and scalp my young man? asked Cloud, a
little abruptly.
Has my brother lost a warrior? was the calm reply.
Yes, I see that he has. A medicine-man can see that,
though it is dark.
Who kill him, if can see?who scalp him, too?
An enemy did both, answered le Bourdon, oracularly.
Yes; 't was an enemy that killed him; and an enemy
that took his scalp.
Why do it, eh? Why come here to take
Pottawattamie
scalp, when no war-path open, eh?
Pottawattamie, the truth must always be said to a
medicine-man
.
There is no use in trying to hide truth from
him
. There
is
a war-path open; and a long and a tangled
path it is. My Great Father at Washington has dug up
the hatchet against my Great Father at Quebec. Enemies
always take scalps when they can get them.
Dat truedat right, toonobody grumble at
dat
but
who enemy? pale-face or red-skin?
This time it was a red-skina Chippewaone of your
own nation, though not of your own tribe. A warrior called
Pigeonswing, whom you had in thongs, intending to torture
him in the morning. He cut his thongs, and shot your
young manafter which he took his scalp.
How know dat? demanded the Cloud, a little fiercely.
You 'long, and help kill Pottawattamie, eh?
I know it, answered le Bourdon, coolly, because
medicine-men know most of what happens. Do not be
so hasty, chief, for this is a medicine spotwhiskey
grows
here.
A common exclamation escaped all of the red men, who
comprehended the clear, distinct, and oracular-like
language
and manner of the bee-hunter. He intended to
make an impression on his listeners, and he succeeded
admirably
;
perhaps as much by means of manner as of
matter. As has been said, all who understood his words
some four or five of the partygrunted forth their
surprise
at this evidence of their guest's acquaintance with
the secrets of the place, in which they were joined by the
rest of their companions, as soon as the words of the
pale-face
had been translated. Even the experienced and wary
old chiefs, who had more than half conjectured the truth,
in connection with this mysterious odour of whiskey, were
much unsettled in their opinions concerning the wonder,
and got to be in that condition of mind, when a man does
not know what to think of any particular event. The
bee-hunter
,
quick-witted, and managing for his life, was not
slow to perceive the advantage he had gained, and he
proceeded
at once to clinch the nail he had so skilfully driven.
Turning from Cloud to the head chief of the party, a
warrior
whom he had no difficulty in recognising, after having
so long watched his movements in the earlier part of the
night, he pushed the same subject a little further.
Yes; this place is called by the whites, Whiskey
Centre, he addedwhich means that it is the centre of
all the whiskey of the country round about.
Dat true, said Cloud, quicklyI hear so'ger at Fort
Dearborn call him Whiskey Centre!
This little circumstance greatly complicated the mystery,
and le Bourdon perceived that he had hit on a lucky
explanation
.
Soldiers far and near soldiers drunk or sober
soldiers
with scalps, and soldiers without scalps  all know
the place by that name. But you need not believe with
your eyes shut, and noses stopped, chief, since you have
the means of learning for yourselves the truth of what I
tell you. Come with me, and I will tell you where to dig
in the morning for a Whiskey Spring.
This communication excited a tremendous feeling among
the savages, when its purport came to be explained to the
whole party. Apart from the extraordinary, miraculous
nature of such a spring, which in itself was sufficient to
keep alive expectation and gratify curiosity, it was so
comfortable
to have an inexhaustible supply of the liquor
running
out of the bowels of the earth, that it is no wonder
the news spread infinite delight among the listeners. Even
the two or three of the chiefs who had so shrewdly divined
the manner in which the liquor had been spilled, were
staggered by the solemnity and steadiness of the
bee-hunter's
manner, and perhaps a little carried away by
sympathy with those around them. This yielding of the
human mind to the influence of numbers, is so common an
occurrence as scarcely to require explanation, and is the
source of half the evils that popular associations inflict on
themselves. It is not that men capable of
seeing
the truth
are ever wanting; but men capable of
maintaining
it, in
the face of clamour and collected power.
It will be readily conceived that a medicine-man, who is
supposed to possess the means of discovering a spring that
should overflow with pure whiskey, would not be left
without
urgent demands for a speedy exercise of his art. This
was now the case with le Bourdon, who was called on from
all sides, to point out the precise spot where the young men
were to commence digging in order to open on the
treasure
.
Our hero knew that his only hope of escape was
connected with his steadily maintaining his assumed
character
;
or, of maintaining this assumed character, with his
going on, at once, to do something that might have the
effect, temporarily at least, of satisfying the impatience of
his now attentive listeners. Accordingly, when the
demand
was made on him to give some evidence of his power,
he set about the task, not only with composure, but with a
good deal of ingenuity.
Le Bourdon, it will be remembered, had, with his own
hands, rolled the two barrels of whiskey down the declivity.
Feeling the great importance of effectually destroying them,
he had watched their descent, from the top to the bottom
of the hill, and the final disappearance of the staves, &c.,
in the torrent which brawled at its foot. It had so
happened
,
that the half-filled cask broke and let out its liquor,
at a point much more remote from the stream, than the
filled cask. The latter had held together until it went
over the low rocky precipice, already mentioned, and was
stove at its base, within two yards of the torrent, which
received all its fragments and swept them away, including
most of the liquor itself; but not until the last had been
spilled. Now, the odorous spot which had attracted the
noses of the savages, and near which they had built their
fire, was that where the smallest quantity of the whiskey
had fallen. Le Bourdon reasoned on these circumstances
in this wise: if half a barrel of the liquor can produce
so strong a scent, a barrel filled ought to produce one still
stronger; and I will manifest my medicine-character, by
disregarding for the present moment the spot on the
hill-side
,
and proceed at once to that at the foot of the rocks.
To this latter point, therefore, did he direct all the
ceremony
,
as well as his own footsteps, when he yielded to the
solicitations of the Pottawattamies, and undertook to point
out the position of the Whiskey Spring.
The bee-hunter understood the Indian character too
well, to forget to embellish his work with a proper amount
of jugglery and acting. Luckily, he had left in the canoe
a sort of frock of mottled colours, that he had made
himself
,
to wear in the woods in the autumn as a hunting dress,
under the notion that such a covering would conceal his
11*
approach from his game, by blending its hues with those
of the autumn leaf. This dress he now assumed, extorting
a good deal of half-suppressed admiration from the younger
warriors, by the gay appearance he made. Then he drew
out his spy-glass to its greatest length, making various
mysterious signs and gestures as he did so. This glass
proved to be a great auxiliary, and possibly alone kept the
doubters in awe. Le Bourdon saw at once that it was
entirely
new, even to the oldest chief, and he felt how much
it might be made to assist him. Beckoning to Cloud, and
adjusting the focus, he directed the small end of his glass to
the fire, and placed the large end to that Indian's eye. A
solitary savage, who loved the scent of whiskey too much
to tear himself away from the spot, was lingering within
the influence of the rays, and of course was seen by the
chief, with his person diminished to that of a dwarf, and
his form thrown to a seeming distance.
An eloquent exclamation followed this exhibition of the
medicine-man's power; and each of the chiefs, and most
of the other warriors, were gratified with looks through
the glass!
What dat mean? demanded Cloud, earnestly. See
Wolfeye well 'nough why he so little? why he so far
off, eh?
That is to show you what a medicine-man of the
pale-faces
can do, when he is so minded. That Indian is named
Wolfseye, and he loves whiskey too well. That I know,
as well as I know his name.
Each of these exhibitions of intelligence extorted
exclamations
of wonder. It is true, that one or two of the
higher chiefs understood that the name might possibly have
been obtained from Cloud; but how was the medicine-man
to know that Wolfseye was a drunkard? This last had
not been said in terms; but enough had been said, to let
those who were aware of the propensity feel that more was
meant than had been expressed. Before there was time,
however, to deliberate on, or to dissect this specimen of
mysterious knowledge, le Bourdon reversed the glass, and
applied the small end to the eye of Cloud, after having
given it its former direction. The Indian fairly yelled,
partly with dread, and partly with delight, when he saw
Wolfseye, large as life, brought so near himself that he
fancied he might be touched with his own hand.
What dat mean? exclaimed Cloud, as soon as surprise
and awe enabled him to find his voice. Fuss he little,
den he bigfuss he great way, den he close bywhat dat
mean, eh?
It means that I am a medicine-man, and this is a
medicine-glass
,
and that I can see with it into the earth,
deeper than the wells, or higher than the mountains!
These words were translated, and explained to all there.
They extorted many ejaculations of wonder, and divers
grunts of admiration and contentment. Cloud conferred
a moment with the two principal chiefs; then he turned
eagerly to the bee-hunter, saying
All good, but want to hear morewant to l'arn more
want to
see
more.
Name your wants freely, Pottawattamie, answered le
Bourdon, with dignity; they shall be satisfied.
Want to see  want to
taste
Whiskey Spring  see
won't dowant to
taste
.
Goodyou shall smell first; then you shall see; after
that you shall taste. Give me room, and be silent; a great
medicine is near.
Thus delivering himself, le Bourdon proceeded with his
necromancy.
CHAPTER IX.
He turn'd him round, and fled amain
With hurry and dash to the beach again;
He twisted over from side to side,
And laid his cheek to the cleaving tide;
The strokes of his plunging arms are fleet,
And with all his might he fings his feet,
But the water-sprites are round him still,
To cross his path and work him ill.
The Culprit Fay
.
The
first step in the conjuration of the bee-hunter was,
to produce an impression on the minds of his untutored
observers, by resorting to a proper amount of mummery
and mystical action. This he was enabled to do with some
effect, in consequence of having practised as a lad, in
similar mimicry, by way of pastime. The Germans, and
the descendants of Germans in America, are not of a very
high class, as respects education, taken as a body, and
they retain many of the most inveterate of the superstitions
of their Teutonic ancestors. Although the bee-hunter,
himself, was of purely English descent, he came from a
state that was in part peopled by these Germans and their
descendants; and, by intercourse with them, he had
acquired
a certain knowledge of their notions on the subject
of necromancy, that he now found was of use. So far as
gravity of mien, solemn grimaces, and unintelligible
mutterings
were concerned, le Bourdon played his part to
admiration
;
and by the time he had led the party half the
distance he intended to go, our necromancer, or
medicine-man
,
had complete possession of the imaginations
of all the savages, the two or three chiefs already mentioned
alone excepted. At this stage of the proceedings occurred
a little incident, which goes to prove the disposition of the
common mind to contribute in deceiving itself, and which
was of considerable assistance to le Bourdon, in
maintaining
his assumed character.
It will be remembered that the place where the Indians
had found their strongest scent was on the hill-side, or at
the spot where the half-filled barrel had let out most of its
contents. Near this spot their new fire was still brightly
blazing, and there Wolfseye remained, regaling one of his
senses, at least, with an odour that he found so agreeable.
But the bee-hunter knew that he should greatly increase
the wonder of the savages by leading them to a
new
scent-spot
,
one to which there was no visible clue, and where the
odour was probably much stronger than on the hill-side.
Accordingly he did not approach the fire, but kept around
the base of the hill, just enough within the influence of the
light to pick his way readily, and yet so distant from it, as
to render his countenance indistinct and mysterious. No
sooner, however, had he got abreast of the scent-spot known to the savages, than the crowd endeavoured to lead him
towards it, by gestures and hints, and, finally, by direct
intimations that he was going astray. All this our
medicine-man
disregarded; he held his way steadily and
solemnly toward that place at the foot of the hill, where he
knew that the filled barrel had let out its contents, and
where he, reasonably enough, expected to find sufficient
traces of the whiskey to answer his purposes. At first,
this pertinacity provoked the crowd, which believed he
was going wrong; but a few words from Crowsfeather, the
principal chief, caused the commotion to cease. In a few
more minutes le Bourdon stopped, near the place of his
destination. As a fresh scent of whiskey was very
perceptible
here, a murmur of admiration, not unmixed with
delight
,
passed among the attendants!
Now, let the young men build a fire for
me
, said the
bee-hunter, solemnlynot such a fire as that which is
burning on the hill, but a medicine-fire. I
smell
the
Whiskey
Spring, and want a medicine-light to
see
it.
A dozen young men began to collect the brush; in a
minute a pile of some size had been accumulated on a flat
rock, within twenty feet of the spot where le Bourdon
knew that the cask had been dashed to pieces. When he
thought the pile sufficiently large, he told Crowsfeather that
it might be lighted by bringing a brand from the other fire.
This will not be a medicine-light, for that can come
only from `medicine-matches,' he added; but I want a fire
to see the shape of the ground. Put in the brand, brothers;
let us have a flame.
The desire of the bee-hunter was gratified, and the
whole of the base of the hill, around the spot where the
filled cask had broken, was illuminated.
Now, let all the Pottawattamies stand back, added
le Bourdon, earnestly. It might cost a warrior his life
to come forward too soon  or, if not his life, it might
give a rheumatism that can never be cured, which is worse.
When it is time for my red brothers to advance, they will
be called.
As the bee-hunter accompanied this announcement by
suitable gestures, he succeeded in ranging all of the silent,
but excited savages on three sides of his fire, leaving that
next his mysterious spring to himself, alone. When all
was arranged, le Bourdon moved slowly, but
unaccompanied
,
to the precise spot where the cask had broken.
Here he found the odour of the whiskey so strong, as to
convince him that some of the liquor must yet remain. On
examining more closely, he ascertained that several shallow
cavities of the flat rock, on which the cask had been dashed,
still contained a good deal of the liquor; enough to prove
of great assistance to his medicine character.
All this while the bee-hunter kept one portion of his
faculties
on the alert, in order to effect his escape. That he
might deceive for a time, aided as he was by so many
favourable circumstances, he did not doubt; but he
dreaded
the morning and the results of a night of reflection and
rest. Crowsfeather, in particular, troubled him; and he
foresaw that his fate would be terrible, did the savages
once get an inkling of the deception he was practising.
As he stood there, bending over the little pools of whiskey,
he glanced his eyes towards the gloom which pervaded the
northern side of the hill, and calculated the chances of
escape by trusting to his speed. All of the Pottawattamies
were on the opposite side, and there was a thicket
favourably
placed for a cover, so near that the rifle would scarce
have time to perform its fatal office, ere he might hope to
bury himself within its leaves. So tempting did the
occasion
appear that, for a single instant, le Bourdon forgot his
caution, and his mummeries, and had actually advanced a
step or two, in the direction towards which he contemplated
flight, when, on glancing an uneasy look behind him, he
perceived Crowsfeather and his two intimate counsellors
stealthily preparing their rifles, as if they distrusted his
intentions
.
This at once induced a change of plan, and
brought the bee-hunter back to a sense of his critical
position
,
and of the indispensable necessity of caution, to a
man in his situation.
Le Bourdon now seemingly gave all his attention to the
rocks where he stood, and out of which the much-coveted
liquor was expected to flow; though his thoughts were still
busily employed in considering the means of escape, the
whole time. While stooping over the different pools, and
laying his plans for continuing his medicine-charms, the
bee-hunter saw how near he had been to committing a
great mistake. It was almost as indispensable to carry off
the canoe, as it was to carry off himself; since, with the
canoe, not only would all his own property, but pretty
Margery, and Gershom and his wife, be at the mercy of the
Pottawattamies; whereas, by securing the boat, the wide
Kalamazoo would serve as a nearly impassable barrier,
until time was given to the whites to escape. His whole
plan was changed by this suggestion, and he no longer
thought of the thicket and of flight inland. At the same
time that the bee-hunter was laying up in his mind ideas
so important to his future movements, he did not neglect
the necessary examination of the means that might be
required to extend and prolong his influence over the
minds of the superstitious children of the forest, on whom
he was required to practise his arts. His thoughts reverted
to the canoe, and he concocted a plan by which he believed
it possible to get possession of his little craft, again. Once
on board it, by one vigorous shove he fancied he might
push it within the cover of the rice-plant, where he would
be in reasonable safety against the bullets of the savages.
Could he only get the canoe on the outer side of the
narrow belt of the plant, he should deem himself safe!
Having arranged his course in his own mind, le Bourdon
now beckoned to Crowsfeather to draw near, at the same
time inviting the whole party to approach within a few feet
of the spot where he himself stood. The bee-hunter had
brought with him from the boat, a fragment of the larger
end of a cane fishing-rod, which he used as a sort of wand.
Its size was respectable, and its length about eight feet.
With this wand he pointed out the different objects he
named, and it answered the very important purpose of
enabling him to make certain small changes in the
formation
of the ground, that were of the greatest service to him,
without permitting curious eyes to come so near as to
detect
his artifices.
Now open your ears, Crowsfeather; and you, Cloud;
and all of you, young braves, commenced the bee-hunter
solemnly, and with a steadiness that was admirable; yes,
open wide your ears. The Great Spirit has given the red
man a nose that he might smell  does the Cloud smell
more than common?
Sartain  smell whiskey  this Whiskey Centre dey
saynat'ral dat such smell be here.
Do all the chiefs and warriors of the Pottawattamies
who are present, also smell the same?
S'pose sowhy he don't, eh? Got nosecan smell
whiskey good way, tell you.
It is right they should smell the liquor here, for out
of this rock a whiskey spring will soon begin to run. It
will begin with a very small stream, but soon will there be
enough to satisfy everybody. The Great Manitou knows
that his red children are dry; he has sent a `
medicine-man'
of the pale-faces to find a spring for them. Now,
look at this piece of rockit is drynot even the dew has
yet moistened it. Seeit is made like a wooden bowl, that
it may hold the liquor of the spring. Let Crowsfeather
smell itsmell it, Cloudlet all my young men smell it,
too, that they may be certain that there is nothing there.
On this invitation, accompanied as it was by divers
flourishes of the wand, and uttered in a deep solemn tone
of voice, the whole party of the Indians gathered around
the small hollow basin-like cavity pointed out by the
bee-hunter
,
in order both to see and smell. Most knelt, and each and all applied their noses to the rock, as near the
bowl as they could thrust them. Even the dignified and
distrustful Crowsfeather could not refrain from bending in
the crowd. This was the moment for which le
Bourdon
wished, and he instantly prepared to carry out his
design.
Previously, however, to completing the project originally
conceived, a momentary impulse prevailed which urged
him to adopt a new mode of effecting his escape. Now,
that most of the savages were on their hands and knees,
struggling to get their noses as near as possible to the bowl,
and all were intent on the same object, it occurred to the
bee-hunter, who was almost as active as the panther of the
American forest, that he might dash on towards the canoe,
and make his escape without further mummery. Had it
been only a question of human speed, perhaps such would
have been the wisest thing he could do; but a moment's
reflection told him how much swifter than any foot of
man was the bullet of a rifle. The distance exceeded a
hundred yards, and it was altogether in bright light, by
means of the two fires, Wolfeye continuing to pile brush
on that near which he still maintained his post, as if afraid
the precious liquor would start out of the scent-spot, and
be wasted should he abandon his ward. Happily,
therefore
,
le Bourdon relinquished this dangerous project almost
as soon as it was entertained, turning his attention
immediately
to the completion of the plan originally laid.
It has been said that the bee-hunter made sundry
flourishes
with his wand. While the savages were most eager
in endeavouring to smell the rock, he lightly touched the
earth that confined the whiskey in the largest pool, and
opened a passage by which the liquor could trickle down
the side of the rock, selecting a path for itself, until it
actually
came into the bowl, by a sinuous but certain channel!
Here was a wonder! Liquor could not only be smelled,
but it could be actually seen! As for Cloud, not satisfied
with gratifying the two senses connected with the
discoveries
named, he began to lap with his tongue, like a dog,
to try the effect of taste.
The Manitou does not hide his face from the
Pottawattamies
!
exclaimed this savage, rising to his feet in
astonishment; this is fire-water, and such as the
pale-faces
bring us for skins!
Others imitated his example, and the exclamations of
wonder and delight flew from mouth to mouth, in a torrent
Vol. I.  12
of vehement assertions and ejaculations. So great a
medicine charm had never before been witnessed in
that tribe, or in that region, and a hundred more might
succeed, before another should equal this in its welcome
character. There was whiskey, of a certainty, not much
in quantity, to be sure, but of excellent quality, as several
affirmed, and coming in a current that was slowly
increasing
!
This last sign was owing to the circumstance
that le Bourdon had deepened the outlet of the pool,
permitting
a larger quantity to flow down the little channel.
The moment had now come for a decisive step. The
bee-hunter knew that his precious rivulet would soon cease
to run, and that he must carry out his design under the
first impressions of his charm, or that he probably would
not be permitted to carry it out, at all. At this moment
even Crowsfeather appeared to be awed by what he had
seen; but a chief so sagacious might detect the truth, and
disappointment would then be certain to increase the
penalties
he would incur.
Making many sweeps of his wand, and touching various
points of the rock, both to occupy the attention of the
savages
,
and to divert it from his pool, the bee-hunter next felt
in his pocket and drew out a small piece of resin that he
knew was there; the remains of a store with which he
resined the bow of his fiddle; for our hero had a violin,
among his effects, and often used it in his solitary abodes
in the openings. Breaking this resin on a coal, he made it
flash and blaze; but the quantity was too small to produce
the medicine-free he wanted.
I have more in my canoe, he said, addressing himself
to the interpreter; while I go for it, the red men must
not stir, lest they destroy a pale-face's doings. Least of
all must they go near the spring. It would be better for
the chiefs to lead away their young men, and make them
stand under that oak, where nothing can be done to hurt
the `medicine charm.'
The bee-hunter pointed to a tree that stood in the
direction
of the canoe, in order to prevent distrust, though he
had taken care to select a spot, whence the little craft
could not be seen, on account of an intervening swell in
the land. Crowsfeather led his warriors to the indicated
place, where they took their stations, in silent and grave
attention.
In the meanwhile, le Bourdon continued his incantations
aloud; walking towards his canoe, waving his wand, and
uttering a great deal of gibberish as he slowly proceeded.
In passing the tree, our hero, though he did not turn his
head, was sensible that he was followed by the chiefs, a
movement against which he did not dare to remonstrate,
though it sadly disappointed him. Neither hastening, nor
retarding his steps, however, in consequence of this
unpleasant
circumstance, the young man continued on; once or
twice sweeping the wand behind him, in order to ascertain
if he could reach his followers. But Crowsfeather and his
companions stopped when they reached the swell of land
which concealed the canoe, suffering the medicine-man
to move on, alone. Of this fact le Bourdon became aware,
by turning three times in a circle, and pointing upwards
at the heavens with his wand, as he did so.
It was a nervous moment when the bee-hunter reached
the canoe. He did not like to look behind him, again, lest
the chiefs should suspect his motive, and, in shoving off
from the shore, he might do so within a few yards of the
muzzle of a hostile rifle. There was no time to lose,
however
,
for any protracted delay on his part would certainly
cause the savages to approach, through curiosity, if not
through distrust of his motives. He stepped into his light
craft, therefore, without any delay, still flourishing his
wand, and muttering his incantations. The first thing was
to walk to the stern of the canoe, that his weight might
raise the bow from the shore, and also that he might have
an excuse for turning round, and thus get another look at
the Indians. So critical was his situation, and so nervous
did it make our young hero, that he took no heed of the
state of matters in the canoe, until the last moment. When
he had turned, however, he ascertained that the two
principal
chiefs had drawn so near as to be within twenty yards
of him, though neither held his rifle at ready, but each
leaned on it in a careless manner, as if in no anticipation
of any necessity to make a speedy use of the weapon.
This state of things could not last, and le Bourbon braced
his nerves for the final trial. On looking for his paddle,
however, he found that of three, which the canoe had
contained
when he left it, not one was to be seen! These
wily savages had, out of all question, taken their opportunity
to remove and secrete these simple, but almost
indispensable
,
means of motion.
At the instant when first apprised of the loss just
mentioned
,
the bee-hunter's heart sunk within him, and he fell
into the seat in the stern of the canoe, nearly with the
weight of so much lead. Then a species of desperation
came over him, and putting an end of his cane wand upon
the bottom, with a vigorous shove, he forced the canoe
swiftly astern and to windward. Sudden as was this
attempt, and rapid as was the movement, the jealous eyes
and ready hands of the chiefs seemed to anticipate it. Two
shots were fired within a few seconds after the canoe had
quitted the shore. The reports of the rifles were a
declaration
of hostilities, and a general yell, accompanied by a
common rush towards the river, announced that the whole
band now understood that some deception had been
practised
at their expense.
Although the two chiefs in advance had been so very
prompt, they were not quick enough for the rapid
movement
of the canoe. The distance between the stern of the
boat and the rice-plants, was so small, that the single,
desperate
shove given by the bee-hunter, sufficed to bury his
person in the cover, before the leaden messengers reached
him. Anticipating this very attempt, and knowing that
the savages might get their range from the part of the canoe
that was still in sight, le Bourdon bent his body far over
the gunwale, grasping the rice-plants at the same time,
and hauling his little craft through them, in the way that
sailors call hand over hand. This expedient most
probably
saved his life. While bending over the gunwale, he
heard the crack of the rifles, and the whizzing of two
bullets
that appeared to pass just behind him. By this time,
the whole of the canoe was within the cover.
In a moment like that we are describing, incidents pass
so rapidly as almost to defy description. It was not twenty
seconds from the instant when le Bourdon first put his
wand down to push the canoe from the land, ere he found
his person emerging from the cover, on its weather side.
Here he was effectually concealed from his enemies, not
only on account of the cover made by the rice-plants, but
by reason of the darkness; the light not extending far
enough from the fire to illumine objects on the river.
Nevertheless, new difficulties presented themselves. When
clear of the rice, the wind, which still blew strong, pressed
upon his canoe to such a degree, as not only to stop its
further movement from the shore, but so as to turn it
broadside to, to its power. Trying with his wand, the
bee-hunter ascertained that it would no longer reach the
bottom. Then he attempted to use the cane as a paddle,
but soon found it had not sufficient hold of the water to
answer for such an implement. The most he could effect
with it, in that way, was to keep the canoe for a short
distance
along the outer edge of the rice, until it reached a
spot where the plant extended a considerable distance
farther
towards the middle of the river. Once within this
little forest of the wild rice, he was enabled to drag the
canoe further and further from the north shore, though his
progress was both slow and laborious, on account of the
resistance met.
All this time, the savages were not idle. Until the canoe
got within its new cover, it was at no instant fifty yards
from the beach, and the yells, and orders, and whoopings
sounded as if uttered directly in le Bourdon's ear. A
splashing in the water soon announced that our fugitive
was pursued by swimmers. As the savages knew that the
bee-hunter was without a paddle, and that the wind blew
fresh, the expectation of overtaking their late captive, in
this manner, was by no means chimerical. Half a dozen
active young men would prove very formidable to one in
such a situation, more especially while entangled in the
mazes of the rice-plant. The bee-hunter was so well
convinced
of this circumstance, that no sooner did he hear the
plashes of the swimmers, than he redoubled his exertions
to pull his canoe farther from the spot. But his progress
was slow, and he was soon convinced that his impunity
was more owing to the fact that his pursuers did not know
where to find him, than to the rapidity of his flight.
Notwithstanding his exertions, and the start obtained,
le Bourbon soon felt assured that the swimmers were within
12*
a hundred feet of him, their voices coming from the outer
margin of the cover in which he now lay, stationary. He
had ceased dragging the canoe ahead, from an apprehension
of being heard, though the rushing of the wind and the
rustling of the rice might have assured him that the slight
noises made by his own movements would not be very
likely to rise above those sounds. The splashing of the
swimmers, and their voices, gradually drew nearer, until
the bee-hunter took up his rifle, determined to sacrifice
the first savage who approached; hoping, thereby, to
intimidate the others. For the first time, it now occurred
to him that the breech of his rifle might be used as a
paddle, and he was resolved to apply it to that service,
could he once succeed in extricating himself from the
enemies by whom he was nearly environed, and from the
rice.
Just as le Bourdon fancied that the crisis had arrived,
and that he should soon be called on to kill his man, a
shout was given by a savage at some distance in the river,
and presently calls passed from mouth to mouth, among the
swimmers. Our hero now listened to a degree that kept
his faculty of hearing at a point of painful attention. The
voices and plashes on the water receded, and what was
startling, a sound was heard resembling that which is
produced
by a paddle when struck incautiously against the
side of a canoe. Was it then possible that the Chippewa
was out, or had the Pottawattamies one boat that had
escaped his attention? The last was not very probable, as
he had several times counted their little fleet, and was
pretty sure of having taken it all to the other side of the
river. The sound of the paddle was repeated, however;
then it occurred to the bee-hunter that Pigeonswing might
be on the scent for another scalp.
Although the conjecture just mentioned was exceedingly
unpleasant to le Bourdon, the chase of the strange canoe
gave him an opportunity to drag his own light craft ahead,
penetrating deeper and deeper among the wild rice, which
now spread itself to a considerable distance from the shore,
and grew so thick as to make it impossible to get through
the waving mass. At length, wearied with his exertions,
and a little uncertain as to his actual position, our hero
paused, listening intently, in order to catch any sounds
that might direct his future movements.
By this time, the savages had ceased to call to each
other; most probably conscious of the advantage it gave
the fugitive. The bee-hunter perfectly understood that his
pursuers must be aware of its being entirely out of his
power to get to windward, and that they would keep along
the shore of the river, as he did himself, expecting to see
his canoe, sooner or later, driven by the wind on the beach.
This had made him anxious to drag his boat as much
towards
the outer edge of the rice as he could get it, and,
by the puffs of wind that he occasionally felt, he hoped
he had, in a great measure, effected his purpose. Still he
had his apprehensions of the savages; as some would be
very apt to swim quite out into the stream, not only to look
for him, but to avoid being entangled among the plants.
It was only in the natural channels of the rice, of which
there were a good many, that a swimmer could very readily
make his way, or be in much safety. By waiting long
enough, moreover, the bee-hunter was sure he should tire
out his pursuers, and thus get rid of them.
Just as le Bourdon began to think this last mentioned
purpose had been accomplished, he heard low voices
directly
to windward, and the plashing of water, as if more
than one man was coming down upon him, forcing the
stalks of the plants aside. He grasped the rifle, and let
the canoe drift, which it did slowly, under the power of
the wind, notwithstanding the protection of the cover.
The swimmers forced their way through the stalks; but
it was evident, just then, that they were more occupied by
their present pursuit, than in looking for him. Presently,
a canoe came brushing through the rice, forced by the
wind, and dragged by two savages, one of whom swam on
each bow. The last did not see the bee-hunter, or his
canoe, the one nearest having his face turned in the
opposite
direction; but they were distinctly seen by the former.
Surprised that a seizure should be made with so little
fracas, le Bourdon bent forward to look the better, and, as
the stern of the strange canoe came almost under his eyes,
he saw the form of Margery lying in its bottom. His
blood curdled at this sight; for, his first impression was,
that the charming young creature had been killed and
scalped: but there being no time to lose, he sprang lightly
from one canoe to the other, carrying the rifle in his hand.
As he struck in the bottom of the boat of Gershom, he
heard his name uttered in a sweet female voice, and knew
that Margery was living. Without stopping, however, to
inquire more, he moved to the head of the canoe, and
with a sharp blow on the fingers, made each of the savages
release his grasp. Then, seizing the rice-plants, he
dragged the little craft swiftly to windward again. All this
was done, as it might be in an instant; the savages and
the canoe being separated some twenty feet, in much less
time than is required to relate the occurrence.
Bourdon, are you injured? asked Margery, her voice
trembling with anxiety.
Not in the least, dear Margeryand you, my
excellent
girl?
They caught my canoe, and I almost died of fright;
but they have only dragged it towards the shore.
God be praised! Is there any paddle in the canoe?
There are severalone is at your feet, Bourdonand
here, I have another.
Then, let us search for my canoe, and get out of the
rice. If we can but find my canoe, we shall be safe
enough, for the savages have nothing in which to cross
the river. Keep your eyes about you, Margery, and look
among the rice for the other boat.
The search was not long, but it was intently anxious.
At length Margery saw the lost canoe just as it was
drifting
past them, and it was secured immediately. In a few
minutes, le Bourdon succeeded in forcing the two craft
into open water, when it was easy for him to paddle both
to windward. The reader can readily imagine that our
hero did not permit many minutes to elapse, ere he
questioned
his companion on the subject of her adventures.
Nor was Margery reluctant to tell them. She had become
alarmed at le Bourdon's protracted absence, and taking
advantage of Pigeonswing lying down, she unloaded her
brother's canoe, and went out into the river to look for the
absent one. As a matter of coursethough so feminine
and far removed from all appearance of coarseness a true
American girl in this respectMargery knew perfectly
well how to manage a bark canoe. The habits of her life
for the last few years, made her acquainted with this simple
art; and strength being much less needed than skill, she
had no difficulty in going whither she wished. The fires
served as beacons, and Margery had been a distant
witness
of the bee-hunter's necromancy as well as of his
escape. The instant the latter was effected, she
endeavoured
to join him; and it was while incautiously paddling
along the outer edge of the rice, with this intention, that
her canoe was seized by two of the swimmers. As soon
as these last ascertained that they had captured a squaw,
they did not give themselves the trouble to get into the
canoea very difficult operation with one made of bark,
and which is not loadedbut they set about towing the
captured craft to the shore, swimming each with a single
hand, and holding on by the other.
I shall not soon forget this kindness of yours,
Margery
,
said le Bourdon, with warmth, when the girl had
ended her simple tale, which had been related in the most
artless and ingenuous manner. No man could forget so
generous a risk on the part of a young woman in his
behalf
.
I hope you do not think it wrong, BourdonI should
be sorry to have you think ill of me!
Wrong, dear Margery!  but no matter. Let us get
ourselves out of present difficulties, and into a place of
safety; then I will tell you honestly what I think of it,
and of you, too. Was your brother awake, dear Margery,
when you left the family?
I believe nothe sleeps long and heavily after
drinking
.
But he can now drink no more, until he reaches the settlements.
Not unless he find the Whiskey Spring, returned
the bee-hunter, laughing.
The young man then related to his wondering
companion
the history of the mummery and incantations of
which she had been a distant spectator. Le Bourdon's
heart was light, after his hazards and escape, and his
spirits rose as his narrative proceeded. Nor was pretty
Margery in a mood to balk his humour. As the
bee-hunter
recounted his contrivances to elude the savages,
and most especially when he gave the particulars of the
manner in which he managed to draw whiskey out of the
living rock, the girl joined in his merriment, and filled the
boat with that melody of the laugh of her years and sex,
which is so beautifully described by Halleck.
CHAPTER X.
The things that once she loved are still the same;
Yet now there needs another name
To give the feeling which they claim,
While she the feeling gives;
She cannot call it gladness or delight;
And yet there seems a richer, lovelier light
On e'en the humblest thing that lives.
Washington Alston
.
The
history given by le Bourdon lasted until the canoes
reached the south shore. Glad enough was Dorothy to see
them both safe back, for neither of her companions had
yet awoke. It was then midnight, and all now retired to
seek the rest, which might be so needful to prepare them
for the exertions of the next day. The bee-hunter slept
in his canoe, while Margery shared the buffalo-skin of her
sister.
As perfect security, for the moment at least, was felt by
the sleepers, their slumbers were sound, and reached into
the morning. Then le Bourdon arose, and withdrawing
to a proper distance, he threw off his clothes and plunged
into the stream, in conformity with a daily practice of his
at that genial season of the year. After bathing, the young
man ascended a hill, whence he might get a good view of
the opposite shore, and possibly obtain some notion of
what the Pottawattamies were about. In all his
movements
,
however, the bee-hunter had an eye to the
concealment
of his person, it being of the last importance that
the savages should not learn his position. With the
intention
of concealment, the fire had been suffered to go
down, a smoke being a sign that no Indian would be likely
to overlook. As for the canoes and the bivouac of the
party, the wild rice, and an intermediate hill, formed a
perfect cover, so long as nothing was shown above them.
From the height to which he ascended, the bee-hunter,
aided by his glass, got a very clear view of Whiskey
Centre and the parts adjacent. The savages were already
stirring, and were busy in the various avocations of the
red man on a war-path. One party was disposing of the
body of their dead companion. Several were cooking, or
cleaning the wild fowl shot in the bay, while a group was
collected near the spot of the wished-for spring, reluctant
to abandon the hopes to which it had given birth, at the
very moment they were plotting to obtain the scalp of the
medicine-man. The beloved fire-water, that
seduces
so many to their destruction, who have enjoyed
the advantages of moral teaching, and which has been a
withering curse on the red man of this continent, still had
its influence; and the craving appetites of several of the
drunkards of the party brought them to the spot, as soon
as their eyes opened on the new day. The bee-hunter
could see some of this cluster kneeling on the rocks,
lapping
like hounds at the scattered little pools of the liquor,
while others scented around, in the hope of yet
discovering
the bird that laid the golden egg. Le Bourdon had
now little expectation that his assumed character could be
maintained among these savages any longer, did accident
again throw him in their way. The chiefs, he saw, had
distrusted him all along, but had given him an opportunity
to prove what he could do, in order to satisfy the more
vulgar curiosity of their young men. He wisely
determined
,
therefore, to keep out of the hands of his enemies.
Although le Bourdon could hold a conversation in the
tongue of the Ojebways, he was not fond of so doing. He
comprehended without difficulty nearly all of what was
said by them, and had observed the previous night that the
warriors made many allusions to a chief, whom they styled
Onoah, but who he himself knew was usually called
Scalping Peter, among the whites of that frontier. This
savage had a fearful reputation at all the garrisons, though
he never showed himself in them; and he was now spoken
of by the Pottawattamies present, as if they expected to
meet him soon, and to be governed by his commands or
his advice. The bee-hunter had paid great attention
whenever this dreaded name was mentioned, for he was
fully aware of the importance of keeping clear of an
enemy, who bore so bad a reputation, that it was not
considered
prudent for a white man to remain long in his
company
,
even in a time of peace. His English
sobriquet
had
been obtained from the circumstance of its being reputed
that this chief, who seemed to belong to no tribe in
particular
,
while he had great influence with all, had on divers
occasions murdered the pale-faces who fell in his way, and
then scalped them. It was added, that he had already
forty notches on his pole, to note that number of scalps
taken from the hated whites. In short, this Indian, a sort
of chief by birth, though of what tribe no one exactly
knew, appeared to live only to revenge the wrongs done
his colour by the intruders, who had come from towards
the rising sun to drive his people into the great salt lake,
on the other side of the Rocky Mountains. Of course
there was a good deal that was questionable in these
reports
;
a rumour in the openings and on the prairies,
having this general resemblance to those that circulate in
towns, and in drawing-rooms, and at feasts, that no one of
them all can be relied on as rigidly exact. But le
Bourdon
was still young, and had yet to learn how little of that
which we all hear is true, and how very much is false.
Nevertheless, as an Indian tradition is usually more
accurate
than a white man's written history, so is a rumour of
the forest generally entitled to more respect than the
ceaseless gossipings of the beings who would be affronted
were they not accounted civilized.
The bee-hunter was still on the elevated bit of ground,
making his observations, when he was joined by Margery.
The girl appeared fresh and handsome, after a night of
sleep, and coming from her dressing-room in a thicket, and
over a stream of sweet, running water; but she was sad
and thoughtful. No sooner had le Bourdon shaken her
hand, and repeated his thanks for the succour of the past
night, than the full heart of Margery poured out its
feelings
,
as the swollen stream overflows its banks, and began
to weep.
Brother is awake, she said, so soon as her sobs were
quieted by a powerful effort; but, as is usual with him
after hard drinking,
so
stupid, that Dolly cannot make him
understand our danger. He tells her he has seen too
many Injins to be afraid of these, and that they will never
harm a family that has brought so much liquor into their
country.
His senses must be at a low ebb, truly, if he counts
on Injin friendship because he has sold fire-water to the
young men! answered le Bourdon, with a nice
understanding
of not only Indian nature, but of human nature.
We may like the sin, Margery, while we detest the
tempter. I have never yet met with the man, pale-face
or red skin, who did not curse, in his sober moments, the
hand that fed his appetite while intoxicated.
I dare say that may be very true, returned the girl,
in a low voice; but one has need of his reason to
understand
it. What will become of us now, it is hard to
say!
Why,
now
, Margery, more than yesterday, or the day
before?
Yesterday there were no savages near us, and
Gershom
had all along told us he intended to start for the
garrison, at the head of the lake, as soon as he got back
from his visit to the openings. He
is
back; but not in a
state to protect his wife and sister from the red men, who
will be looking for us as soon as they can build a canoe,
or anything that will do to cross the river with.
Had they even a canoe, returned le Bourdon, coolly,
they would not know where to look for us. Thank
Heaven!
that
will be a job that would take some time;
nor is a bark canoe built in a minute. But, Margery, if
your brother be a little dull and heavy, after his debauch,
I
am sober, and as much awake as ever I was in my life.
Oh! you have no weakness like that of poor brother's,
to make you otherwise; but, Bourdon, you will naturally
wish to take care of yourself and your property, and will
quit us the first good opportunity. I'm sure that we have
Vol. I.  13
no right to expect you will stay a minute longer than it is
your interest to do so, and I do not know that I wish it.
Not wish it! Margery, exclaimed the bee-hunter, in
the manner of a disappointed man. I had supposed you
would
have wished my company. But, now I know the
countrary, I shall not much care how soon I go, or into
whose hands I fall.
It is strange how apt are those who ought to understant
one another so readily, to misinterpret each other's thoughts.
Margery had never seen the bee-hunter twenty-four hours
before, though she had often heard of him, and of his
success
in his art; for the fame of a man of good reputation
and active qualities spreads far on a frontier. The very
individual whose existence would be nearly overlooked in
a crowded region, shall be spoken of, and known by his
qualities, a hundred leagues from his place of residence,
when settlements are few and far apart. In this way,
Margery
had heard of Boden, or of Bourdon, as she called
him, in common with hundreds who, confounding his real
name with his
sobriquet
, made the mistake of using the
last, under the impression that it was the true appellation.
Margery had no other knowledge of French than the few
words gleaned in her slow progress along a frontier on
which, it is true, more of that language than of any other
was heard, but heard under circumstances that were not
particularly
favourable to the acquisition of a foreign tongue.
Had she understood the real meaning of Bourdon, she would have bitten off her tongue before she would have
once called Boden by such an appellation; though the
bee-hunter himself was so accustomed to his Canadian
nick-name, as to care no hing at all about it. But
Margery
did not like to give pain to any one; and, least of all,
would she desire to inflict it on the bee-hunter, though he
were only an acquaintance of a day. Still, Margery could
not muster sufficient courage to tell her new friend how
much he was mistaken, and that of all the youths she had
ever met, she would most prefer to keep him near her
brother
and sister in their distress; while the young man,
inspired
by a pure and infant passion, was just in the frame
of mind to believe the worst of himself, and of his claims
to the attention of her who had begun to occupy so many
of his thoughts.
No explanation occurring, our young people descended
from the hill, misconceiving each other's meaning and
wishes, and unhappy under the influence of an ideal source
of misery, when actual circumstances created so many that
were substantial and real. Gershom was found awake, but,
as his sister had described him, stupid and lethargic. The
bee-hunter at once saw that, in his present condition,
Whiskey Centre would still be an incumbrance rather than
of any service, in the event of an occasion for extraordinary
exertion. Margery had hinted that it usually took
twenty-four
hours to bring her brother entirely round, after one of
his serious debauches; and, within that time, it was more
than probable that the fate of the family would be decided.
Le Bourdon thought intently, during breakfast, of the
condition of his party, and of the best mode of proceeding,
while the pallid and anxious young creature at his side
believed he was deliberating solely on the best means of
extricating himself, and his store of honey, from the savages
on the other shore. Had the acquaintance between these
young people been of longer date than it actually was,
Margery could not have entertained a notion so injurious
to the bee-hunter, for a single moment; but there was
nothing
either violent, or depreciating, in supposing that one
so near being a total stranger would think first of himself
and his own interests, in the situation in which this young
man was now placed.
Little was said during the meal. Dorothy was habitually
silent; the result of grief and care. As for her husband,
he was too stupid to talk, though usually somewhat
garrulous
;
while the Indian seldom did two things at the same
time. This was the hour for acting; when that for talking
should arrive, he would be found equal to its duties.
Pigeonswing could either abstain from food, or could
indulge
in it without measure, just as occasion offered. He
had often gone for days without tasting a mouthful, with
the exception of a few berries, perhaps; and he had lain
about the camp-fire, a week at a time, gorging himself with
venison, like an anaconda. It is perhaps fortunate for the
American Indian, that this particular quality of food is so
very easy of digestion, since his excesses on it are
notorious
,
and so common to his habits as almost to belong
to his nature. Death might otherwise often be the
consequence
.
When the breakfast was ended, it was time to consult
about the future course. As yet, the Pottawattamies had
made no new discovery; but the sagacity of the red man
was ever to be feared, when it came to be merely a
question
of finding his foe in a forest.
We have obtained one advantage over the enemy,
said le Bourdon, by crossing the river. Water leaves no
trail; even had Crowsfeather a canoe, he might not know
where to go in it, in order to find us.
Dat not so, put in the Chippewa, a little dogmatically;
know we hab canoeknow cross river in him.
Why
should they know this, Pigeonswing? We may
have gone out upon the lake, or we may have gone up into
the oak openings again, for anything the Pottawattamies
can know to the contrary.
Tell you, not so. Know don't go on lake, cause wind
blow. Know don't go up river, cause dat hard work;
know come here, cause dat easy. Injin like to do what
easy, and pale-face do just what Injin do. Crowsfeather
make raft, pretty soon;
den
he come look arter scalp.
Yes, said Margery, gently; you had better load
your canoe at once, and go on the lake, while the savages
cannot reach you. The wind is fair for them that are to
go north; and I have heard you say that you are bound to
Mackinaw.
I shall load my canoe, and I shall load
yours
, too,
Margery; but I shall not go away from this family, so long
as any in it stand in need of my services.
Brother will be able to help us by afternoon. He
manages
a canoe well, when himself; so go, Bourdon, while
you can. I dare say you have a mother at home; or a
sisterperhaps a wife
Neither, interrupted the bee-hunter, with emphasis.
No one expects me; no one has a
right
to expect me.
The colour stole into pretty Margery's cheeks as she
heard these words, and a ray of comfort gleamed on an
imagination that, for the last hour, had been pourtraying
the worst. Still, her generous temper did not like the
idea of the bee-hunter's sacrificing himself for those who
had so few claims on him, and she could not but again
admonish
him of the necessity of losing no time.
You will think better of this, Bourdon, the girl
resumed
.
We are going south, and cannot quit the river
with this wind; but you could not have a better time to
go north, unless the wind blows harder than I think it
does.
The lake is a bad water for a canoe, when there is
much wind, put in Gershom, yawning after he had spoken,
as if the effort fatigued him. I wonder what we're all
doin' over on this side of the river! Whiskey Centre is a
good enough country for me; I'm going back to look arter
my casks, now I've breakfasted. Come, Doll; let's load
up, and be off.
You are not yourself, yet, Gershom, returned the
sorrowful wife, or you would not talk in this way. You
had better listen to the advice of Bourdon, who has done
so much for us already, and who will tell you the way to
keep out of Injin clutches. We owe our lives to Bourdon,
Gershom, and you should thank him for it.
Whiskey Centre muttered a few half-intelligible words
of thanks, and relapsed into his state of drowsy
indifference
.
The bee-hunter saw, however, that the effects of
the brandy were leaving him, and he managed to get him
on one side, where he persuaded the fellow to strip and go
into the water. The bath did wonders for the poor
creature
,
who soon got to be so far himself, again, as to be of
use, instead of being an incumbrance. When sober, and
more especially when sober for several consecutive days,
Gershom was a man of sufficient energy, possessing
originally
great personal strength and activity, which had been
essentially lessened, however, by his excesses in liquor. It
has already been stated what a different being he became,
in a moral point of view, after having been sober for any
length of time.
On his return from the bathing, le Bourdon again joined
the females. Margery had been weeping; but she smiled
in a friendly way, on meeting his eye, and appeared less
anxious for his departure than she had been an hour before.
13*
As the day advanced, and no signs of the savages were
seen, a sense of greater security began to steal over the
females, and Margery saw less necessity for the departure
of their new friend. It was true, he was losing a wind;
but the lake was rough, and after all it might be better to
wait. In short, now that no immediate danger was
apparent
,
Margery began to reason in conformity with her
wishes, as is so apt to be the case with the young and
inexperienced
.
The bee-hunter perceived this change in the
deportment of his fair friend, and was well enough disposed
to hope it would admit of a favourable construction.
All this time, the Chippewa had taken little visible
interest
in the state of the party to which he had now attached
himself. The previous evening had been fertile in
excitement
and in gratification, and he had since slept and ate to
his entire content. He was ready to meet events as they
might arise, and began to plot the means of obtaining more
Pottawattamie scalps. Let not the refined reader feel
disgust
at this exhibition of the propensities of an American
savage. Civilized life has had, and still has very many
customs, little less excusable than that of scalping.
Without
dragging into the account the thousand and one sins
that disgrace and deform society, it will be sufficient to
look into the single interest of civilized warfare, in order
to make out our case. In the first place, the noblest
strategy
of the art is, to put the greatest possible force on the
least of the enemy, and to slay the weaker party by the
mere power of numbers. Then, every engine that
ingenuity
can invent, is drawn into the conflict; and rockets,
revolvers, shells, and all other infernal devices, are resorted
to, in order to get the better of an enemy who is not
provided
with such available means of destruction. And after
the battle is over, each side commonly claims the victory;
sometimes, because a partial success has been obtained in
a small portion of the field; sometimes, because half a
dozen horses have run away with a gun, carrying it into
the hostile ranks; and, again, because a bit of rag has
fallen from the hands of a dead man, and been picked up
by one of the opposing side. How often has it happened
that a belligerent, well practised in his art, has kept his
own colours out of the affair, and then boasted that they
were not lost! Now, an Indian practises no such
shameless
expedients. His point of honour is not a bit of rag,
but a bit of his skin. He shaves his head because the
hair encumbers him; but he chivalrously leaves a
scalp-lock
,
by the aid of which his conqueror can the more easily
carry away the coveted trophy. The thought of cheating
in such a matter never occurs to his unsophisticated mind;
and as for leaving his colours in barracks, while he goes
into the field himself, he would disdain itnay, cannot
practise it; for the obvious reason that his head would
have to be left with them.
Thus was it with Pigeonswing. He had made his toilet
for the war-path, and was fierce in his paint, but honest
and fair-dealing in other particulars. If he could terrify
his enemies by looking like a skeleton, or a demon, it was
well; his enemy would terrify him, if possible, by similar
means. But neither would dream, or did dream, of
curtailing
,
by a single hair, that which might be termed the
flag-staff of his scalp. If the enemy could seize it, he was
welcome to the prize; but if he could seize that of the
enemy, no scruples on the score of refinement, or delicacy,
would be apt to interfere with his movements. It was in
this spirit, then, that Pigeonswing came to the canoe, where
le Bourdon was holding a little private discourse with
Margery
,
and gave utterance to what was passing in his mind.
Good time, now, get more scalp, Bourdon, said the
Chippewa, in his clipping, sententious English.
It is a good time, too, to keep our own, Chippewa,
was the answer. Your scalp-lock is too long, to be put
before Pottawattamie eyes without good looking after it.
Nebber mind himif go, go; if stay, stay. Always
good for warrior to bring home scalp.
Yes; I know your customs in this respect,
Pigeonswing
;
but ours are different. We are satisfied if we can
keep out of harm's way, when we have our squaws and
pappooses with us.
No pappoose here, returned the Indian, looking around
himdat your squaw, eh?
The reader can readily imagine that this abrupt question
brought blushes into the cheeks of pretty Margery, making
her appear ten times more handsome than before; while
even le Bourdon did not take the interrogatory wholly
undisturbed
.
Still, the latter answered manfully, as became
his sex.
I am not so fortunate as to have a squaw, and least of
all to have
this
, said le Bourdon.
Why no hab hershe good squaw, returned the
literal-minded
Indianhan'some 'nough for chief.
You
ask;
she
habknow squaw wellalways like warrior to ask him
fuss; den say, yes.
Ay, that may do with your red-skin squaws, le
Bourdon
hastily replied; for he saw that Margery was not only
distressed, but a little displeasedbut not with the young
women of the pale-faces. I never saw Margery before last
evening; and it takes time for a pale-face girl to know a
youth.
Just so wid red-skinsometime don't know, till too
late! See plenty dat, in wigwam.
Then it is very much in the wigwams as it is in the
houses. I have heard this before.
Why not same?skin make no differencepale-face
spile squaw, toomake too much of her.
That can
never
be! exclaimed le Bourdon, earnestly.
When a pretty, modest, warm-hearted young woman
accepts
a youth for a husband, he can never make
enough
of
her!
On hearing sentiments so agreeable to a woman's ears,
Margery looked down, but she looked pleased.
Pigeonswing
viewed the matter very differently; and being
somewhat
of a partisan in matters relating to domestic economy,
he had no thought of leaving a point of so much
importance
in so bad a way. Accordingly, it is not surprising
that, in pursuing the subject, he expressed opinions in
several
essentials diametrically the reverse of those of the
bee-hunter.
Easy 'nough spile squaw, rejoined the Chippewa.
`What she good for, don't make her work? Can't go on
war-pathcan't take scalpcan't shoot deercan't hunt
can't kill warriorso
muss
work. Dat what squaw good
for.
That may do among red men, but we pale-faces find
squaws good for something elsewe love them and take
care of themkeep them from the cold in winter, and
from the heat in summer; and try to make them as
comfortable
and happy as we can.
Dat good talk for young squaw's ear, returned the
Chippewa, a little contemptnously as to manner; though
his real respect for the bee-hunter, of whose prowess he
had so lately been a witness, kept him a little within
boundsbut it bess not take nobody in. What Injin
say to squaw, he dowhat pale-face say, he no do.
Is that true, Bourdon? demanded Margery, laughing
at the Indian's earnestness.
I shall be honest, and own that there may be some
truth in itfor the Injin promises nothing, or next to
nothing, and it is easy to square accounts, in such cases.
That white men undertake more than they always perform,
is quite likely to be the fact. The Injin gets his advantage
in this matter, by not even thinking of treating his wife as
a woman should be treated.
How should treat woman? put in Pigeonswing with
warmth. When warrior eat venison, gib her rest, eh?
Dat no goodwhat you call good, den? If good hunter
husband, she get 'noughif an't good hunter, she don't
get 'nough. Just so wid Injinsometime hungry,
sometime
full. Dat way to live!
Ay, that may be your red man's ways, but it is not the
manner in which we wish to treat our wives. Ask pretty
Margery, here, if she would be satisfied to wait until her
husband had eaten his dinner, and then come in for the
scraps. NonoPigeonswing: we feed our women and
children
first
, and come in last, ourselves.
Dat good for pappoosehe little; want venison
squaw tough; use to wait. Do her good.
Margery now laughed outright, at these specimens of
Indian gallantry, which only too well embody the code of
the red man's habits. Doubtless the heart has its influence
among even the most savage people, for nature has not put
into our breasts feelings and passions to be discarded by
one's own expedients, or wants. But no advocate of the
American Indian has ever yet been able to maintain that
woman fills her proper place in his estimate of claims. As
for Margery, though so long subject to the whims, passions,
and waywardness of a drunkard, she had reaped many of
the advantages of having been born in that woman's
paradise
,
New England. We are no great admirers of the
legacy left by the Puritan to his descendant, taken as an
inheritance in morals, manners, and customs, and as a
whole; though there are parts, in the way of codicils, that
there is no portion of the Christian world which might not
desire to emulate. In particular, do we allude to the
estimate
put upon, and the treatment received by their women.
Our allusion is not to the refinements and gracefulness of
polished intercourse; for of
them
, the Blarney Rock of
Plymouth has transmitted but a meagre account in the
inventory
,
and perhaps the less that is said about this portion
of the family property the better; but, dropping a few
degrees in the social scale, and coming down to the level
where we are accustomed to regard people merely as men
and women, we greatly question if any other portion of the
world can furnish a parallel to the manly, considerate,
rational and wisely discriminating care, that the New
England
husband, as the rule, bestows on his wife; the father
on his daughter; or the brother on his sister. Gershom
was a living, and, all things considered, a remarkable
instance
of these creditable traits. When sober, he was
uniformly
kind to Dorothy; and for Margery he would at any
time risk his life. The latter, indeed, had more power
over him than his own wife possessed, and it was her will
and her remonstrances that most frequently led him back
from the verge of that precipice over which he was so often
disposed to cast himself. By some secret link she bound
him closest to the family dwelling, and served most to recall
the days of youth and comparative innocence, when they
dwelt together beneath the paternal roof, and were equally
the objects of the affection and solicitude of the same kind
mother. His attachment to Dorothy was sincere, and, for
one so often brutalized by drink, steady; but Dorothy
could not carry him as far back, in recollections, as the
one only sister who had passed the morning of life with
him, in the same homely but comfortable abode.
We have no disposition to exaggerate the character of
those whom it is the fashion to term the American yeomen,
though why such an appellation should be applied to any
in a state of society to which legal distinctions are
unknown
,
is what we could never understand. There are
no more of Esquires and Yeomen in this country than there
are of Knights and Nobles, though the quiet manner in
which the transition from the old to the new state of things
has been made, has not rendered the public mind very
sensible
to the changes. But, recurring to the class, which
is a positive thing and consequently ought to have a name
of some sort or other, we do not belong to those that can
sound its praises without some large reservations on the
score of both principles and manners. Least of all, are we
disposed to set up these yeomen as a privileged class, like
certain of the titular statesmen of the country, and fall
down and worship a calfnot a golden one by the way
of our own setting up. We can see citizens in these
yeomen
,
but not princes, who are to be especially favoured by
laws made to take from others to bestow on them. But,
making allowances for human infirmities, the American
freeholder belongs to a class that may justly hold up its
head among the tillers of the earth. He improves daily,
under the influence of beneficent laws, and if he don't get
spoiled, of which there is some danger, in the eagerness
of factions to secure his favour, and through that favour
his
vote
,if he escape this danger, he will ere long make
a reasonably near approach to that being, which the tongue
of the flatterer would long since have persuaded him he had
already more than got to be.
To one accustomed to be treated kindly, as was the case
with Margery, the Chippewa's theory for the management
of squaws contained much to excite her mirth, as well as
her resentment, as she now made apparent by her remarks.
You do not deserve to
have
a wife, Pigeonswing, she
cried, half-laughing, yet evidently alive to the feelings of
her sex  can have no gratitude for a wife's tenderness
and care. I wonder that a Chippewa girl can be found to
have you!
Don't want him, coolly returned the Indian, making
his preparations to light his pipe  got Winnebagoe
squaw, already; good 'nough for me. Shoot her t'other
husband and take his scalpden she come into my
wigwam
.
The wretch! exclaimed Margery.
But this was a word the savage did not understand, and
he continued to puff at the newly lighted tobacco, with all
of a smoker's zeal. When the fire was secured, he found
time to continue the subject.
Yes, dat good war-path  got rifle; got wife; got
two
scalp! Don't do so well, ebbery day.
And that woman hoes your corn, and cooks your
venison
?
demanded the bee-hunter.
Sartaincapital good to hoeno good to cookmake
deer meat too dry. Want to be made to mind business.
Bye'm by teach him. No l'arn all at once, like pale-face
pappoose in school.
Pigeonswing, have you never observed the manner in
which the white man treats his squaw?
Sartainsee him make much of herput her in warm
corner  wrap blanket round her  give her venison 'fore
he eat himselfsee all dat, oftenwhat den?
Dat
don't
make it right.
I give you up, Chippewa, and agree with Margery in
thinking you ought not to have a squaw, at all.
T'ink alike denwhy no get marry? asked the Indian,
without circumlocution.
Margery's face became red as fire; then her cheeks
settled into the colour of roses, and she looked down,
embarrassed. The bee-hunter's admiration was very
apparent
to the Indian, though the girl did not dare to raise
her eyes from the ground, and so did not take heed of it.
But, this gossipping was suddenly brought to an end by a
most unexpected cause of interruption; the manner and
form of which it shall be our office to relate, in the
succeeding
chapter.
CHAPTER XI.
So should it befor no heart beats
Within his cold and silent breast;
To him no gentle voice repeats
The soothing words that make us blest.
Peabody
.
The
interruption came from Dorothy, who, on
ascending
the little height, had discovered a canoe coming into
the mouth of the river, and who was running, breathless
with haste, to announce the circumstance to the bee-hunter.
The latter immediately repaired to the eminence, and saw
for himself the object that so justly had alarmed the woman.
The canoe was coming in from the lake, after running
before the wind, which now began to abate a little in its
strength, and it evidently had been endeavouring to
proceed
to the northward. The reason for its entering the
river, was probably connected with the cookery or food of
the party, since the lake was each minute getting to be
safer, and more navigable for so light a craft. To le
Bourdon's great apprehension, he saw the savages on the
north shore making signals to this strange canoe, by means
of smoke, and he foresaw the probability of his enemies
obtaining the means of crossing the stream, should the
strangers proceed in the desired direction. To counteract
this design, he ran down to a spot on the beach where
there was no rice-plant, and showing himself to the
strangers
,
invited them to land on the south side, which was
much the nearest, and in other visible respects quite as
convenient as the opposite bank of the river. One of the
strangers soon made a gesture with an arm, implying
assent, and the bows of this strange canoe were
immediately
turned toward the spot where the bee-hunter stood.
As the canoe drew near, the whole party, including
Pigeonswing, came to the margin of the water to receive
the strangers. Of the last, there were three; one paddling
at each end of the light bark, and a third seated in its
Vol. I.  14
centre, doing nothing. As the bee-hunter had his glass,
with which he examined these visitors, he was soon
questioned
by his companions concerning their character and
apparent purposes.
Who are they, Bourdon? demanded the impatient
Margery,and why do they come here?
The last is a question they must answer for themselves,
but the person paddling in the bows of the canoe seems to
be a white man, and a soldier  or a half-soldier, if one
may judge from his dress. The man in the middle of the
canoe is white, also. This last fellow seems to be a par
son  yes, he
is
a clergyman, though pretty well used up
in the wilderness, as to dress. The third man is a
red-skin
,
beyond all doubt.
A clergyman! repeated Margery, in surprise. What
should a clergyman be doing here?
There are missionaries scattered about among the
savages, I suppose you know, and this is probably one of
them. A body can tell one of these parsons by his
outside
,
as far as he can see him. The poor man has heard
of the war, most likely, and is trying to get back into the
settlements, while his scalp is safe on his head.
Don't hurt
him
, put in the Chippewa, pointedly.
Know
mean
well  talk about Great Spirit  Injin don't
scalp sich medicine-men  if don't mind what he say, no
good to take his scalp.
I'm glad to hear this, Pigeonswing, for I had begun
to think
no
man's scalp was safe under
your
fingers. But
what can the so'ger be doing down this a-way? A body
would think there was business enough for all the so'gers
up at the garrison, at the head of the lake. By the way,
Pigeonswing, what has become of your letter to the
captain
at Fort Dearborn, to let him know of the war?
Chaw him up, like so much `baccy, answered the
Chippewa  yes, chaw him up, lest Pottawattamie get
hold on him, and ask one of King George's men to read
him. No good to hab letter in sich times.
The general who employed you to carry that letter,
will scarce thank you for your care.
Yes he dot'ank all same  pay all same  letter no
use, now.
How can you know that? The letter might be the
means of preventing the garrison from falling into the
enemy's hands.
Got dere, already. Garrison all kill, scalp, or pris'ner.
Pottawattamie talk tell me
dat
.
Is this possible! Mackinaw and Chicago both gone,
already! John Bull must have been at work among the
savages a long time, to get them into this state of
readiness
!
Sartain  work long as can 'member.
Alway
somebody
talkin' for Great Montreal Fadder among red men.
It must be as you say, Chippewabut, here are our
visitorslet us see what we can make of
them
.
By this time, the canoe was so near as to render it easy
to distinguish countenances and dress, without the aid of
the glassso near, indeed, that a swift-moving boat, like
the canoe, might be expected soon to reach the shore.
The truth of the observation of the bee-hunter was
confirmed
,
as the strangers approached. The individual in
the bows of the canoe was clearly a soldier, in a fatigue
dress, and the musket between his legs was one of those
pieces that government furnishes to the troops of the line.
The man in the middle of the boat could no more be
mistaken
than he in its bows. Each might be said to be in
uniform;  the well-worn, nay, almost thread-bare black
coat of the minister, as much denoting him to be a man
of peace, as the fatigue-jacket and cap on the person of
his hard-featured and weather-beaten companion indicated
that the last was a man of war. As for the red man,
Pigeonswing declared that he could not yet tell his tribe,
though there was that about his air, attire and carriage,
that proclaimed him a chiefand, as the Chippewa
fancied
,
a chief of note. In another minute, the bows of the
light craft grated gently on the shingle of the beach.
Sago, sago, said the soldier, rising to step ashore
sago all, friends, and I hope we come to a welcome
camp.
You are welcome, returned the bee-hunter.
Welcome
as strangers met in the wilderness, but more
welcome
,
as I see by your dress that you are a veteran of one
of Uncle Sam's regiments.
Quite true, Mr. Bee-hunter; for such I see is
your
callin', by the honey vessel and glass you carry, and by the
other signs about you. We are travelling towards
Mackinaw
,
and hope to fare as friends, while we stay in your
good company.
In going to Mackinaw, do you expect to meet with an
American
, or an
English
garrison?
One of our own, to be sure, returned the soldier,
looking
up from his work, like one struck by the question.
Mackinaw has fallen, and is now an English post, as
well as Chicago.
This, then, must alter our plans, Mr. Amen!
exclaimed
the soldier, addressing the minister. If the
enemy has Mackinaw, it will not do for us to trust
ourselves
on the island.
Amen was not the real name of the missionary; but
it was a
sobriquet
bestowed by the soldiers, on account of
the unction with which this particular word was ordinarily
pronounced, and quite likely, too, because it was the word
of all others most pleasant to their ears, after a sermon, or
a prayer. It had, by long use, got to be so familiar, that
the men did not scruple to use it to the good man's face.
This missionary was a Methodist; a sect that possessed,
in that day, very few clergymen of education, most of its
divines coming of a class in life that did not predispose
them to take offence at light invasions on their dignity,
and whose zeal and habitual self-denial had schooled them
into a submission to far more positive personal privations,
than any connected with the mere tongue. That there are
wolves in sheep's clothing among the Methodists, as
well as among the other religious sects of the country, our
daily experience shows; but the mind must be sadly
inclined
to believe evil of others which does not see, in the
humble and untiring efforts of this particular sect of
Christians
,
more than mere fanaticism or hypocrisy can produce.
You are right, corporal, returned the missionary;
since this is the case, I see no better course for us to
pursue, than to put ourselves altogether in the hands of
Onoah. He has counselled us well, hitherto, and will do
better by us than any other guide to be found, out in this
wilderness.
Le Bourdon could scarce trust his sense of hearing!
Onoah was the Indian appellation of the terrible and much
dreaded savage who, in English, went by the name of
Scalping Peter, or Scalping Pete, among all the white
dwellers on that frontier, and at all the garrisons of the
Americans, far and near. The Indian name, indeed, was
said to mean scalp, in several of the dialects of the
Iroquois. Perhaps it may be well, also, to explain here,
that the term garrison did not imply, in the language of
that region, the troops only who garrisoned a post, but it
was even oftener applied to the post itself, than to those
who held it. Thus old, empty, and deserted forts, those
that have actually been abandoned, and are devoted to
decay
,
are almost universally styled the garrisons, even
though a soldier had not put foot in them for a quarter of
a century. This is one of the proofs of the convertible
nature of our language, of which the country affords so
many, and which has changed the smaller sized rivers
into creeks, lakes into ponds, squares into
parks, public promenades on the water into batteries;
to all of which innovations, bad as they may be, and useless
and uncalled for, and wanton as they are, we are much
more willing to submit, than to the new-fangled and
lubberly
abomination of saying
on
a steamboat, or
on
a
ship.
While le Bourdon was so much astounded at hearing the
terrible name of Onoah, which was familiar enough to him,
neither of his white companions betrayed any emotion.
Had the Indian been termed Scalping Peter, it is
probable
that both Dorothy and Margery would have screamed,
if not actually fled; but they knew nothing of the
appellation
that was given to this mysterious chief, in the language
of the red men. To this circumstance, therefore, was it
owing that the utterance of his name did not produce a
general commotion. The bee-hunter observed,
nevertheless
,
a great change in the demeanour of the Chippewa,
the instant the missionary had uttered the ominous word,
though he did not seem to be alarmed. On the contrary,
Boden fancied that his friend, Pigeonswing, was pleased,
rather than terrified, at ascertaining the character of their
visitor, though he no longer put himself forward, as had
14*
been the case previously; and from that moment the young
warrior appeared to carry himself in a more subdued and
less confident manner than was his wont. This unexpected
demeanour on the part of his friend, somewhat confounded
le Bourdon, though it in a degree relieved his apprehensions
of any immediate danger. All this time, the conversation
between the missionary and the corporal went on in as
quiet and composed a manner, as if each saw no ground
for any other uneasiness than that connected with the fall
of Mackinaw.
Yes, sir, returned the soldier, Onoah is a good
guide, and a great hand at a council-fire; but these is
war-times
,
and we must stand to our arms, each accordin' to
his edication and temper  you, sir, with preachin' and
prayin', and I with gun and baggonet.
Ah! corporal, the preaching and praying would be of
quite as much account with you men of war, as your arms
and ammunition, if you could only be made to think so.
Look at Fort Dearborn! It was defended by human
means, having its armed band, and its guns and swords,
and captains and corporals; yet you have seen their pride
lowered, their means of defence destroyed, and a large part
of your comrades massacred. All this has been done to
armed men, while the Lord has brought
me
, an unarmed
and humble teacher of his word, safely out of the hands of
the Philistines, and placed me here in safety, on the shores
of the Kalamazoo.
For that matter, Mr. Amen, the Lord has done the
same by
me
, with a musket on my shoulder and a baggonet
by my side, returned the literal corporal. Preachin'
may be good on some marches; but arms and ammunition
answers well enough on others. Hearken to the Hebrew,
who knows all the ways of the wilderness, and see if he
don't give you the same opinion.
The Hebrew is one of the discarded of the Lord, as he
is one chosen of the Lord! returned the missionary. I
agree with you, however, that he is as safe an adviser, for
a human adviser, as can be easily found; therefore will I
consult him. Child of the seed of Abraham, he added,
turning to Onoah, thou hast heard the tidings from
Mackinaw; we cannot think, any longer, of pursuing our
journey in that direction; whither, then, wouldst thou
advise
that we shall direct our steps? I ask this question of
thee
first, as an experienced and sagacious dweller in the
wilderness: at a more fitting time, I intend to turn to the
Lord, and seek divine aid for the direction of our footsteps.
Ay, observed the corporal, who entertained a good
deal of respect for the zealous, but slightly fanatical
missionary
,
though he believed an Indian was always safe to
consult in matters of this sort, try
both
if one staff
should fail, it may be well to have another to lean on. A
good soldier always keeps a part of his troops for a resarve.
I remember when Mad Anthony gave the command to
charge the inemy, at the Mawmee, we was all for going
forward like so many furious devils, but the old man
said, `No; keep them men in resarve,' he said, `for no
one knows when his flank may be turned, or he may catch
a volley from his rear.' Well, what does Onoah tell you,
Mr. Amen?
By this time the strange Indian had landed, thus giving
le Bourdon an opportunity of examining his person and
attire more closely than he had hitherto done. This
renowned
savagerenowned, as fame is regarded on a
fronttier
,
where the posts of the whites were then a hundred
leagues asunderwas in the summer-dress of the woods,
and any one acquainted with the customs of the North
American Indian could at once perceive that he bore on
his person the symbols of authority and rank. The
insignia
of the Golden Fleece, or of the Saint Esprit, are not
more infallible evidences of high personal degree among
the nobles of Europe, than were the emblems borne by this
savage, of his consideration among the people of his colour
and origin, along the shores of those wild and inland seas
of fresh water, which then were seldom ploughed by a keel;
which have since got to be familiar with the steamer, the
propeller, brig, ship, and schooner; and which, ere the
close of the present century, will, in all probability, be
whitened, like the Mediterranean, with the canvass of the
thousand craft that will be required for the navigation of
their borders.
[3]
[3]
In crossing lake Erie, within the last few months, the writer, in
a run of twenty-four hours, counted no less than sixty-three vessels,
met, overtaken, and seen. He remembers that water, in the first
ten years of the present century, when a single sail was an object
of interest and curiosity. The change must have been witnessed
to be appreciated.
Around his neck Onoah wore what might
be termed a gorget of tubes, made of the red pipe-stone of
the west, and which were carved and wrought with care,
if not with much skill. Above this he had a rude
representation
of a rattlesnake drawn on his breast with yellow
paint. This was understood to be the tolem, or arms,
of his tribe; though what that tribe was, where it dwelt,
or whence it came, it was commonly believed among both
the red-skins and pale-faces of the region, no one but
himself
knew. On a small silver medal that was suspended
above the gorget was stamped the image of that cross on
which the Son of God, in his human character, suffered
death for the redemption of men. It would seem that this
savage, keen, sharp-witted, and observant as he was, though
not a believer in the doctrines inculcated by the Bible, had
none of that holy horror of this sacred emblem that so
singularly besets the imaginations of many who profess to
place all their hopes of salvation on the sacrifice that was
made on its great original. He wore an ancient medal of
the Jesuits, one that had passed through generations of his
family, as a political rather than as a religious symbol,
though perfectly aware of the spirit in which it had been
first bestowed. He probably saw that the cross was
revered
by one class of missionaries, while another scarce
endeavoured to conceal their distaste for it, a circumstance
that might have confounded a neophyte of less acuteness
than himself.
[4]
[4]
In the times of the crusades, the cross was adopted as an
emblem
of general use. All the castles and churches were adorned
with this touching memorial of the origin of the Christian faith, in
beautiful commemoration of the price paid for human salvation.
Apertures were made for the windows, and a stone cross was
erected in each, whence the French term of `
croisee
.' The same
thing was done for the doors, which, by removing the panels,
would be found to contain so many crosses. This last custom
became
general, and a cross, or crosses, are to be found at this very
hour in nearly every old panelled door in the country, even to
the humblest dwellings of the descendants of the Puritans and
Quakers. Ignorance preserved the emblems at the very moment
these pious and critical saints were throwing aside gowns and
cassocks
,
church music and kneeling, along with everything else that,
by the perversity of human ingenuity, could be made to appear
connected
,
in the remotest degree, with the simplicity of human faith.
There is something amusing in finding these quiet little material
emblems of the crucifixion entrenching themselves in the very
bed-rooms and cupboards (to use the vernacular) of `the saints,'
par excellence
, at the precise period when not only their voices, but
their hands were raised to dislodge them from that most
appropriate
of all positions, the summit of the cburch-spirethat silent
finger pointing to the skiesin order to put (still in honour of the
vernacular) a rooster in its stead!
Beneath the rattlesnake, or tolem of his tribe, Onoah
had rudely drawn an expanded hand, in that attitude which
denotes caution, or beware. This might be termed the
motto of his coat of arms; the
gare  qui la touche
,
or noli me tangere, of his device.
The head was shaved, as is usual with a warrior,
carrying
only the chivalrous scalp-lock, but the chief was not
in his paint. The outline of this celebrated savage's
features
was bold and eagle-like; a comparison that his steady,
calm, piercing eye well sustained. The chin was full and
expanded, the lips compressed and firm, the teeth were
short, but even and sound, his smile courteous, and, at
times, winning.
In the way of attire, Onoah was simply dressed,
consulting
the season and his journey. He had a single eagle's
feather attached to the scalp-lock, and wore a belt of
wampum
of more than usual value, beneath which he had
thrust his knife and tomahawk; a light, figured, and fringed
hunting-shirt of cotton covered his body, while leggings of
deer-skin, with a plain moccasin of similar material, rose
to his knee. The latter, with the lower part of a stout
sinewy thigh, was bare. He also carried a horn and
pouch, and a rifle of the American rather than of the
military
fashion  that is, one long, true, and sighted to the
deviation of a hair.
On landing, Peter (for so he was generally called by the whites, when in courtesy they omitted the prefix of
scalping
)
courteously saluted the party assembled around the
bow of the canoe. This he did with a grave countenance,
like a true American, but in simple sincerity, so far as
human eye could penetrate his secret feelings. To each
man he offered his hand, glancing merely at the two females;
though it may be questioned if he ever before had looked
upon so perfect a picture of female loveliness as Margery
at that precise instant presented, with her face flushed with
excitement, her spirited blue eye wandering with curiosity,
and her beautiful mouth slightly parted in admiration.
Sago, sago! said Peter, in his deep, guttural
enunciation
,
speaking reasonably good English. Sago, sago all,
ole and young, friend come to see you, and eat in your
wigwamwhich head-chief, eh?
We have neither wigwam nor chief here, answered
le Bourdon, though he almost shrunk from taking the hand
of one of whom he had heard the tales of which this savage
had been the hero; we are common people, and have no
one among us who holds the States' commission. I live
by taking honey, of which you are welcome to all you can
want, and this man is a helper of the suttlers at the
garrisons
.
He was travelling south to join the troops at the
head of the lake, and I was going north to Mackinaw, on
my way in, towards the settlements.
Why is my brother in such haste? demanded Peter,
mildly. Bees get tired of making honey?
The times are troubled, and the red men have dug up
the hatchet; a pale-face cannot tell when his wigwam is
safe.
Where my brodder wigwam? asked Peter, looking
warily around him. See he an't here; where is he?
Over in the openings, far up the Kalamazoo. We left
it last week, and had got to the hut on the other shore,
when a party of Pottawattamies came in from the lake, and
drove us over here for safety.
On hearing this, Peter turned slowly to the missionary,
raising a finger as one makes a gesture to give emphasis to
his words.
Tole you so, said the Indian. Know dere was
Pottawattamie
dere. Can tell 'em great way off.
We fear them, having women in our party, added the
bee-hunter, and think they might fancy our scalps.
Dat like enough; all Injin love scalp in war-time. You
Yankee, dey Br'ish; can't travel on same path now, and not
quarrel. Muss not let Pottawattamie catch you.
How are we to help it, now you have come in. We
had all the canoes on this side of the river, and were pretty
safe, but should you cross and place your canoe in their
hands, there is nothing to prevent them from doing what
they please with us. If you will promise not to cross the
river till we can get out well on the lake, we may shift our
ground, however, and leave no trail.
Muss cross overyes, muss cross over, else
Pottawattamie
t'ink it strangeyes, muss cross over. Shan't touch
canoe, dough.
How can you help it, if they be so minded? You are
but a single man, and they are twenty?
On hearing this, Corporal Flint pricked up his ears, and
stood if possible more erect than ever, for he considered
himself a part of a man at least, and one moreover who
had served in all the wars of the west, from the great battle
of St. Clair to that of Mad Anthony. He was spared the
necessity of a reply, however, for Peter made a significant
gesture which as much as told him that he would take that
office on himself.
No need be afeard, said Peter, quietly. Know
Pottawattamie
know
all chief. Nobody touch canoe of Onoah
when he say don't touch him.
Yet they are Injins of the British, and I see you here
in company with a soldier of Uncle Sam.
No matter; Onoah go just where he please. Sometime
to Pottawattamie; sometime to Iroquois. All Ojebways
know Onoah. All Six Nation know him well. All Injin
know him. Even Cherokee know him now, and open
ears when he speak. Muss cross river, and shake hand
with Crowsfeather.
There was nothing boastful, or vaunting, in Peter's
manner
while he thus announced his immunity or power, but
he alluded to it in a quiet, natural way, like one
accustomed
to being considered a personage of consequence.
Mankind, in general, make few allowances for the
influence
of habit; the sensibilities of the vain-glorious
themselves
being quite as often wounded by the most natural
and direct allusions of those who enjoy advantages superior
to their own, as by those that are intended to provoke
comparisons
.
In the present instance, however, no such feeling
could exist, the Indian asserting no more than his extended
reputation would fully maintain.
When Peter had thus expressed himself, the missionary
thought it meet to add a few words in explanation. This
he did, however, aside, walking a little apart with the
bee-hunter
,
in order so to do. As for Gershom, no one seemed
to think him of sufficient importance to throw away any
interest or care on him.
You can trust to Peter, friend bee-hunter, the
missionary
observed, for what he promises he will perform.
I know him well, and have put myself altogether in his
hands. If he says that the Pottawattamies are not to have
his canoe, the Pottawattamies will not get it. He is a man
to be depended on.
Is not this, then, Scalping Peter, who bears so terrible
a name on all this frontier? demanded le Bourdon.
The same; but do not disturb yourself with
names:
they hurt no one, and will soon be forgotten. A
descendant
of Abraham, and of Isaac, and of Jacob, is not placed
in this wilderness by the hand of divine power for no
purpose
;
since he is here, rely on it, it is for good.
A descendant of Abraham, and Isaac, and Jacob! Is
not Peter, then, a red-skin and an Injin?
Certainly; though no one knows his
tribe
but myself.
I know it, friend bee-hunter, and shortly shall proclaim it
throughout the length and breadth of the land. Yes, it
has been given to
me
to make this important discovery,
though I sometimes think that Peter himself is really as
ignorant as all around him of the tribe to which he
properly
belongs.
Do you wish to keep it a secret from me, too? I own
that, in my eyes, the tribe of a red-skin goes a good way in
making up my opinion of the man. Is he a Winnebagoe?
No, my friend, the Winnebagoes have no claims on
him at all.
Nor a Pottawattamie, Ottawa, or Ojebway of any sort?
He is none of these. Peter cometh of a nobler tribe
than any that beareth such names.
Perhaps he is an Injin of the Six Nations? They tell
me that many such have found their way hither since the
war of the revolution.
All that may be true, but Peter cometh not of
Pottawattamie
,
Ottawa, nor Ojebway.
He can hardly be of the Sacs or the Foxes; he has
not the appearance of an Injin from a region so far west.
Neither, neither, neither, answered Parson Amen, now
so full of his secret as fairly to let it overflow. Peter is
a son of Israel; one of the lost children of the land of
Judea
,
in common with many of his red brethrenmind, I
do not say
all
, but with
many
of his red brethrenthough
he may not know exactly of what tribe himself. This last
point has exercised me greatly, and days and nights have I
pondered over the facts. Turn to Genesis xlix and 14th,
and there will you find all the authorities recorded. `
Zebulon
shall dwell at the haven of the sea.' That refers to
some other red brother, nearer to the coast, most clearly.
`Issachar is a strong ass, crouching down between two
burdens
;'
`and bowed his shoulder to bear, and became a
servant
unto tribute.' That refers, most manifestly, to the
black man of the southern states, and cannot mean Peter.
`Dan shall be a serpent by the way, an adder in the path.'
There is the red man for you, drawn with the pencil of
truth! `Gad, a troop shall overcome him.' Here,
corporal
,
come this way and tell our new friend how Mad
Anthony
with his
troopers
finally routed the red-skins. You
were there, and know all about it. No language can be
plainer: until the `long-knives and leather-stockings' came
into the woods, the red man had his way. Against
them
,
he
could
not prevail.
Yes, returned Corporal Flint, who delighted in
talking
of the wars, it was very much as Parson Amen says.
The savages, by their nimbleness and artifices, would first
ambush us, and then break away from our charges, until
the gin'ral bethought him of bringing cavalry into the
wilderness
.
Nobody ever thought of such a plan, until old
Anthony invented it. As soon as we got the fire of the
savages, at the Mawmee, we charged with the baggonet,
and put 'em up; and no sooner was they up, than away
went the horse into them, flourishing the `long knife,' and
pressing the heel of the `leather-stocking' into the flanks
of their beasts. Mr. Amen has found a varse in Scriptur's
that does come near to the p'int, and almost foretells our
Vol. I.  15
victory, and that, too, as plain as it stood in despatches,
arterward, from head-quarters.
`Gad, a
troop
shall overcome him,'  put in the
missionary
,
triumphantly.
That's itthat's it; there was just one troop on 'em,
and not a man more! Mad Anthony said a troop would
answer, arter we had put the red-skins up out of their
ambushes
,
or any other bushes; and so it did. I must
acknowledge
that I think more of the Scriptur's than ever,
since Parson Amen read to me that varse.
Hearken unto this, friend bee-hunter, added the
missionary
,
who by this time had fairly mounted his hobby,
and fancied he saw a true Israelite in every other Indian
of the west. and tell me if words were ever more
prophetic
`Benjamin shall ravin as a wolf; in the morning
he shall devour his prey, and at night he shall divide the
spoil.' The art of man could not draw a more faithful
picture of these Indians.
Boden was not much skilled in sacred lore, and scarce
knew what to make of all this. The idea that the
American
Indians were the descendants of the lost tribes of Israel
was entirely new to him; nor did he know anything to
boast of, touching those tribes, even in their palmiest days,
and while in possession of the promised land; still he had
some confused recollection of that which he had read
when a childwhat American has not?and was enabled
to put a question or two, in return for the information now
received.
What, do you take the savages of America for Jews?
he asked, understanding the general drift of the
missionary's
meaning.
As sure as you are there, friend bee-hunter, though
you are not to suppose that I think Peter Onoah of the
tribe of Benjamin. No, I turn to the 21st verse for the
tribe of Peter. Naphthali  Naphthalis, the root of his
stock. `Naphthali is a hind, let loose: he giveth goodly
words.' Now, what can be plainer than this? A hind let
loose is a deer running at large, and, by a metaphor, that
deer includes the man that hunts him. Now, Peter has
beenway, is stilla renowned hunter, and is intended to
be enumerated among the hinds let loose: `he giveth
goodly words,' would set that point at rest, if anything
were wanting to put it beyond controversy, for Onoah is
the most eloquent speaker ear ever listened to! No one,
that has ever heard him speak, can doubt that he is the
one who `giveth goodly words.'
To what other circumstance the well-intentioned
missionary
would next have alluded, in the course of this
demonstration
of a theory that had got to be a favourite with
him, is more than can now be related, since the Indian
himself drew near, and put an end to the conversation.
Peter had made up his mind to cross the river at once;
and came to say as much to his companions, both of whom
he intended to leave behind him. Le Bourdon could not
arrest this movement, short of an appeal to force; and
force he did not like to use, doubting equally its justice
and its prudence.
CHAPTER XII.
There is no other land like thee,
No dearer shore;
Thou art the shelter of the free;
The home, the port of liberty
Thou hast been, and shalt ever be
'Till time is o'er.
Ere I forget to think upon
My land, shall mother curse the son
She bore.
Percival
.
The
independent, not to say controlling, manner of
Peter, would seem to put all remonstrances and arguments
at defiance. Le Bourdon soon had occasion to see that
both the missionary and the corporal submitted to his
wishes, and that there was no use in gainsaying anything
he proposed. In all matters he did as he pleased; his two
companions submitting to his will as completely as if one
of them had seen in this supposed child of Israel, Joshua,
the son of Nun, and the other even Aaron, the high priest,
himself.
Peter's preparations were soon made. Everything
belonging
to the missionary and the corporal was removed
from the canoe, which then contained only the extra
clothing
and the special property of the Indian himself. As
soon as ready, the latter quietly and fearlessly paddled
away, his canoe going easily and swiftly down before the
wind. He had no sooner got clear of the rice, than the
bee-hunter and Margery ran away to the eminence, to
watch his movements, and to note his reception among the
Pottawattamies. Leaving them there, we shall accompany
the canoe, in its progress towards the northern shore.
At first, Peter paddled quietly on, as if he had no other
object before him than the passage of the river. When
quite clear of the rice, however, he ceased, and undid his
bundle of clothes, which were carefully put away in the
knapsack of a soldier. From this repository of his effects,
the chief carefully drew forth a small bundle, on opening
which, no less than seven fresh human scalps appeared.
These he arranged, in order, on a wand-like pole, when,
satisfied with the arrangement, he resumed the paddle.
It was apparent, from the first, that the Pottawattamies on
the north shore had seen the strange canoe when it entered
the river, and they now collected in a group, at the
ordinary
landing beneath the
chient
, to await its approach.
Peter ceased his own exertions, as soon as he had got
within a hundred yards of the beach, took the scalp-pole
in his hand, arose, and permitted the canoe to drift down
before the wind, certain it would take the desired direction,
from the circumstance of his having placed it precisely to
windward of the landing. Once or twice he slowly waved
the pole in a way to draw attention to the scalps, which
were suspended from its end, each obvious and distinct
from its companions.
Napoleon, when he returned from the campaign of
Austerlitz
;
or Wellington, when he entered the House of
Commons
to receive the thanks of its speaker, on his return
from Spain; or the chief of all the battles of the Rio Bravo
del Norte; or him of the valley of Mexico, whose exploits
fairly rival those of Cortes himself, could scarcely be a
subject of greater interest to a body of spectators,
assembled
to do him honour, than was this well-known Indian,
as he drew near to the Pottawattamies, waving his scalps,
in significant triumph! Glory, as the homage paid by man
to military renown is termed, was the common impulse
with them all. It is true, that, measured by the standards
of reason and right, the wise and just might find motives
for appreciating the victories of those named differently
from the manner in which they are usually regarded
through the atmosphere of success; but in the common
mind it was all glory, alike. The name of Onoah
passed in murmurs of admiration, from mouth to mouth;
for, as it appeared, the person of this renowned Indian was
recognised by many on the shore, some time ere he reached
it himself.
Crowsfeather, and the other chiefs, advanced to meet
the visitor; the young men standing in the background, in
respectful admiration. Peter now stepped from the canoe,
and greeted each of the principal men with the courteous
gravity of a savage. He shook hands with each, calling
one or two by name, a proof of the parties having met
before; then the following dialogue occurred. All spoke
in the tongue of the Pottawattamies, but, as we have had
occasion to remark on previous occasions, it is to be
presumed
that the reader would scarcely be able to
understand
what was said, were we to record it, word for word,
in the language in which it was uttered. In consequence
of this difficulty, and for other reasons to which it may not
be necessary to allude, we shall endeavour to translate that
which passed, as closely as the English idioms will permit
us so to do.
My father is very welcome! exclaimed Crowsfeather,
who, by many degrees, exceeded all his companions in
consideration
and rank. I see he has taken many scalps, as
is his practice, and that the pale-faces are daily getting to
be fewer. Will the sun ever rise on that day when their
wigwams will look like the branches of the oak in winter?
Can my father give us any hope of seeing that hour?
It is a long path from the salt-lake out of which the
sun rises, to that other salt-lake in which it hides itself at
night. The sun sleeps each night beneath water, but it is
15*
so hot that it is soon dried when it comes out of its bed in
the morning. This is the Great Spirit's doings, and not
ours. The sun is
his
sun; the Indians can warm
themselves
by it, but they cannot shorten its journey a single
tomahawk-handle's length. The same is true of time; it
belongs to the Manitou, who will lengthen, or shorten it,
as he may see fit. We are his children, and it is our duty
to submit. He has not forgotten us. He made us with
his own hand, and will no more turn us out of the land
than a father will turn his child from the wigwam.
We hope this is so; but it does not
seem
thus to our
poor weak eyes, Onoah. We count the pale-faces, and
every summer they grow fast as the grass on the prairies.
We can see more when the leaf falls than when the tree is
in bud; and, then, more when the leaf is in bud than when
it falls. A few moons will put a town where the pine stood,
and wigwams drive the wolves from their homes. In a few
years we shall have nothing but dogs to eat, if the pale-face
dogs do not eat us.
Squaws are impatient, but men know how to wait.
This land was given to the red man by the Great Spirit, as
I have often told you, my children; if he has let in the
pale-faces for a few winters, it is to punish us for having
done wrong. Now that we are sorry for what we have done,
he will help us to drive away the strangers, and give us the
woods again to hunt in by ourselves. Have not messengers
from our Great Father in Montreal been among the
Pottawattamies
to strengthen their hearts?
They are always whispering in the ears of our tribes.
I cannot remember the time when whisperers from
Montreal
have not been among us. Their blankets are warm,
their fire-water is strong, their powder is good, and their
rifles shoot well; but all this does not stop the children
of Uncle Sam from being more at night than they were in
the morning. The red men get tired of counting them.
They have become plentier than the pigeons in the spring.
My father has taken many of their scalps, but the hair must
grow after his knife, their scalps are still so many.
See! rejoined Peter, lowering his pole so that all might
examine his revolting trophies, these come from the
soldiers
at the head of the lake. Black-bird was there with
his young men; no one of them all got as many scalps!
This is the way to stop the white pigeons from flying over
us in such flocks as to hide and darken the sun.
Another murmur of admiration passed through the
crowd, as each young warrior bent forward to count the
number of the scalps, and to note, by signs familiar to
themselves, the ages, sex, and condition of the different
victims. Here was another, among a hundred others of
which they had heard, of the prowess of the mysterious
Onoah, as well as of his inextinguishable hatred of the race
that was slowly, but unerringly, supplanting the ancient
stock, causing the places that once knew the people of
their tribes to know them no more. As soon as this
little burst of feeling had subsided, the conversation went on.
We have had a pale-face medicine-man among us,
Onoah, continued Crowsfeather, and he has so far
blinded us that we know not what to think.
The chief then recounted the leading events of the visit
of the bee-hunter to the place, stating each occurrence
fairly, as he understood it, and as fairly confessing that
even the chiefs were at a loss to know what to make of the
affair. In addition to this account, he gave the mysterious
Onoah the history of the prisoner they had taken, the death
of Elksfoot, their intention to torture that very morning the
Chippewa they had captured, and his flight, together with
the loss of their young man, and the subsequent escape of
their unknown enemies, who had taken away all of their
own canoes. How far the medicine-man had anything to
do with the other events of his narrative, Crowsfeather
very candidly admitted he could not even conjecture. He
was still at a loss whether to set down the conjurer for a
pretender, or as a real oracle. Peter, however, was less
credulous even than the chiefs. He had his superstitious
notions, like all uneducated men, but a clear head and
quick intellect placed him far above the weaknesses of the
red man in general. On receiving a description of the
person
of the unknown medicine-man, he at once
recognised
the bee-hunter. With an Indian to describe, and
an Indian to interpret or apply, escape from discovery was
next to impossible.
Although Onoah, or the Tribeless, as he was also
frequently
called by the red men, from the circumstance of
no one's knowing to what particular section of the great
Indian family he belonged, perfectly understood that the
bee-hunter he had seen on the other shore was the
individual
who had been playing the part of a conjurer among
these Pottawattamies, he was very careful not to reveal the
fact to Crowsfeather. He had his own policy, and was
fully aware of all the virtue there is in mystery and reserve.
With an Indian, these qualities go farther even than with a
white man; and we of the Circassian race are not entirely
exempt from the folly of being deceived by appearances.
On the present occasion Peter kept his knowledge to
himself
,
still leaving his red brethren in doubt and uncertainty;
but he took care to be right in his own opinions by putting
as many questions as were necessary for that purpose. Once
assured of his fact, he turned to other subjects of even
greater interest to himself and his companions.
The conference which now took place between the
Tribeless and Crowsfeather was held apart, both being
chiefs of too much importance to be intruded on at a
moment
like that. The two chiefs exhibited a very
characteristic
picture while engaged in this conference. They
seated themselves on a bank, and drawing their legs
partially
under them, sat face to face, with their heads less
than two feet asunder, occasionally gesticulating with
dignity
,
but each speaking in his turn with studied decorum.
Crowsfeather was highly painted, and looked fierce and
warlike, but Onoah had nothing extraordinary about him,
with the exception of the decorations and dress already
described
,
unless it might be his remarkable countenance.
The face of this Indian ordinarily wore a thoughtful cast,
an expression which it is not unusual to meet with in a
savage; though at times it lighted up, as it might be with
the heat of inward fires, like the crater giving out its
occasional
flames beneath the hues of a saddened atmosphere.
One accustomed to study the human face, and to analyze
its expressions, would possibly have discovered in that
countenance lines of deep artifice, together with the traces
of a profound and constitutional enthusiasm. He was
bent, at that very moment, on a scheme worthy of the
loftiest spirit living; the regeneration and union of the
people of his race, with a view to recover the possessions
they had yielded to the pale-faces; but it was a project
blended with the ferocity and revenge of a savagenoble
while ferocious.
Not idly had the whites, scattered along that frontier,
given the sobriquet of Scalping to Peter. As his pole
now showed, it had been earned in a hundred scenes of
bloody vengeance; and so great had been his success, that
the warrior, prophet, and councillor, for all these
characters
were united in his single person, began to think the
attainment of his wishes possible. As a matter of course,
much ignorance of the power of the Anglo-Saxon race on
this continent, was blended with these opinions and hopes;
but it was scarcely an ignorance exceeding that of certain
persons of far higher pretensions in knowledge, who live
in another hemisphere, and who often set themselves up as
infallible judges of all things connected with man, and his
attributes. Peter, the Tribeless, was not more in fault,
than those who fancied they saw the power of this great
Republic in the gallant little band collected at Corpus
Christi, under its indomitable chief, and who, march by
march, nay, foot by foot, as it might be, have perseveringly
predicted the halt, the defeat, the disasters, and final
discomfiture
,
which it has not yet pleased Divine Providence
to inflict on this slight effort of the young Hercules, as he
merely moves in his cradle. Alas! the enemy that most
menaces the overthrow of this new and otherwise
invincible
exhibition of human force, is within; seated in the
citadel itself; and must be narrowly watched, or he will act
his malignant purpose, and destroy the fairest hopes that
ever yet dawned on the fortunes of the human race!
The conference between the chiefs lasted fully an hour.
Crowsfeather possessed much of the confidence of Peter,
and, as for Onoah, neither Tecumthe, nor his brother the
Prophet, commanded as much of the respect of
Crowsfeather
as he did himself. Some even whispered that the
Tribeless was the individual who lay behind all, and
that the others named, merely acted as he suggested, or
advised
.
The reader will obtain all the insight into the future
that it is necessary now to give him, by getting a few of
the remarks made by the two colloquists, just before they
joined the rest of the party.
My father, then, intends to lead his pale-faces on a
crooked path, and take their scalps when he has done with
them, said Crowsfeather, who had been gravely listening
to Peter's plans of future proceeding; but who is to get
the scalp of the Chippewa?
One of my Pottawattamie young men; but not until I
have made use of him. I have a medicine-priest of the
pale-faces and a warrior with me, but shall not put their
scalps on my pole until they have paddled me further.
The council is to be first held in the Oak Openingswe
translate this term freely, that used by Peter meaning rather
the open woods of the prairies  and I wish to show
my prisoners to the chiefs, that they may see how easy it
is to cut off all the Yankees. I have now four men of that
people, and two squaws, in my power; let every red man
destroy as many, and the land will soon be clear of them
all!
This was uttered with gleamings of ferocity in the
speaker's face, that rendered his countenance terrible.
Even Crowsfeather quailed a little before that fierce aspect;
but the whole passed away almost as soon as betrayed, and
was succeeded by a friendly and deceptive smile, that was
characteristic of the wily Asiatic rather than of the
aboriginal
American.
They cannot be counted, returned the Pottawattamie
chief, as soon as his restraint was a little removed by this
less terrific aspect of his companion, if all I hear is true.
Black-Bird says that even the squaws of the pale-faces are
numerous enough to overcome all the red men that remain.
There will be two less, when I fasten to my pole the
scalps of those on the other side of the river, answered
Peter, with another of his transient, but startling, gleams
of intense revenge. But, no matter, now: my brother
knows all I wish him to do. Not a hair of the head of any
of these pale-faces must be touched by any hand but mine.
When the time comes, the knife of Onoah is sure. The
Pottawattamies shall have their canoes, and can follow us
up the river. They will find us in the Openings, and near
the Prairie Round. They know the spot; for the red men
love to hunt the deer in that region. Now, go and tell
this to your young men; and tell them that corn will not
grow, nor the deer wait to be killed by any of your people,
if they forget to do as I have said. Vengeance shall come,
when it is time.
Crowsfeather communicated all this to his warriors, who
received it as the ancients received the words of their
oracles
.
Each member of the party endeavoured to get an
accurate notion of his duty, in order that he might comply
to the very letter with the injunctions received. So
profound
was the impression made among all the red men of
the North-west by the previous labours of the `Tribeless' to
awaken a national spirit, and so great was their dread of
the consequences of disobedience, that every warrior
present
felt as if his life were the threatened penalty of neglect
or disinclination to obey.
No sooner, however, had Crowsfeather got through with
his communication, than a general request was made that
the problem of the whiskey-spring might be referred to
Onoah for solution. The young men had strong hopes,
notwithstanding all that had passed, that this spring
might yet turn out to be a reality. The scent was still
there, strong and fragrant, and they could not get rid of
the notion that fire-water grew on that spot. It is true,
their faith had been somewhat disturbed by the manner in
which the medicine-man had left them, and by his failure
to draw forth the gushing stream which he had impliedly
promised, and in a small degree performed; nevertheless,
little pools of whiskey had been found on the rock, and
several had tasted and satisfied themselves of the quality
of the liquor. As is usual, that taste had created a desire
for more, a desire that seldom slumbered on an Indian
palate when strong drinks were connected with its
gratification
.
Peter heard the request with gravity, and consented to
look into the matter with a due regard to his popularity and
influence. He had his own superstitious views, but among
them there did not happen to be one which admitted the
possibility of whiskey's running in a stream from the living
rock. Still he was willing to examine the charmed spot,
scent the fragrant odour, and make up his own estimate of
the artifices by which the bee-hunter had been practising
on the untutored beings into whose hands chance had
thrown him.
While the young men eagerly pointed out the precise
spots where the scent was the strongest, Peter maintained
the most unmoved gravity. He did not kneel to smell the
rocks, like the other chiefs, for this an innate sense of
propriety
told him would be undignified; but he made his
observations
closely, and with a keen Indian-like attention to
every little circumstance that might aid him in arriving at
the truth. All this time, great was the awe and deep the
admiration of the lookers-on. Onoah had succeeded in
creating a moral power for himself among the Indians of
the North-west which much exceeded that of any other red
man of that region. The whites scarcely heard of him,
knew but little of his career, and less of his true character,
for both were shrouded in mystery. There is nothing
remarkable
in this ignorance of the pale-faces of the time.
They did not understand their own leaders; much less the
leaders of the children of the openings, the prairies, and
the forest. At this hour, what is really known by the mass
of the American people of the true characters of their
public men? No nation that has any claim to civilization
and publicity knows less, and for several very obvious
reasons. The want of a capital in which the intelligence
of the nation periodically assembles, and whence a
corrected
public opinion on all such matters ought constantly
to flow, as truth emanates from the collisions of minds, is
one of these reasons. The extent of the country, which
separates men by distances that no fact can travel over
without
incurring the dangers of being perverted on the road,
is another. But the most fatal of all the influences that
tend to mislead the judgment of the American citizen, is
to be found in the abuse of a machinery that was intended
to produce an exactly contrary effect. If the tongue was
given to man to communicate ideas to his fellows, so has
philosophy described it as a gift to conceal his thoughts.
If the press was devised to circulate truth, so has it been
changed into a means of circulating lies. One is easily,
nay, more easily, sent abroad on the four winds of the
heavens than the other. Truth requires candour, imparti
ality, honesty, research, and industry; but a falsehood,
whether designed or not, stands in need of neither. Of
that which is the most easily produced, the country gets
the most; and it were idle to imagine that a people who
blindly and unresistingly submit to be put, as it might be,
under the feet of falsehood, as respects all their own public
men, can ever get very accurate notions of those of other
nations.
Thus was it with Onoah. His name was unknown to
the whites, except as a terrible and much-dreaded avenger
of the wrongs of his race. With the red men it was very
different. They had no forked tongues to make
falsehood
take the place of truth; or if such existed, they were
not believed. The Pottawattamies now present knew all
about Tecumseh,
[5]
[5]
A `tiger stooping for his prey.'
of whom the whites had also various
and ample accounts. This Shawanee chief had long been
active among them, and his influence was extended far and
near. He was a bold, restless, and ingenious warrior;
one, perhaps, who better understood the art of war, as it
was practised among red men, than any Indian then living.
They knew the name and person, also, of his brother
Elkswatawa
,
`A door opened.'
or the Prophet, whose name has also become
incorporated
with the histories of the times. These two
chiefs were very powerful, though scarce dwelling regularly
in any tribe; but their origin, their careers, and their
characters
were known to all, as were those of their common
father, Pukeesheno,
`I light from flying.'
and their
mother, Meethetaske.
`A turtle laying her eggs in the sand.'
But with Onoah it was very different. With him the past
was as much of a mystery as the future. No Indian could
say even of what tribe he was born. The totem that he
bore on his person belonged to no people then existing on
the continent, and all connected with him, his history,
nation
,
and family, was conjecture and fancy.
It is said that the Indians have traditions which are
communicated
only to a favoured few, and which by them have
been transmitted from generation to generation. An
enlightened
and educated red man has quite recently told us
in person, that
he
had been made the repository of some
Vol. I.  16
of these traditions, and that he had thus obtained enough
of the history of his race to be satisfied that they were
not
derived from the lost tribes of Israel, though he declined
communicating any more. It is so natural to resort to
secresy
in order to extend influence, that we can have no
difficulty in believing the existence of the practice; there
probably being no other reason why Free Masonry or Odd
Fellowship should have recourse to such an expedient, but
to rule through the imagination in preference to the
judgment
.
Now Peter enjoyed all the advantages of mystery.
It was said that even his real name was unknown, that of
Onoah having been given in token of the many scalps he
took, and that of Wa-wa-nosh, which he also sometimes
bore, having been bestowed on him by adoption in
consequence
of an act of favour extended to him from an
Ojebway
of some note, while that of Peter was clearly derived
from the whites. Some of his greatest admirers whispered
that when the true name of the Tribeless should get
to be known, his origin, early career, and all relating to
him would at once become familiar to every red man. At
present, the Indians must rest content with what they saw
and understood. The wisdom of Wa-wa-nosh made itself
felt in the councils; his eloquence, no speaker has equalled
for ages; as for his vengeance on the enemies of his race,
that
was to be estimated by the scalps he had taken. More
than this, no Indian was to be permitted to know, until the
mission of this oracle and chief was completed.
Had one enlightened by the education of a civilized man
been there, to watch the movements and countenance of
Peter as he scented the whiskey, and looked in vain for the
cause of the odour, and for a clue to the mystery which so
much perplexed the Pottawattamies, he would probably
have discovered some reason to distrust the sincerity of
this remarkable savage's doubts. If ever Peter was an
actor, it was on that occasion. He did not, in the least,
fall into any of the errors of his companions; but the scent
a good deal confounded him at first. At length he came
to the natural conclusion, that this unusual odour was in
some way connected with the family he had left on the
other shore; and from that moment his mind was at ease.
It did not suit the views of Peter, however, to explain
to the Pottawattamies that which was now getting to be so
obvious to himself. On the contrary, he rather threw dust
into the eyes of the chiefs, with a view to bring them also
under the influence of superstition. After making his
observations
with unmoved gravity, he promised a solution
of the whole affair when they should again meet in the
openings, and proposed to re-cross the river. Before
quitting
the shore, Peter and Crowsfeather had a clear
understanding
on the subject of their respective movements;
and, as soon as the former began to paddle up against the
wind, the latter called his young men together, made a
short address, and led them into the woods, as if about to
proceed on a march of length. The party, notwithstanding,
did not proceed more than a mile and a half, when it came
to a halt, and lighted a fire in order to cook some venison
taken on the way.
When Peter reached the south shore, he found the whole
group assembled to receive him. His tale was soon told.
He had talked with the Pottawattamies, and they were
gone. The canoes, however, must be carried to the other
shore and left there, in order that their owners might
recover
their property when they returned. This much had
Peter promised, and his pale-face friends must help him to
keep his word. Then he pointed to the openings as to
their place of present safety. There they would be
removed
from all immediate danger, and he would
accompany
them and give them the countenance and protection
of his name and presence. As for going south on the lake,
that was impossible, so long as the wind lasted, and it was
useless even could it be done. The troops had all left
Chicago, and the fort was destroyed.
Parson Amen and Corporal Flint, both of whom were
completely deluded by Peter, fancying him a secret friend
of the whites, in consequence of his own protestations to
that effect and the service he had already rendered them,
in appearance at least, instantly acquiesced in this wily
savage's proposal. It was the best, the wisest, nay, the
only, thing that now could be done. Mackinaw was gone,
as well as Chicago, and Detroit must be reached by
crossing
the peninsula, instead of taking the easier but far more
circuitous route of the lakes. Gershom was easily enough
persuaded into the belief of the feasibility, as well as of
the necessity, of this deviation from his original road, and
he soon agreed to accompany the party.
With le Bourdon the case was different. He understood
himself and the wilderness. For him the wind was fair,
and there was no necessity for his touching at Mackinaw
at all. It is true, he usually passed several days on that
pleasant and salubrious island, and frequently disposed of
lots of honey there; but he could dispense with the visit
and the sales. There was certainly danger now to be
apprehended
from the Ottawas, who would be very apt to be
out on the lake after this maritime excursion against the
fort; but it was possible even to elude their vigilance. In
a word, the bee-hunter did not believe in the prudence of
returning to the openings, but thought it by far the wisest
for the whole party to make the best of its way by water
to the settlements. All this he urged warmly on his white
companions, taking them aside for that purpose, and
leaving
Peter and Pigeonswing together while he did so.
But Parson Amen would as soon have believed that his
old congregation in Connecticut was composed of
Philistines
,
as not to believe that the red men were the lost
tribes, and that Peter, in particular, was not especially and
elaborately described in the Old Testament. He had
become
so thoroughly possessed by this crotchet as to
pervert
everything that he saw, read, or heard into evidence,
of some sort or other, of the truth of his notions. In this
respect there was nothing peculiar in the good missionary's
weakness, it being a failing common to partisans of a theory
to discover proofs of its truth in a thousand things in which
indifferent persons can find even no connection with the
subject at all. In this frame of mind the missionary would
as soon think of letting go his hold on the Bible itself, as
think of separating from an Indian who might turn out
any day to be a direct representative of Abraham, and
Isaac, and Jacob. Not to speak irreverently, but to use
language that must be familiar to all, the well-meaning
missionary wished to be in at the death.
Corporal Flint, too, had great faith in Peter. It was a
part of the scheme of the savage to make this
straight-forward
soldier an instrument in placing many scalps in
his power; and though he had designed from the first to
execute his bloody office on the corporal himself, he did
not intend to do so until he had made the most of him as
a stool-pigeon. Here were four more pale-faces thrown in
his power, principally by means of the confidence he had
awakened in the minds of the missionary and the soldier;
and that same confidence might be made instrumental in
adding still more to the number. Peter was a sagacious,
even a far-seeing savage, but he laboured under the curse
of ignorance. Had his information been of a more
extended
nature, he would have seen the utter fallacy of his
project to destroy the pale-faces altogether, and most
probably
would have abandoned it.
It is a singular fact that, while such men as Tecumthe,
his brother the Prophet, and Peter, were looking forward
to the downfall of the republic on the side of the forest,
so many, who ought to have been better informed on such
a subject, were anxiously expecting, nay confidently
predicting
it, from beyond the Atlantic. Notwithstanding
these sinister soothsayers, the progress of the nation has,
by the aid of a beneficent Providence, been onward and
onward
,
until it is scarcely presumptuous to suppose that even
England has abandoned the expectation of classing this
country again among her dependencies. The fortunes
of America, under God, depend only on herself. America
may
destroy America; of that there
is
danger; but it is
pretty certain that Europe united could make no serious
impression on her. Favoured by position, and filled with
a population that we have ever maintained was one of the
most military in existence, a truth that recent events are
hourly proving to be true, it much exceeds the power of
all the enemies of her institutions to make any serious
impression
on her. There is an enemy who may prove too
much for her; it exists in her bosom; and God alone can
keep him in subjection, and repress his desolation.
These were facts, however, of which Wa-wa-nosh, or
Onoah, was as ignorant as if he were an English or French
minister of State, and had got his notions of the country
from English or French travellers, who
wished
for what
they
predicted
. He had heard of the towns and
population
of the republic; but one gets a very imperfect notion
16*
of any fact of this sort by report, unless previous
experience
has prepared the mind to make the necessary
comparisons
,
and fitted it to receive the images intended to be
conveyed. No wonder, then, that Peter fell into a mistake
common to those who had so many better opportunities of
forming just opinions, and of arriving at truths that were
sufficiently obvious to all who did not wilfully shut their
eyes to their existence.
CHAPTER XIII.
Hearest thou voices on the shore
That our ears perceive no more,
Deafened by the cataract's roar?
Bear, through sorrow, wrong and ruth,
In thy heart the dew of youth,
On thy lips the smile of truth.
Longfellow
.
From
all that has been stated, the reader will, probably,
be prepared to learn that Boden did not succeed in his
effort to persuade Gershom, and the other
Christians
, to
accompany him on his voyage round by Lake Huron.
Corporal Flint was obdurate, and Parson Amen confiding.
As for Gershom, he did not like the thought of retracing
his steps so soon, and the females were obliged to remain
with the husband and brother.
You had better get out of the river while all the canoes
are on this side, said Margery, as she and le Bourdon
walked towards the boats in company, the council having
ended, and everything beginning to assume the appearance
of action. Remember, you will be quite alone, and have
a long, long road to travel!
I do remember all this, Margery, and see the necessity
for all of us getting back to the settlements, as fast as we
can. I don't half like this Peter; his name is a bad one
in the garrisons, and it makes me miserable to think that
you may be in his power.
The missionary and the corporal, as well as my
brother
,
seem willing to trust himwhat can two females do,
when their male protector has made up his mind, in such
a matter?
One who would very gladly be
your
protector, pretty
Margery, has not made up his mind to the prudence of
trusting Peter, at all. Put yourself under my care, and
my life shall be lost, or I will carry you safe to your friends
in Detroit.
This might be deemed tolerably explicit; yet was it not
sufficiently so to satisfy female scruples, or female rights.
Margery blushed, and she looked down, while she did not
look absolutely displeased. But her answer was given
firmly, and with a promptitude that showed she was quite
in earnest.
I cannot quit Dorothy, placed as she isand it is my
duty to die with brother, she said.
Have you thought enough of this, Margery? may not
reflection change your mind?
This is a duty on which a girl is not called to reflect;
she must
feel
, in a matter of conscience.
The bee-hunter fairly sighed, and from a very resolute,
he became a very irresolute sort of person. As was
natural
to one in his situation, he let out the secret current his
thoughts had taken, in the remarks which followed.
I do not like the manner in which Peter and
Pigeonswing
are now talking together, he said. When an Injin
is so earnest, there is generally mischief brewing. Do you
see Peter's manner?
He seems to be telling the young warrior something
that makes both forget themselves. I never saw two men
who seem so completely to forget all the rest of the world,
as them two savages! What can be the meaning,
Bourdon
,
of so much fierce earnestness?
I would give the world to know  possibly the
Chippewa
may tell me. We understand each other tolerably
well, and, just as you spoke, he gave me a secret sign that
I have a right to think means confidence and friendship.
That savage is either a fast friend, or a thorough villian.
Is it safe to trust any of them, Bourdon?Nono
your best way will be to go down the lakes, and get back
to Detroit as soon as you can. Not only your property,
but your
life
, is at risk.
Go, and leave you here, Margery  here, with a
brother
whose failing you know as well as I do, and who may,
at any moment, fall back into his old ways! I should not
be a man to do it!
But brother can get no liquor, now, for it is all emptied.
When himself for a few days, Gershom is a good protector,
as well as a good provider. You must not judge brother
too harshly, from what you have seen of him, Bourdon.
I do not wish to judge him at all, Margery. We all
have our failin's, and whiskey is his. I dare say mine are
quite as bad, in some other way. It's enough for me,
Margery, that Gershom is
your
brother, to cause me to try
to think well of him. We must not trust to there being
no more liquor among us; for, if that so'ger is altogether
without his rations, he's the first so'ger I ever met who
was!
But this corporal is a friend of the minister, and
ministers
ought not to drink!
Ministers are like other men, as them that live much
among 'em will soon find out. Hows'ever, if you
will
stay,
Margery, there is no more to be said. I must
cache
[6]
[6]
A western term, obviously derived from
cacher
, to conceal.
Cache
is much used by the western adventurers.
my
honey, and get the canoe ready to go up stream again.
Where you go, Margery, I go too, unless you tell me that
you do not wish my company.
This was said quietly, but in the manner of one whose
mind was made up. Margery scarce knew how to take it.
That she was secretly delighted, cannot be denied; while,
at the same time, that she felt a generous and lively
concern
for the fortunes of le Bourdon, is quite as certain.
As Gershom just then called to her to lend her assistance
in preparing to embark, she had no leisure for
expostulation
,
nor do we know that she now seriously wished to
divert the bee-hunter from his purpose.
It was soon understood by every one that the river was
to be crossed, in order that Gershom might get his
household
effects, previously to ascending the Kalamazoo. This
set all at work but the Chippewa, who appeared to le
Bourdon
to be watchful and full of distrust. As the latter had
a job before him that would be likely to consume a couple
of hours, the others were ready for a start long before he
had his hole dug. It was therefore arranged that the
bee-hunter
should complete his task, while the others crossed
the stream, and went in quest of Gershom's scanty stock
of household goods. Pigeonswing, however, was not to be
found, when the canoes were ready, and Peter proceeded
without him. Nor did le Bourdon see anything of his
friend until the adventurers were fairly on the north shore,
when he rejoined le Bourdon, sitting on a log, a curious
spectator of the latter's devices to conceal his property, but
not offering to aid him in a single movement. The
bee-hunter
too well understood an Indian warrior's aversion to
labour of all sorts, unless it be connected with his military
achievements, to be surprised at his companion's
indifference
to his own toil. As the work went on, a friendly
dialogue
was kept up between the parties.
I didn't know, Pigeonswing, but you had started for
the openings, before us, observed le Bourdon. That
tribeless old Injin made something of a fuss about your
being out of the way; I dare say he wanted you to help
back the furniture down to the canoes.
Got squawwhat he want better to do dat.
So you would put that pretty piece of work on such
persons as Margery and Dolly!
Why not, no? Bot' squaw  bot' know how. Dere
business to work for warrior.
Did you keep out of the way, then, lest old Peter should
get you at a job that is onsuitable to your manhood?
Keep out of way of Pottawattamie, returned the
Chippewa; no want to lose scalpradder take his'n.
But Peter says the Pottawattamies are all gone, and
that we have no longer any reason to fear them; and this
medicine-priest tells us, that what Peter says we can
depend
on for truth.
Dat good medicine-man, eh? T'ink he know a great,
great deal, eh?
That is more than I can tell you, Pigeonswing; for,
though I've been a medicine-man myself, so lately, it is in
a different line altogether from that of Parson Amen's.
As the bee-hunter uttered this answer, he was putting
the last of his honey-kegs into the
cache
, and as he rose
from completing the operation, he laughed heartily, like
one who saw images in the occurrences of the past night,
that tended to divert himself, if they had not the same effect
on the other spectators.
If you medicine-man, can tell who Peter be?
Winnebagoe
,
Sioux, Fox, Ojebway, Six Nation, all say don't
know him. Medicine-man ought to know  who he be,
eh?
I am not enough of a medicine-man to answer your
question, Pigeonswing. Set me at finding a Whiskey
Spring, or any little job of that sort, and I'll turn my back
to no other Whiskey Spring finder on the whole frontier;
but, as for Peter, he goes beyond my calculations, quite.
Why is he called
Scalping
Peter in the garrisons, if he be
so good an Injin, Chippewa?
You ask questionyou answer. Don't know, 'less he
take a good many scalp. Hear he do take all he can find,
den hear he don't.
But you take all you can find, Pigeonswing; and that
which is good in you, cannot be so bad in Peter.
Don't take scalp from friend.When you hear
Pigeonswing
scalp
friend
, eh?
I never did hear it; and hope I never shall. But when
did you hear that Peter is so wicked?
S'pose he don't, 'cause he got no friend among
pale-face
.
Bes' take care of dat man!
I'm of your way of thinking, myself, Chippewa; though
the corporal and the priest think him all in all. When I
asked Parson Amen how he came to be the associate of
one who went by a scalping name, even, he told me it was
all
name;
that Peter hadn't touched a hair of a human
head, in the way of scalping, since his youth, and that most
of his notions and ways was quite Jewish. The parson
has almost as much faith in Peter, as he has in his
religion
;
I'm not quite sure he has not even more.
No matter.Bes' always for pale-face to trust
pale-face
,
and Injin to trust Injin. Dat most likely to be right.
Nevertheless, I trust
you
, Pigeonswing; and, hitherto,
you have not deceived me!
The Chippewa cast a glance of so much meaning on the
bee-hunter, that the last was troubled by it. For many a
day did le Bourdon remember that look; and painful were
the apprehensions to which it gave birth. Until that
morning
,
the intercourse between the two had been of the most
confidential character; but something like a fierce hatred
was blended in that look. Could it be that the feelings of
the Chippewa were changed? and was it possible that
Peter was in any way connected with this alteration in looks
and sentiments? All these suspicions passed through le
Bourdon's mind, as he finished his
cche;
and sufficiently
disagreeable did he find it to entertain them. The
circumstances
,
however, did not admit of any change of plan;
and, in a few minutes, the two were in the canoe, and on
their way to join their companions.
Peter had dealt fairly enough with those who
accompanied
him. The Pottawattamies were nowhere to be seen,
and Gershom led the corporal to the place where his
household
goods had been secreted, in so much confidence, that
both the men left their arms behind them. Such was the
state of things when le Bourdon reached the north shore.
The young man was startled, when his eyes first fell on the
rifles; but, on looking around, there did not really appear
to be any sufficient reason why they might not be laid
aside, for a few minutes.
The bee-hunter, having disposed of all his honey, had
now a nearly empty canoe; accordingly, he received a
portion of Gershom's effects; all of which were safely
transported from their place of concealment to the water
side. Their owner was slowly recovering the use of his
body and mind, though still a little dull, from his recent
debauch. The females supplied his place, however, in
many respects; and two hours after the party had landed,
it was ready again to proceed on its journey into the
interior
.
The last article was stowed in one of the canoes,
and Gershom announced his willingness to depart.
At this moment, Peter led the bee-hunter aside, telling
his friends, that he would speedily rejoin them. Our hero
followed his savage leader along the foot of the declivity,
in the rear of the hut, until the former stopped at the place
where the first, and principal fire of the past night, had
been lighted. Here Peter made a sweeping gesture of his
hand, as if to invite his companion to survey the different
objects around. As this characteristic gesture was made,
the Indian spoke.
My brother is a medicine-man, he said. He knows
where whiskey growslet him tell Peter where to find the
spring.
The recollection of the scene of the previous night, came
so fresh and vividly over the imagination of the bee-hunter,
that, instead of answering the question of the chief, he
burst into a hearty fit of laughter. Then, fearful of giving
offence, he was about to apologize for a mirth so ill-timed,
when the Indian smiled, with a gleam of intelligence on
his swarthy face, that seemed to say, I understand it
all, and continued
Goodthe chief with three eyesin allusion to the
spy-glass that le Bourdon always carried suspended from
his neckis a very great medicine-man; he knows when
to laugh, and when to look sad. The Pottawattamies
were dry, and he wanted to find them some whiskey to
drink, but could notour brother, in the canoe, had drunk
it all. Good.
Again the bee-hunter laughed; and though Peter did
not join in his mirth, it was quite plain that he understood
its cause. With this good-natured sort of intelligence
between them, the two returned to the canoes; the
bee-hunter
always supposing that the Indian had obtained his
object, in receiving his indirect admission, that the scene
of the previous night had been merely a piece of ingenious
jugglery. So much of a courtier, however, was Peter, and
so entire his self-command, that on no occasion, after
wards, did he ever make any further allusion to the subject.
The ascent of the river was now commenced. It was
not a difficult matter for le Bourdon to persuade Margery,
that her brother's canoe would be too heavily loaded for
such a passage, unless she consented to quit it for his own.
Pigeonswing took the girl's place, and was of material
assistance in forcing the light, but steady craft, up stream.
The three others continued in the canoe in which they had
entered the river. With this arrangement, therefore, our
adventurers commenced this new journey.
Every reader will easily understand, that ascending such
a stream as the Kalamazoo, was a very different thing from
descending it. The progress was slow, and at many points
laborious. At several of the rifts, it became necessary
to track the canoes up; and places occurred, at which,
the only safe way of proceeding was to unload them
altogether
,
and transport boats, cargoes and all, on the
shoulders
of the men, across what are called, in the language
of the country, portages, or carrying-places. In
such toil as this, the corporal was found to be very
serviceable
;
but neither of the Indians declined to lend their
assistance, in work of this manly character. By this time,
moreover, Gershom had come round, and was an
able-bodied
,
vigorous assistant, once more. If the corporal
was the master of any alcohol, he judiciously kept it a
secret; for, not a drop passed any one's lips during the
whole of that toilsome journey.
Although the difficult places in the river were sufficiently
numerous, most of the reaches were places having steady,
but not swift currents towards the lake. In these reaches
the paddles, and those not very vigorously applied, enabled
the travellers to advance as fast as was desirable; and such
tranquil waters were a sort of resting-places to those who
managed the canoes. It was while ascending these easy
channels, that conversation most occurred; each speaker
yielding, as was natural, to the impulses of the thoughts
uppermost in his mind. The missionary talked much of
the Jews; and, as the canoes came near each other, he
entered at large, with their different occupants, into the
reasons he had for believing that the red men of America
were the lost tribes of Israel. The very use of the word
`tribes,' would this simple-minded, and not very profound
expounder of the word of God, say, is one proof of the
truth of what I tell you. Now, no one thinks of dividing
the white men of America into `tribes.' Who ever heard
of the `tribe' of New England, or of the `tribe' of Virginia,
Vol. I.  17
or of the `tribe' of the Middle States?
[7]
[7]
The reader is not to infer any exaggeration in this picture.
There is no end to the ignorance and folly of sects and parties,
when religious or political zeal runs high. The writer well
remembers
to have heard a Universalist, of more zeal than learning,
adduce, as an argument in favour of his doctrine, the twenty-fifth
chapter and forty-sixth verse of St. Matthew, where, we are told,
that the wicked shall go away into
everlasting
punishment; but
the righteous into life
eternal;
by drawing a distinction between
the adjectives; and this so much the more, because the Old
Testament
speaks of
everlasting
hills, and
everlasting
valleys:
thus proving, from the Bible, a substantial difference between
everlasting
and eternal. Now, every sophomore knows, that the
word used in Matthew is the same, in both cases, being
,
or existing for ever.
Even among the
blacks, there are no tribes. There is a very remarkable
passage in the sixty-eighth Psalm, that has greatly struck
me, since my mind has turned to this subject; `God shall
wound the
head
of his enemies,' saith the Psalmist, `and
the
hairy scalp
of such a one as goeth on still in his
wickedness
.'
Here is a very obvious allusion to a well-known,
and, what we think, a barbarous practice of the red men;
but, rely on it, friends, nothing that is permitted on earth
is permitted in vain. The attentive reader of the inspired
book, by gleaning here and there, can collect together
much authority for this new opinion about the lost tribes;
and the day will come, I do not doubt, when men will
marvel that the truth hath been so long hidden from them.
I can scarcely open a chapter, in the Old Testament, that
some passage does not strike me as going to prove this
identity, between the red men and the Hebrews; and,
were they all collected together, and published in a book,
mankind would be astonished at their lucidity and weight.
As for scalping, it is a horrid thing in our eyes, but it is
honourable with the red men; and I have quoted to you
the words of the Psalmist, in order to show the manner in
which divine wisdom inflicts penalties on sin. Here is
plain justification of the practice, provided always that the
sufferer be in the bondage of transgression, and obnoxious
to divine censure. Let no man, therefore, in the pride of
his learning, and, perhaps, of his prosperity, disdain to
believe things that are so manifestly taught and foretold;
but let us all bow in humble submission to the will of a
Being who, to our finite understanding, is so perfectly
incomprehensible
.
We trust that no one of our readers will be disposed to
deride Parson Amen's speculations on this interesting
subject
,
although this may happen to be the first occasion on
which he has ever heard the practice of taking scalps
justified
by Scripture. Viewed in a proper spirit, they ought
merely to convey a lesson of humility, by rendering
apparent
the wisdom, nay the necessity, of men's keeping
themselves
within the limits of the sphere of knowledge they
were designed to fill, and convey, when rightly considered,
as much of a lesson to the Puseyite, with abstractions that
are quite as unintelligible to himself as they are to others;
to the high-wrought and dogmatical Calvinist, who, in the
midst of his fiery zeal, forgets that love is the very essence
of the relation between God and man; to the Quaker, who
seems to think the cut of a coat essential to salvation; to
the descendant of the Puritan, who, whether he be
Socinian
,
Calvinist, Universalist, or any other `ist,' appears to
believe that the rock on which Christ declared he would
found his church was the `Rock of Plymouth;' and to the
unbeliever, who, in deriding all creeds, does not know
where to turn to find one to substitute in their stead.
Humility
,
in matters of this sort, is the great lesson that all
should teach and learn; for it opens the way to charity, and
eventually to faith, and through both of these to hope;
finally, through all of these, to heaven.
The journey up the Kalamazoo lasted many days, the
ascent being often so painful, and no one seeming in a
hurry. Peter waited for the time set for his council to
approach, and was as well content to remain in his canoe,
as to `camp out' in the openings. Gershom never was in
haste, while the bee-hunter would have been satisfied to
pass the summer in so pleasant a manner, Margery being
seated most of the time in his canoe. In his ordinary
excursions
,
le Bourdon carried the mastiff as a companion;
but, now that his place was so much better filled, Hive was
suffered to roam the woods that lined most of the
river-banks
,
joining his master from time to time at the portages
or landings.
As for the missionary and the corporal, impatience formed
no part of their present disposition. The first had been
led, by the artful Peter, to expect great results to his theory
from the assembly of chiefs which was to meet in the
openings; and the credulous parson was, in one sense,
going as blindly on the path of destruction, as any sinner
it had ever been his duty to warn of his fate, was proceeding
in the same direction in another. The corporal, too, was
the dupe of Peter's artifices. This man had heard so many
stories to the Indian's prejudice, at the different posts where
he had been stationed, as at first to render him exceedingly
averse to making the present journey in his company. The
necessity of the case, as connected with the preservation
of his own life after the massacre of Fort Dearborn, and
the influence of the missionary, had induced him to
overlook
his ancient prejudices, and to forget opinions that, it
now occurred to him, had been founded in error. Once
fairly within the influence of Peter's wiles, a simple-minded
soldier, like the corporal, was soon completely made the
Indian's dupe. By the time the canoe reached the mouth
of the Kalamazoo, as has been related, each of these men
placed the most implicit reliance on the good faith and
friendly feelings of the very being whose entire life, both
sleeping and waking thoughts, were devoted, not only to
his destruction, but to that of the whole white race on the
American continent. So bland was the manner of this
terrible savage, when it comported with his views to
conceal
his ruthless designs, that persons more practised and
observant than either of his two companions might have
been its dupes, not to say its victims. While the missionary
was completely mystified by his own headlong desire to
establish a theory, and to announce to the religious world
where the lost tribes were to be found, the corporal had
aided in deceiving himself, also, by another process. With
him
, Peter had privately conversed of war, and had
insinuated
that he was secretly labouring in behalf of his great
father at Washington, and against the other great father
down at Montreal. As between the two, Peter professed
to lean to the interests of the first; though, had he laid
bare his inmost soul, a fiery hatred of each would have
been found to be its predominate feeling. But Corporal
Flint fondly fancied he was making a concealed march
with an ally, while he thus accompanied one of the fiercest
enomies of his race.
Peter is not to be judged too harshly. It is always
respectable
to defend the fireside, and the land of one's
nativity
,
although the cause connected with it may be
sometimes
wrong. This Indian knew nothing of the principles
of colonization, and had no conception that any other than
its original ownersoriginal so far as his traditions reached
could have a right to his own hunting-grounds. Of the
slow but certain steps by which an overruling Providence
is extending a knowledge of the true God, and of the great
atonement through the death of his blessed Son, Peter had
no conception; nor would it probably have seemed right to
his contracted mind, had he even seen and understood this
general tendency of things. To him, the pale-face
appeared
only as a rapacious invader, and not a creature
obeying the great law of his destiny, the end of which is
doubtless to help knowledge to abound, until it shall cover
the whole earth as the waters cover the sea. Hatred,
inextinguishable
and active hatred, appeared to be the law
of this man's being; and he devoted all the means, aided
by all the intelligence he possessed, to the furtherance of
his narrow and short-sighted means of vengeance and
redress
.
In all this, he acted in common with Tecumthe
and his brother, though his consummate art kept him
behind
a veil, while the others were known and recognised
as open and active foes. No publication speaks of this
Peter, nor does any orator enumerate his qualities, while
the other two chiefs have been the subjects of every species
of descriptive talent, from that of the poet to that of the
painter.
As day passed after day, the feeling of distrust in the
bosom of the bee-hunter grew weaker and weaker, and
Peter succeeded in gradually worming himself into his
confidence
also. This was done, moreover, without any
apparent
effort. The Indian made no professions of
friendship
,
laid himself out for no particular attention, nor ever
seemed to care how his companions regarded his
deportment
.
His secret purposes he kept carefully smothered in
his own breast, it is true; but, beyond that, no other sign
17*
of duplicity could have been discovered, even by one who
knew his objects and schemes. So profound was his art,
that it had the aspect of nature. Pigeonswing alone was
alive to the danger of this man's company; and he knew
it only by means of certain semi-confidential
communications
received in his character of a red man. It was no
part of Peter's true policy to become an ally to either of
the great belligerents of the day. On the contrary, his
ardent wish was to seem them destroy each other, and it was
the sudden occurrence of the present war that had given
a new impulse to his hopes, and a new stimulus to his
efforts, as a time most propitious to his purposes. He was
perfectly aware of the state of the Chippewa's feelings,
and he knew that this man was hostile to the
Pottawattamies
,
as well as to most of the tribes of Michigan; but
this made no difference with
him
. If Pigeonswing took
the scalp of a white man, he cared not whether it grew on
an English or an American head; in either case, it was the
destruction of
his
enemy. With such a policy constantly
in view, it cannot be matter of surprise that Peter continued
on just as good terms with Pigeonswing as with
Crowsfeather
.
But one precaution was observed in his intercourse
with the first. To Crowsfeather, then on the war-path in
quest of Yankee scalps, he had freely communicated his
designs on his own white companions, while he did not
dare to confide to the Chippewa this particular secret, since
that Indian's relations with the bee-hunter were so amicable
as to be visible to every observer. Peter felt the necessity
of especial caution in his communication with this savage,
therefore; and this was the reason why the Chippewa was
in so much painful uncertainty as to the other's intentions.
He had learned enough to be distrustful, but not enough to
act with decision.
Once, and once only, during their slow passage up the
Kalamazoo, did the bee-hunter observe something about
Peter to awaken his original apprehensions. The fourth day
after leaving the mouth of the river, and when the whole
party were resting after the toil of passing a
carrying-place
,
our hero had observed the eyes of that tribeless
savage roaming from one white face to another, with an
expression in them so very fiendish, as actually to cause
his heart to beat quicker than common. The look was
such an one as le Bourdon could not remember to have
ever before beheld in a human countenance. In point of
fact, he had seen Peter in one of those moments when the
pent fires of the volcano, that ceaselessly raged within
his bosom, were becoming difficult to suppress; and when
memory was busiest in recalling to his imagination scenes
of oppression and wrong, that the white man is only too
apt to forget amid the ease of his civilization, and the
security
of his power. But the look, and the impression
produced by it on le Bourdon, soon passed away, and were
forgotten by him to whom it might otherwise have proved
to be a most useful warning.
It was a little remarkable that Margery actually grew to
be attached to Peter, often manifesting towards the chief
attentions and feelings such as a daughter is apt to exhibit
towards a father. This arose from the high and courteous
bearing of this extraordinary savage. At all times, an
Indian
warrior is apt to maintain the dignified and courteous
bearing that has so often been remarked in the race, but it
is very seldom that he goes out of his way to manifest
attention
to the squaws. Doubtless these men have the feelings
of humanity, and love their wives and offspring like others;
but it is so essential a part of their training to suppress the
exhibition of such emotions, that it is seldom the mere
looker-on has occasion to note them. Peter, however, had
neither wife nor child; or if they existed, no one knew
where either was to be found. The same mystery shrouded
this part of his history as veiled all the rest. In his hunts,
various opportunities occurred for exhibiting to the females
manly attentions, by offering to them the choicest pieces
of his game, and pointing out the most approved Indian
modes of cooking the meats, so as to preserve their savoury
properties. This he did sparingly at first, and as a part of
a system of profound deception; but day by day, and hour
after hour, most especially with Margery, did his manner
become sensibly less distant, and more natural. The
artlessness
,
the gentle qualities, blended with feminine spirit
as they were, and the innocent gaiety of the girl, appeared
to win on this nearly remorseless savage, in spite of his
efforts to resist her influence. Perhaps the beauty of
Margery
contributed its share in exciting these novel emotions
in the breast of one so stern. We do not mean that Peter
yielded to feelings akin to love; of this, he was in a
manner
incapable; but a man can submit to a gentle regard
for woman that shall be totally free from passion. This
sort of regard Peter certainly began to entertain for
Margery
;
and like begetting like, as money produces money,
it is not surprising that the confidence of the girl herself,
as well as her sympathies, should continue to increase in
the favour of this terrible Indian.
But the changes of feeling, and the various little
incidents
to which we have alluded, did not occur in a single
moment of time. Day passed after day, and still the canoes
were working their way up the winding channels of the
Kalamazoo, placing at each setting sun longer and longer
reaches of its sinuous stream between the travellers and
the broad sheet of Michigan. As le Bourdon had been up
and down the river often, in his various excursions, he acted
as the pilot of the navigation; though all worked, even
to the missionary and the Chippewa. On such an
expedition
,
toil was not deemed to be discreditable to a warrior,
and Pigeonswing used the paddle and the pole as willingly,
and with as much dexterity, as any of the party.
It was only on the eleventh day after quitting the mouth
of the river, that the canoes came-to in the little bay where
le Bourdon was in the habit of securing his light bark,
when in the openings. Castle Meal was in full view,
standing peacefully in its sweet solitude; and Hive, who,
as he came within the range of his old hunts, had started
off, and got to the spot the previous evening, now stood on
the bank of the river to welcome his master and his friends
to the
chient
. It wanted a few minutes of sunset as the
travellers landed, and the parting rays of the great luminary
of our system were glancing through the various glades of
the openings, imparting a mellow softness to the herbage
and flowers. So far as the bee-hunter could perceive, not
even a bear had visited the place in his absence. On
ascending to his abode and examining the fastenings, and
on entering the hut, store-house, &c., le Bourdon became
satisfied that all the property he had left behind was safe,
and that the foot of manhe almost thought of beast too
had not visited the spot at all during the last fortnight.
CHAPTER XIV.
Hope in your mountains, and hope in your streams,
Bow down in their worship, and loudly pray;
Trust in your strength, and believe in your dreams,
But the wind shall carry them all away.
Brainard
.
The
week which succeeded the arrival of our party at
Chateau au Miel
, or Castle Meal, as le Bourdon used to
call his abode, was one of very active labour. It was
necessary
to house the adventurers, and the little habitation
already built was quite insufficient for such a purpose. It
was given to the females, who used it as a private
apartment
for themselves, while the cooking, eating, and even
sleeping, so far as the males were concerned, were all done
beneath the trees of the openings. But a new
chient
was
soon constructed, which, though wanting in the
completeness
and strength of Castle Meal, was sufficient for the
wants of these sojourners in a wilderness. It is surprising
with how little of those comforts which civilization induces
us to regard as necessaries we can get along, when cast
into the midst of the western wilds. The female whose
foot has trodden, from infancy upward, on nothing harder
than a good carpetwho has been reared amid all the
appliances
of abundance and art, seems at once to change
her nature, along with her habits, and often proves a
heroine
,
and an active assistant, when there was so much
reason to apprehend she might turn out to be merely an
encumbrance. In the course of a life that is now getting
to be well stored with experience of this sort, as well as of
many other varieties, we can recall a hundred cases of
women, who were born and nurtured in affluence and
abundance, who have cheerfully quitted the scenes of youth,
their silks and satins, their china and plate, their mahogany
and Brussels, to follow husbands and fathers into the
wilderness
,
there to compete with the savage, often for food,
and always for the final possession of the soil!
But, in the case of Dorothy and Blossom, the change had
never been of this very broad character, and habit had long
been preparing them for scenes even more savage than that
into which they were now cast. Both were accustomed to
work, as, blessed be God! the American woman usually
works; that is to say, within doors, and to render home
neat, comfortable and welcome. As housewives, they were
expert and willing, considering the meagreness of their
means; and le Bourdon told the half-delighted,
half-blushing
Margery, ere the latter had been twenty-four hours in
his
chient
, that nothing but the presence of such an one
as herself was wanting to render it an abode fit for a prince!
Then, the cooking was so much improved! Apart from
cleanliness, the venison was found to be more savoury; the
cakes were lighter; and the pork less greasy. On this
subject of grease, however, we could wish that a sense of
right would enable us to announce its utter extinction in
the American kitchen; or, if not absolutely its extinction,
such a subjection of the unctuous properties, as to bring
them within the limits of a reasonably accurate and
healthful
taste. To be frank, Dorothy carried a somewhat heavy
hand, in this respect; but pretty Margery was much her
superior. How this difference in domestic discipline
occurred
,
is more than we can say; but of its existence, there
can be no doubt. There are two very respectable sections
of the civilized world to which we should imagine no
rational being would ever think of resorting, in order to
acquire the art of cookery, and these are Germany and the
Land of the Pilgrims. One hears, and reads in those
elegant
specimens of the polite literature of the day, the letters
from Washington, and from various travellers, who go up
and down this river in steamboats, or along that rail-way,
gratis
, much in honour of the good things left behind the
several writers, in the Region of the Rock; but, woe
betide the wight who is silly enough to believe in all this
poetical imagery, and who travels in that direction, in the
expectation of finding a good table! It is extraordinary
that such a marked difference does exist, on an interest of
this magnitude, among such near neighbours; but, of the
fact, we should think no intelligent and experienced man
can doubt. Believing as we do, that no small portion of
the elements of national character can be, and are, formed
in the kitchen, the circumstance may appear to us of more
moment than to some of our readers. The vacuum left in
cookery, between Boston and Baltimore, for instance, is
something like that which exists between Le Verrier's new
planet and the sun.
But Margery could even fry pork without causing it to
swim in grease, and at preparing a venison steak, a
professed
cook was not her superior. She also understood
various little mysteries, in the way of converting the berries
and fruits of the wilderness into pleasant dishes; and
Corporal
Flint soon affirmed that it was a thousand pities she
did not live in a
garrison
, which, agreeably to his view of
things, was something like placing her at the
comptoir
of
the Caf de Paris, or of marrying her to some second
Vatel.
With the eating and drinking, the building advanced
pari passu
. Pigeonswing brought in his venison, his
ducks, his pigeons, and his game of different varieties,
daily, keeping the larder quite as well supplied as
comported
with the warmth of the weather; while the others
worked on the new
chiente
. In order to obtain materials
for this building, one so much larger than his old abode,
Ben went up the Kalamazoo, about half a mile, where he
felled a sufficient number of young pines, with trunks of
about a foot in diameter, cutting them into lengths of
twenty and thirty feet, respectively. These lengths, or
trunks, were rolled into the river, down which they slowly
floated, until they arrived abreast of Castle Meal, where
they were met by Peter, in a canoe, who towed each stick,
as it arrived, to the place of landing. In this way, at the
end of two days' work, a sufficient quantity of materials
was collected to commence directly on the building, itself.
Log-houses are of so common occurrence, as to require
no particular description of the one now put up, from us.
It was rather less than thirty feet in length, and one-third
narrower than it was long. The logs were notched, and
the insterstices were filled by pieces of the pine, split to a
convenient size. The roof was of bark, and of the
simplest
construction, while there was neither door nor
window
;
though one aperture was left for the first, and two
for the last. Corporal Flint, however, was resolved that
not only a door should be made, as well as shutters for the
windows, but that the house should, in time, be picketed.
When le Bourdon remonstrated with him on the folly of
taking so much unncessary pains, it led to a discussion, in
which the missionary even felt constrained to join.
What's the usewhat's the use? exclaimed le
Bourdon
,
a little impatiently, when he found the corporal getting
to be in earnest in his proposal. Here have I lived,
safely, two seasons in Castle Meal, without any pickets, or
palisades; and yet you want to turn this new house into a
reg'lar garrison!
Ay, Bourdon, that was in
peaceable
times; but these is
war
times. I've seen the fall of Fort Dearborn, and I
don't want to see the fall of another post this war. The
Pottawattamies is hostile, even Peter owns; and the
Pottawattamies
has been here once, as you say yourself, and
may come ag'in.
The only Pottawattamie who has ever been at this
spot, to my knowledge, is dead, and his bones are
bleaching
up yonder in the openings. No fear of him, then.
His body is gone, answered the corporal; and what
is more, the rifle is gone with it. I heard that his rifle had
been forgotten, and went to collect the arms left on the
field of battle, but found nothing. No doubt his friends
have burned, or buried, the chief, and they will be apt to
take another look in this quarter of the country, having
l'arnt the road.
Boden was struck with this intelligence, as well as with
the reasoning, and after a moment's pause, he answered in
a way that showed a wavering purpose.
It will take a week's work, to picket or palisade the
house, he answered, and I wish to be busy among the
bees, once more.
Go to your bees, Bourdon, and leave me to fortify and
garrison, as becomes
my
trade. Parson Amen, here, will
tell you that the children of Israel are often bloody-minded,
and are not to be forgotten.
The corporal is right, put in the missionary; the
corporal is quite right. The whole history of the ancient
Jews gives us this character of them; and even Saul of
Tarsus was bent on persecution and slaughter, until his
hand was stayed by the direct manifestation of the power
of God. I can see glimmerings of this spirit in Peter, and
this at a moment when he is almost ready to admit that
he's a descendant of Israel.
Is Peter ready to allow that? asked the bee-hunter,
with more interest in the answer than he would have been
willing to allow.
As good as thatyes, quite as good as that. I can
see, plainly, that Peter has some heavy mystery on his
mind; sooner, or later, we shall learn it. When it
does
come out, the world may be prepared to learn the whole
history of the Ten Tribes!
In my judgment, observed the corporal, that chief
could give the history of twenty, if he was so minded.
There were but ten of them, brother Flint  but
ten;
and of those ten he could give us a full and highly
interesting
account. One of these days, we shall hear it all;
in the mean time, it may be well enough to turn one of
these houses into some sort of a garrison.
Let it, then, be Castle Meal, said le Bourdon;
surely, if any one is to be defended and fortified in this
way, it ought to be the women. You may easily palisade
that hut, which is so much stronger than this, and so much
smaller.
With this compromise, the work went on. The corporal
dug a trench four feet deep, encircling the `castle,' as
happy as a lord the whole time; for this was not the first
time he had been at such work, which he considered to be
altogether in character, and suitable to his profession. No
youthful engineer, fresh from the Point, that seat of
military
learning to which the Republic is even more indebted,
for its signal successes in Mexico, than to the high military
character of this population,no young aspirant for glory,
fresh from this useful school, could have greater delight in
laying out his first bastion, or counter-scarp, or glacis, than
Corporal Flint enjoyed in fortifying Castle Meal. It will
be remembered that this was the first occasion he was ever
actually at the head of the engineering department.
Hitherto
,
it had been his fortune to follow; but now it had
become his duty to lead. As no one else, of that party,
Vol. I.  18
had ever been employed in such a work on any previous
occasion, the corporal did not affect to conceal the superior
knowledge with which he was overflowing. Gershom he
found a ready and active assistant; for, by this time, the
whiskey was well out of him; and he toiled with the greater
willingness, as he felt that the palisades would add to the
security of his wife and sister. Neither did Parson Amen
disdain to use the pick and shovel; for, while the
missionary
had the fullest reliance in the fact that the red men of
that region were the descendants of the Children of Israel,
he regarded them as a portion of the chosen people who
were living under the ban of the divine displeasure, and as
more than usually influenced by those evil spirits, whom
St. Paul mentions, as the powers of the air. In a word,
while the good missionary had all faith in the final
conversion
and restoration of these children of the forests, he did
not overlook the facts of their present barbarity, and great
propensity to scalp. He was not quite as efficient as
Gershom
,
at this novel employment, but a certain inborn zeal
rendered him both active and useful. As for the Indians,
neither of them deigned to touch a tool. Pigeonswing had
little opportunity for so doing, indeed, being usually, from
the rising to the setting sun, out hunting for the support
of the party; while Peter passed most of his time in
ruminations
and solitary walks. This last paid little attention to the work about the castle, either knowing it would, at
any moment, by an act of treachery, be in his power to
render all these precautions of no avail; or, relying on the
amount of savage force that he knew was about to collect
in the openings. Whenever he cast a glance on the
progress
of the work, it was with an eye of great indifference;
once he even carried his duplicity so far, as to make a
suggestion to the corporal, by means of which, as he
himself
expressed it, in his imperfect EnglishInjin no get
inside, to use knife and tomahawk. This seeming
indifference
,
on the part of Peter, did not escape the
observation
of the bee-hunter, who became still less distrustful of
that mysterious savage, as he noted his conduct in
connection
with the dispositions making for defence.
Le Bourdon would not allow a tree of any sort to be felled
anywhere near his abode. While the corporal and his
associates were busy in digging the trench, he had gone
to a considerable distance, quite out of sight from Castle
Meal, and near his great highway, the river, where he cut
and trimmed the necessary number of burr oaks for the
palisades. Boden laboured the more cheerfully at this
work, for two especial reasons. One was the fact that the
defences might be useful to himself, hereafter, as much
against bears as against Indians; and the other, because
Margery daily brought her sewing or knitting, and sat on
the fallen trees, laughing and chatting, as the axe
performed
its duties. On three several occasions Peter was
present, also, accompanying Blossom, with a kindness of
manner, and an attention to her pretty little tastes in
culling
flowers, that would have done credit to a man of a
higher school of civilization.
The reader is not to suppose, however, because the
Indian
pays but little outward attention to the squaws, that
he is without natural feeling, or manliness of character.
In some respects his chivalrous devotion to the sex is,
perhaps
,
in no degree inferior to that of the class which makes
a parade of such sentiments, and this quite as much from
convention and ostentation, as from any other motive. The
red man is still a savage, beyond all question; but, he is a
savage with so many of the nobler and more manly
qualities
,
when uncorrupted by communion with the worst class
of whites, and not degraded by extreme poverty, as justly
to render him a subject of our admiration, in self-respect,
in dignity, and in simplicity of deportment. The Indian
chief is usually a gentleman; and this though he may have
never heard of Revelation, and has not the smallest notion
of the Atonement, and of the deep obligations it has laid on
the human race.
Amid the numberless exaggerations of the day, one of
particular capacity has arisen connected with the supposed
character of a gentleman. Those who regard all things
through the medium of religious feeling, are apt to insist
that he who is a Christian, is necessarily a gentleman;
while he can be no thorough gentleman, who has not most
of the qualities of the Christian character. This confusion
in thought and language, can lead to no really useful
result, while it embarrasses the minds of many, and renders
the expression of our ideas less exact and comprehensive
than they would otherwise be.
We conceive that a man may be very much of a
Christian
,
and very little of a gentleman; or very much of a
gentleman, and very little of a Christian. There is, in
short, not much in common between the two characters,
though it is possible for them to become united in the
same individual. That the finished courtesies of polished
life may wear some of the aspects of that benevolence
which causes the Christian to love his neighbour as
himself
,
is certainly true, though the motives of the parties
are so very different as to destroy all real identity between
them. While the moving principle of a gentleman is
self-respect
,
that of a Christian is humility. The first is ready
to lay down his life in order to wipe away an imaginary
dishonour, or to take the life of another; the last is taught
to turn the other cheek, when smitten. In a word, the
first keeps the world, its opinions and its estimation ever
uppermost in his thoughts; the last lives only to reverence
God, and to conform to his will, in obedience to his
revealed
mandates. Certainly, there is that which is both
grateful and useful in the refined deportment of one whose
mind and manners have been polished even in the schools
of the world; but it is degrading to the profoundly
beautiful
submission of the truly Christian temper, to imagine
that anything like a moral parallel can justly be run
between
them.
Of course, Peter had none of the qualities of him who
sees and feels his own defects, and relies only on the merits
of the atonement for his place among the children of light,
while he had so many of those qualities which depend on
the estimate which man is so apt to place on his own
merits. In this last sense, this Indian had a great many
of the essentials of a gentleman; a lofty courtesy presiding
over all his intercourse with others, when passion or policy
did not thrust in new and sudden principles of action.
Even the missionary was so much struck with the
gentleness
of this mysterious savage's deportment in connection
with Margery, as at first to impute it to a growing desire
to make a wife of that flower of the wilderness. But closer
observation induced greater justice to the Indian in this
respect. Nothing like the uneasiness, impatience, or
distrust
of passion could be discerned in his demeanour; and
when Parson Amen perceived that the bee-hunter's marked
devotion to the beautiful Blossom rather excited a
benevolent
and kind interest in the feelings of Peter, so far at
least as one could judge of the heart by external
appearances
,
than anything that bore the fierce and uneasy
impulses
of jealousy, he was satisfied that his original
impression
was a mistake.
As le Bourdon flourished his axe, and Margery plied her
needles, making a wholesome provision for the coming
winter, the mysterious Indian would stand, a quarter of an
hour at a time, immovable as a statue, his eyes riveted first
on one, and then on the other. What passed at such
moments
in that stern breast, it exceeds the penetration of
man to say; but that the emotions thus pent within
barriers
that none could pass or destroy, were not always
ferocious
and revengeful, a carefully observant spectator might
possibly have suspected, had such a person been there to
note all the signs of what was uppermost in the chief's
thoughts. Still, gleamings of sudden, but intense ferocity
did occasionally occur; and, at such instants, the
countenance
of this extraordinary being was truly terrific.
Fortunately
,
such bursts of uncontrollable feeling were
transient
,
being of rare occurrence, and of very short duration.
By the time the corporal had his trenches dug, le
Bourdon
was prepared with his palisades, which were just one
hundred in number, being intended to enclose a space of
forty feet square. The men all united in the
transportation
of the timber, which was floated down the river on a
raft of white pine, the burr oak being of a specific gravity
that fresh water would not sustain. A couple of days,
however
,
sufficed for the transportation by water, and as many
more for that by land, between the place of landing and
Castle Meal. This much accomplished, the whole party
rested from their labours, the day which succeeded being
the Sabbath.
Those who dwell habitually amid the haunts of men,
alone thoroughly realize the vast importance that ought to
be attached to the great day of rest. Men on the ocean,
and men in the forest, are only too apt to overlook the
returns
18*
of this Sabbath; thus slowly, but inevitably,
alienating
themselves more and more from the dread Being who
established the festival, as much in his own honour as for
the good of man. When we are told that the Almighty is
jealous of his rights, and desires to be worshipped, we are
not to estimate this wish by any known human standard,
but are ever to bear in mind that it is exactly in
proportion
as we do reverence the Creator and Ruler of heaven
and earth that we are nearest, or farthest, from the
condition
of the blessed. It is probably for his own good, that
the adoration of man is pleasing in the eyes of God.
The missionary, though a visionary and an enthusiast,
as respected the children of Israel, was a zealous observer
of his duties. On Sundays, he never neglected to set up
his tabernacle, even though it were in a howling
wilderness
,
and went regularly through the worship of God,
according
to the form of the sect to which he belonged. His
influence, on the present occasion, was sufficient to cause
a suspension of all labour, though not without some
remonstrances
on the part of the corporal. The latter
contended
that, in military affairs, there was no Sunday known,
unless it might be in peaceable times, and that he had
never heard of entrenchments resting from their labours,
on the part of either the besieger or the besieged. Work
of that sort, he thought, ought to go on, day and night, by
means of reliefs; and, instead of pausing to hold church,
he had actually contemplated detailing fatigue parties to
labour through, not only that day, but the whole of the
succeeding
night.
As for Peter, he never offered the slightest objection to
any of Parson Amen's sermons or prayers. He listened
to both with unmoved gravity, though no apparent
impression
was ever made on his feelings. The Chippewa hunted
on the Sabbaths as much as on any other day; and it was
in reference to this fact that the following little
conversation
took place between Margery and the missionary, as
the party sat beneath the oaks, passing a tranquil
eventide
at midsummer.
How happens it, Mr. Amen, said Margery, who had
insensibly adopted the missionary's
sobriquet
, that no red
man keeps the Sabbath-day, if they are all descended from
the Jews? This is one of the most respected of all the
commandments, and it does not seem naturalMargery's
use of terms was necessarily influenced by association and
educationthat any of that people should wholly forget
the day of rest.
Perhaps you are not aware, Margery, that the Jews,
even in civilized countries, do not keep the same Sabbath
as the Christians, returned the missionary. They have
public worship on a Saturday, as we do on a Sunday. Now,
I did think I saw some signs of Peter's privately
worshipping
yesterday, while
we
were all so busy at our garrison.
You may have observed how thoughtful and silent the chief
was in the middle of the afternoon.
I
did
observe it, said the bee-hunter, but must own
I did not suspect him of holding meeting for any purposes
within himself. That was one of the times when I like
the manners and behaviour of this Injin the least.
We do not knowwe do not knowperhaps his spirit
struggled with the temptations of the Evil One. To me
he appeared to be worshipping, and I set the fact down as
a proof that the red men keep the Jewish Sabbath.
I did not know that the Jews keep a Sabbath different
from our own, else I might have thought the same. But I
never saw a Jew, to my knowledge. Did you, Margery?
Not to know him for one, answered the girl; and
true enough was the remark of each. Five and thirty
years ago, America was singularly not only a Christian but
a Protestant nation. Jews certainly did exist in the towns,
but they were so blended with the rest of the population, and
were so few in number, as scarcely to attract attention to
them as a sect. As for the Romanists, they too had their
churches and their dioceses; but what untravelled
American
had then ever seen a nun? From monks, Heaven be
praised, we are yet spared; and this is said without any
prejudice against the denomination to which they usually
belong. He who has lived much in countries where that
sect prevails, if a man of a particle of liberality, soon learns
that piety and reverence for God, and a deep sense of all
the Christian obligations, can just as well, nay better, exist
in a state of society where a profound submission to
well-established
dogmas is to be found, than in a state of
society
where there is so much political freedom as to induce
the veriest pretenders to learning to imagine that each man
is a church and a hierarchy in his own person! All this
is rapidly changing. Romanists abound, and spots that,
half a century since, appeared to be the most improbable
places in the world to admit of the rites of the priests of
Rome, now hear the chants and prayers of the mass-books.
All this shows a tendency towards that great commingling
of believers, which is doubtless to precede the final fusion
of sects, and the predicted end.
On the Monday that succeeded the Sabbath mentioned,
the corporal had all his men at work, early, pinning
together
his palisades, making them up into manageable bents,
and then setting them up on their legs. As the materials
were all there, and quite ready to be put together, the work
advanced rapidly; and by the time the sun drew near the
western horizon once more, Castle Meal was surrounded
by its bristling defences. The whole was erect and
staylathed
,
waiting only for the earth to be shovelled back into
the trench, and to be pounded well down. As it was, the
palisades offered a great increase of security to those in the
chient
, and both the females expressed their obligations to
their friends for having taken this important step towards
protecting them from the enemy. When they retired for
the night, everything was arranged, so that the different
members of the party might know where to assemble
within the works. Among the effects of Gershom, were a
conch and a horn; the latter being one of those common
instruments of tin, which are so much used in and about
American farm-houses, to call the labourers from the field.
The conch was given to the men, that, in case of need,
they might sound the alarm from without, while the horn,
or trumpet of tin, was suspended by the door of the
chient
,
in order that the females might have recourse to it, at need.
About midnight, long after the whole party had retired
to rest, and when the stillness of the hours of deepest
repose
reigned over the openings, the bee-hunter was awoke
from his sleep by an unwonted call. At first, he could
scarce believe his senses, so plaintive, and yet so wild, was
the blast. But there could be no mistake: it was the horn
from the
chient
, and, in a moment, he was on his feet.
By this time, the corporal was a-foot, and presently all the
men were in motion. On this occasion, Gershom
manifested
a readiness and spirit that spoke equally well for his
heart and his courage. He was foremost in rushing to the
assistance of his wife and sister, though le Bourdon was
very close on his heels.
On reaching the gate of the palisade, it was found closed,
and barred within; nor did any one appear, until Dorothy
was summoned, by repeated calls, in the well-known voice
of her husband. When the two females came out of the
chient
, great was their wonder and alarm! No horn had
been blown by either of them, and there the instrument,
itself, hung on its peg, as quiet and mute as if a blast had
never been blown into it. The bee-hunter, on learning
this extraordinary fact, looked around him anxiously, in
order to ascertain who might be absent. Every man was
present, and each person stood by his arms, no one
betraying
the slightest consciousness of knowing whence the
unaccountable
summons had proceeded!
This has been done by you, corporal, in order to bring
us together, under arms, by way of practice, le Bourdon
at length exclaimed.
False alarms is useful, if not overdone; especially
among raw troops, answered Flint, coolly; but I have
given none to-night. I will own I did intend to have you
all out in a day or two, by way of practice, but I have
thought it useless to attempt too much at once. When the
garrison is finished, it will be time enough to drill the men
to the alarm-posts.
What is your opinion, Peter? continued le Bourdon.
You understand the wilderness, and its ways. To what
is this extr'or'nary call owing? Why have we been brought
here, at this hour?
Somebody blow horn, most likely, answered Peter, in
his unmoved, philosophical manner. 'Spose don't know;
den can't tell. Warrior often hear 'larm on war-path.
This is an onaccountable thing! If I ever heard a
horn, I heard one to-night; yet this is the only horn we
have, and no one has touched it! It was not the conch, I
heard; there is no mistaking the difference in sound
between
a shell and a horn; and there is the conch,
hanging
at Gershom's neck, just where it has been the whole
night.
No one has touched the conch  I will answer for
that
, returned Gershom, laying a hand on the shell, as if
to make certain all was right.
This is most extr'or'nary! I heard the horn, if ears
of mine ever heard such an instrument!
Each of the white men added as much, for every one of
them had distinctly heard the blast. Still neither could
suggest any probable clue to the mystery. The Indians
said nothing; but it was so much in conformity with their
habits for red men to maintain silence, whenever any
unusual
events awakened feelings in others, that no one thought
their deportment out of rule. As for Peter, a statue of
stone could scarcely have been colder in aspect than was
this chief, who seemed to be altogether raised above every
exhibition of human feeling. Even the corporal gaped,
though much excited, for he had been suddenly aroused
from a deep sleep; but Peter was as much superior to
physical
,
as to moral impressions, on this occasion. He made
no suggestion, manifested no concern, exhibited no
curiosity
;
and when the men withdrew, again, to their proper
habitation, he walked back with them, in the same silence
and calm, as those with which he had advanced. Gershom,
however, entered within the palisade, and passed the
remainder
of the night with his family.
The bee-hunter and the Chippewa accidentally came
together, as the men moved slowly towards their own hut,
when the following short dialogue occurred between them.
Is that you, Pigeonswing? exclaimed le Bourdon,
when he found his friend touching an elbow, as if by
chance.
Yes, dis mewant better friend, eh?
No; I'm well satisfied to have you near me, in an
alarm, Chippewa. We've stood by each other once, in
troublesome times; and I think we can do as much,
ag'in.
Yes; stand by frienddat honour. Nebber turn back
on friend; dat my way.
Chippewa, who blew the blast on the horn?can you
tell me
that?
Why you don't ask Peter? He wise chief  know
ebberyt'ing. Young Injin ask ole Injin when don't know
why not young pale-face ask ole man, too, eh?
Pigeonswing, if truth was said, I believe it would be
found that you suspect Peter of having a hand in this
business!
This speech was rather too idiomatic for the
comprehension
of the Indian, who answered according to his own
particular view of the matter.
Don't blow horn wid hand, he saidInjin blow wid
mout', just like pale-face.
The bee-hunter did not reply; but his companion's
remark
had a tendency to revive in his breast, certain
unpleasant
and distrustful feelings towards the mysterious
savage, which the incidents and communications of the
last two weeks had had a strong tendency to put to sleep.
CHAPTER XV.
None knows his lineage, age, or name:
His looks are like the snows of Caucasus; his eyes
Beam with the wisdom of collected ages.
In green, unbroken years he sees, 'tis said,
The generations pass like antumn fruits,
Garner'd, consumed, and springing fresh to life,
Again to perish_____
Hillhouse
.
No further disturbance took place that night, and the
men set about filling up the trenches in the morning
steadily as if nothing had happened. They talked a little
of the extraordinary occurrence, but more was
thought
than
said
. Le Bourdon observed, however, that
Pigeonswing
went earlier than usual to the hunt, and that he
made his preparations as if he expected to be absent more
than the customary time.
As there were just one hundred feet of ditch to fill with
dirt, the task was completed, and that quite thoroughly,
long ere the close of the day. The pounding down of
the earth consumed more time, and was much more
laborious
than the mere tumbling of the earth back into its
former
bed; but even this portion of the work was sufficiently
attended to. When all was done, the corporal himself, a
very critical sort of person in what he called `garrisons,'
was fain to allow that it was as pretty a piece of
palisading
as he had ever laid eyes on. The `garrison'
wanted only one thing, now, to render it a formidable
post  and that was water. No spring or well existing
within its narrow limits, however, he procured two or three
empty barrels, portions of le Bourdon's effects, placed them
within the works, and had them filled with sweet water.
By emptying this water two or three times a week, and
refilling the barrels, it was thought that a sufficient
provision
of that great necessary would be made and kept up.
Luckily the corporal's `garrison' did not drink, and the
want was so much the more easily supplied for the moment.
In truth, the
chient
was now converted into a place of
some strength, when it is considered that artillery had
never yet penetrated to those wilds. More than half the
savages of the west fought with arrows and spears in that
day, as most still do when the great prairies are reached.
A rifleman so posted as to have his body in a great measure
covered by the trunk of a burr oak tree, would be
reasonably
secure against the missives of an Indian, and, using
his own fatal instrument of death, under a sense of
personal
security, he would become a formidable opponent to
dislodge. Nor was the smallness of the work any
objection
to its security. A single well-armed man might
suffice
to defend twenty-five feet of palisades, when he would
have been insufficient to make good his position with twice
the extent. Then le Bourdon had cut loops on three
sides of the hut itself, in order to fire at the bears, and
sometimes at the deer, which had often approached the
building in its days of solitude and quiet, using the window
on the fourth side for the same purpose. In a word, a
sense of increased security was felt by the whole party
when this work was completed, though one arrangement
was still wanting to render it perfect. By separating
the real garrison from the nominal garrison during the
night, there always existed the danger of surprise; and
the corporal, now that his fortifications were finished, soon
devised a plan to obviate this last-named difficulty. His
expedient was very simple, and had somewhat of
barrack-life
about it.
Corporal Flint raised a low platform along one side of
the
chient
, by placing there logs of pine that were squared
on one of their sides. Above, at the height of a man's
head, a roof of bark was reared on poles, and prairie
grass, aided by skins, formed very comfortable
barrack-beds
beneath. As the men were expected to lie with their
heads to the wall of the hut, and their feet outwards, there
was ample space for twice their number. Thither, then,
were all the homely provisions for the night transported;
and, when Margery closed the door of the
chient
, after
returning the bee-hunter's cordial good night, it was with
no further apprehension for the winding of the mysterious
horn.
The first night that succeeded the new arrangement
passed without any disturbance. Pigeonswing did not
return
,
as usual, at sunset, and a little uneasiness was felt
on his account; but, as he made his appearance quite early
in the morning, this source of concern ceased. Nor did
the Chippewa come in empty-handed; he had killed
not only a buck, but he had knocked over a bear in his
rambles, besides taking a mess of famously fine trout from
a brawling stream at no great distance. The fish were
eaten for breakfast, and immediately after that meal was
ended, a party started to bring in the venison and bear's
meat, under the lead of the Chippewa. This party
consisted
of the corporal, Gershom, the bee-hunter, and
Pigeonswing himself. When it left the garrison, the
females were spinning beneath the shade of the oaks, and
the missionary was discoursing with Peter on the subject
of the customs of the latter's people, in the hope of
deriving
facts to illustrate his theory of the ten lost tribes.
The buck was found, suspended from a tree as usual,
at the distance of only a mile from the `garrison', as the
corporal now uniformly called `Castle Meal.' Here the
party divided; Flint and Gershom shouldering the venison,
and Pigeonswing leading the bee-hunter still further from
home in quest of Bruin. As the two last moved through
Vol. I.  19
the park-like trees and glades of the openings, a dialogue
occurred that it may help along the incidents of our legend
to record.
You made a long hunt of it yesterday, Pigeonswing,
observed le Bourdon, as soon as he found himself alone
with his old ally. Why didn't you come in at night
accordin'
to custom.
Too much
see
too much
do
. Dat good reason, eh?
was the answer.
Your
do
was to kill one buck and one bear, no such
great matter after all; and your
see
could not much alter
the case, since seeing a whole regiment of the creatures
couldn't frighten a man like you.
No said frighten, returned the Chippewa sharply.
Squaw frighten, not warrior.
I ask your pardon, Pigeonswing, for supposing such a
thing
possible;
though you will remember I did not think
it very likely to be the fact with
you
. I will give you one
piece of advice, however, Chippewa, which is thisdo not
be ready to jump down every man's throat who may
happen
to think it possible that you might be a little skeary
when enemies are plenty. It is the man who feels
himself
strongest in such matters, that is the least likely to
take offence at any loose remark of this nature. Your
fiery devils go off sometimes at half-cock, because they
have a secret whisperer within that tells 'em the charge is
true. That's all I've to say just now, Chippewa.
Don't knowdon't hear (understand) what you say.
No frighten, tell youdat 'nuff.
No need of being like a steel-trap, InjinI understand,
if you don't. Now, I own I
am
skeary when there is
reason
for it, and all I can say in my own favour is, that I
don't begin to run before the danger is in sight. Here
the bee-hunter paused, and walked some distance in silence.
When he did resume the discourse, it was to add
Though I must confess a man may
hear
danger as well
as
see
it. That horn has troubled me more than I should
like to own to Dorothy and pretty Blossom.
Bess alway let squaw know most den, sometime she
help as well as warrior. Bourdon, you right
ought
to feel
afeard of dat horn.
Ha! Do you then know anything about it,
Pigeonswing
,
that you give this opinion?
Hear him juss like rest. Got ear, why not hear, eh?
Ay, but your manner of speaking just now said more
than this. Perhaps you blew the horn yourself,
Chippewa
?
Didn't touch him, returned the Indian coldly. Want
to sleepdon't want to blow trumpet.
Whom do you then suspect? Is it Peter?
Nodon't touch him nudder. Lay down by me dere
when horn blow.
I'm glad to hear this from you, Pigeonswing, for, to
own the truth, I've had my misgivings about that
onaccountable
Injin, and I did think he might have been up,
and have got hold of the horn.
No touch him at all. Fast 'sleep when horn blow.
What make Peter come in openin', eh? You know?
I know no more than he has himself told me. By his
account there is to be a great council of red men on the
prairie, a few miles from this spot; he is waiting for the
appointed day to come, in order to go and make one of the
chiefs that will be there. Is not this true, Chippewa?
Yes, dat truewhat dat council smoke round fire for,
eh? You know?
No, I do not, and would be right glad to have you tell
me, Pigeonswing. Perhaps the tribes mean to have a
meetin' to determine in their own minds which side they
ought to take in this war.
Not dat nudder. Know well 'nough which side take.
Got message and wampum from Canada fadder, and most
all Injin up this-a-way look for Yankee scalp. Not dat
nudder.
Then I have no notion what is at the bottom of this
council. Peter seems to expect great things from it; that
I can see by his way of talking and looking whenever he
speaks of it.
Peter want to see him very much. Smoke at great
many sich council fire.
Do you intend to be present at this council on Prairie
Round? asked the bee-hunter, innocently enough.
Pigeonswing
turned to look at his companion, in a way that
seemed to inquire how far he was really the dupe of the
mysterious Indian's wiles. Then, suddenly aware of the
importance of not betraying all he himself knew, until the
proper moment had arrived, he bent his eyes forward
again, continuing onward and answering somewhat
evasively
.
Don't know, he replied. Hunter nebber tell. Chief
want venison, and he must hunt. Just like squaw in
pale-face
wigwamwork, worksweep, sweepcook, cook
never know when work done. So hunter hunthunt
hunt.
And for that matter, Chippewa, just like squaw in the
red man's village, too. Hoe, hoedig, digcarry, carry
so that she never knows when she may sit down to rest.
Yes, returned Pigeonswing, coolly nodding his assent
as he moved steadily forward. Dat do right way wid
squaw  juss what he good forjuss what he
made
for
work for warrior and cook his dinner. Pale-face make too
much of squaw.
Not accordin' to your account of their manner of
getting
along, Injin. If the work of our squaws is never
done, we can hardly make too much of them. Where does
Peter keep
his
squaw?
Don't know, answered the Chippewa. Nobody know.
Don't know where his tribe even.
This is very extraor'nary, considering the influence
the man seems to enjoy. How is it that he has so
completely
got the ears of all the red men, far and near?
To this question Pigeonswing gave no answer. His own
mind was so far under Peter's control that he did not
choose to tell more than might be prudent. He was fully
aware of the mysterious chief's principal design, that of
destroying the white race altogether, and of restoring the
red men to their ancient rights, but several reasons
prevented
his entering into the plot heart and hand. In the
first place, he was friendly to the Yankees, from whom
he, personally, had received many favours and no wrongs;
then, the tribe, or half-tribe, to which he belonged had
been employed, more or less, by the agents of the
American
government as runners, and in other capacities, ever
since the peace of '83; and, lastly, he himself had been
left much in different garrisons, where he had not only
acquired his English, but a habit of thinking of the
Americans
as his friends. It might also be added that
Pigeonswing
,
though far less gifted by nature than the mysterious
Peter, had formed a truer estimate of the power of the
`Yankees,' and did not believe they were to be annihilated
so easily. How it happened that this Indian had come to
a conclusion so much safer than that of Peter's, a man of
twice his capacity, is more than we can explain; though
it was probably owing to the accidental circumstances of
his more intimate associations with the whites.
The bee-hunter was by nature a man of observation, a
faculty that his habits had both increased and stimulated.
Had it not been for the manner in which he was
submitting
to the influence of Margery, he would long before have
seen that in the deportment of the Chippewa which would
have awakened his distrust; not that Margery in any way
endeavoured to blind him to what was passing before his
face, but that he was fast getting to have eyes only for her.
By this time she filled not only his waking, but many of his
sleeping thoughts; and when she was not actually before
him, charming him with her beauty, enlivening him with her
artless gaiety, and inspiring him with her innocent humour,
he fancied she was there, imagination, perhaps,
heightening
all those advantages which we have enumerated. When
a man is thoroughly in love, he is quite apt to be fit for very
little else but to urge his suit. Such, in a certain way,
proved to be the case with le Bourdon, who allowed things
to pass unheeded directly before his eyes, that previously
to his acquaintance with Margery would not only have
been observed, but which would have most probably led to
some practical results. The conduct of Pigeonswing was
among the circumstances that were thus overlooked by our
hero. In point of fact, Peter was slowly but surely
working
on the mind of the Chippewa, changing all his opinions
radically, and teaching him to regard every pale-face as an
enemy. The task, in this instance, was not easy; for
Pigeonswing
,
in addition to his general propensities in favour
of the `Yankees,' the result of mere accident, had
conceived
a real personal regard for le Bourdon, and was very
slow to admit any views that tended to his injury. The
19*
struggle in the mind of the young warrior was severe; and
twenty times was he on the point of warning his friend of
the danger which impended over the whole party, when a
sense of good faith towards Peter, who held his word to
the contrary, prevented his so doing. This conflict of
feeling was now constantly active in the breast of the
young savage.
Pigeonswing had another source of uneasiness, to which
his companions were entirely strangers. While hunting,
his keen eyes had detected the presence of warriors in the
openings. It is true he had not seen even one, but he
knew that the signs he had discovered could not deceive
him. Not only were warriors at hand, but warriors in
considerable numbers. He had found one deserted lair,
from which its late occupants could not have departed
many hours when it came under his own notice. By
means of that attentive sagacity which forms no small
portion
of the education of an American Indian, Pigeonswing
was enabled to ascertain that this party, of itself, numbered
seventeen, all of whom were men and warriors. The first
fact was easily enough to be seen, perhaps, there being
just seventeen different impressions left in the grass; but
that all these persons were armed men, was learned by
Pigeonswing through evidence that would have been
overlooked
by most persons. By the length of the lairs he
was satisfied none but men of full stature had been there;
and he even examined sufficiently close to make out the
proofs that all but four of these men carried fire-arms.
Strange as it may seem to those who do not know how keen
the senses become when whetted by the apprehensions
and wants of savage life, Pigeonswing was enabled to
discover signs which showed that the excepted were
provided
with bows, and arrows, and spears.
When the bee-hunter and his companion came in sight
of the carcase of the bear, which they did shortly after
the last remark which we have given in the dialogue
recorded
,
the former exclaimed with a little surprise
How's this, Chippewa! You have killed this beast
with your bow! Did you not hunt with the rifle
yesterday
?
Bad fire rifle off now-a-days, answered Pigeonswing,
sententiously. Make noisenoise no good.
Noise! repeated the perfectly unsuspecting
bee-hunter
.
Little good or little harm can noise do in these
openings, where there is neither mountains to give back
an echo, or ear to be startled. The crack of my rifle has
rung through these groves a hundred times and no harm
come of it.
Forget war-time now. Bess nebber fire, less can't help
him. Pottawattamie hear great way off.
Oh! That's it, is it! You're afraid our old friends
the Pottawattamies may find us out, and come to thank us
for all that happened down at the river's mouth. Well,
continued le Bourdon, laughing, if they wish another
whiskey-spring, I have a small jug left, safely hid against
a wet day; a very few drops will answer to make a
tolerable
spring. You red-skins don't know everything,
Pigeonswing
,
though you are so keen and quick-witted on a trail.
Bess not tell Pottawattamie any more 'bout spring,
answered the Chippewa, gravely; for by this time he
regarded
the state of things in the openings to be so serious
as to feel little disposition to mirth. Why you don't go
home, eh? Why don't med'cine-man go home, too? Bess
for pale-face to be wid pale-face when red man go on
war-path
.
Colour bess keep wid colour.
I see you want to be rid of us, Pigeonswing; but the
parson has no thought of quitting this part of the world
until he has convinced all the red-skins that they are
Jews.
What
he
mean, ch? demanded the Chippewa, with
more curiosity than it was usual for an Indian warrior to
betray. What sort of man Jew, eh? Why call red man
Jew?
I know very little more about it than you do yourself,
Pigeonswing; but such as my poor knowledge is, you're
welcome to it. You've heard of the Bible, I dare say?
Sartainmed'cine-man read him Sunday. Good book
to read, some t'ink.
Yes it's all that, and a great companion have I found
my Bible, when I've been alone with the bees out here in
the openings. It tells us of our God, Chippewa; and
teaches us how we are to please him, and how we may
offend. It's a great loss to you red-skins not to have such
a book among you.
Med'cine-man bring himdon't do much good, yet;
some day, p'r'aps, do better. How dat make red man
Jew?
Why this is a new idea to me, though Parson Amen
seems fully possessed with it. I suppose you know what
a Jew is?
Don't know anyt'ing 'bout him. Sort o' nigger, eh?
No, no, Pigeonswing, you're wide of the mark this
time. But, that we may understand each other, we'll
begin
at the beginning like, which will let you into the whole
history of the pale-face religion. As we've had a smart
walk, however, and here is the bear's meat safe and sound,
just as you left it, let us sit down a bit on this trunk of a
tree, while I give you our tradition from beginning to end,
as it might be. In the first place, Chippewa, the earth
was made without creatures of any sort to live on itnot
so much as a squirrel or a woodchuck.
Poor country to hunt in, dat, observed the Chippewa,
quietly, while le Bourdon was wiping his forehead after
removing his cap. Ojebways stay in it very little time.
This, according to our belief, was before any Ojebway
lived. At length, God made a man, out of clay, and
fashioned him, as we see men fashioned, and living all
around us.
Yes, answered the Chippewa, nodding his head in
assent. Den Manitou put plenty blood in him
dat
make
red
warrior. Bible good book, if tell dat tradition.
The Bible says nothing about any colours; but we
suppose the man first made to have been a pale-face. At
any rate, the pale-faces have got possession of the best parts
of the earth, as it might be, and I think they mean to keep
them. First come, first served, you know. The pale-faces
are many, and are strong.
Stop! exclaimed Pigeonswing, in a way that was very
unusual for an Indian to interrupt another when speaking;
want to ask question  How many pale-face you t'ink is
dere? Ebber count him?
`Count them!  Why, Chippewa, you might as well
count the bees, as they buzz around a fallen tree. You
saw me cut down the tree I last discovered, and saw the
movement of the little animals, and may judge what success
tongue, or eye, would have in counting
them;
now, just as
true would it be to suppose that any man could count the
pale-faces on this earth.
Don't want count
all
, answered Pigeonswing. Want to know how many dis side of great salt lake.
That's another matter, and more easily come at. I
understand you, now, Chippewa; you wish to know how
many of us there are in the country we call America?
Juss so, returned Pigeonswing, nodding in assent.
Dat juss itjuss what Injin want to know.
Well, we do have a count of our own people, from time
to time, and I suppose come about as near to the truth as
men can come in such a matter. There must be about
eight millions of us altogether; that is, old and young, big
and little, male and female.
How many warrior you got?  don't want hear about
squaw and pappoose.
No, I see you're warlike this morning, and want to see
how we are likely to come out of this struggle with your
Great Canada Father. Counting all round, I think we
might muster hard on upon a million of fighting-men
good, bad, and indifferent; that is to say, there must be a
million of us of proper age to go into the wars.
Pigeonswing made no answer for near a minute. Both
he and the bee-hunter had come to a halt alongside of the
bear's meat, and the latter was beginning to prepare his
own portion of the load for transportation, while his
companion
stood thus motionless, lost in thought. Suddenly,
Pigeonswing recovered his recollection, and resumed the
conversation, by saying
What million mean, Bourdon? How many time so'ger
at Detroit, and so'ger on lakes?
A million is more than the leaves on all the trees in
these openings  le Bourdon's notions were a little
exaggerated
,
perhaps, but this was what he
said
yes, more
than the leaves on all these oaks, far and near. A million
is a countless number, and I suppose would make a row of
men as long as from this spot to the shores of the great salt
lake, if not further.
It is probable that the bee-hunter, himself, had no very
clear notion of the distance of which he spoke, or of the
number of men it would actually require to fill the space
he mentioned; but his answer sufficed deeply to impress
the imagination of the Indian, who now helped le Bourdon
to secure his load to his back, in silence, receiving the
same service in return. When the meat of the bear was
securely bestowed, each resumed his rifle, and the friends
commenced their march in, towards the
chient;
conversing
,
as they went, on the matter which still occupied their
minds. When the bee-hunter again took up the history of
the creation, it was to speak of our common mother.
You will remember, Chippewa, he said, that I told
you nothing on the subject of any woman. What I have
told you, as yet, consarned only the first
man
, who was made
out of clay, into whom God breathed the breath of life.
Dat goodmake warrior fuss. Juss right. When
breat' in him, fit to take scalp, eh?
Why, as to that, it is not easy to see whom he was to
scalp, seeing that he was quite alone in the world, until it
pleased his Creator to give him a woman for a companion.
Tell 'bout dat, returned Pigeonswing, with interest
tell how he got squaw.
Accordin' to the Bible, God caused this man to fall into
a deep sleep, when he took one of his ribs, and out of that,
he made a squaw for him. Then he put them both to live
together, in a most beautiful garden, in which all things
excellent and pleasant was to be foundsome such place
as these openings, I reckon.
Any bee dere? asked the Indian, quite innocently.
Plenty honey, eh?
That will I answer for! It could hardly be otherwise,
when it was the intention to make the first man and first
woman perfectly happy. I dare say, Chippewa, if the truth
was known, it would be found that bees was a sipping at
every flower in that most delightful garden!
Why pale-face quit dat garden, eh?Why come here
to drive poor Injin 'way from game? Tell me dat,
Bourdon
,
if he can? Why pale-face ever leave
dat
garden,
when he so han'some, eh?'
God turned him out of it, Chippewayes, he was
turned
out
of it, with shame on his face, for having
disobeyed
the commandments of his Creator. Having left
the garden, his children have scattered over the face of the
earth.
So come here to drive off Injin! Well, dat'e way wid
pale-face! Did ever hear of red man comin' to drive off
pale-face?
I have heard of your red warriors often coming to take
our scalps, Chippewa. More or less of this has been done
every year, since our people have landed in America.
More than that they have not done, for we are too many
to be driven very far in, by a few scattering tribes of
Injins.
T'ink, den, more pale-face dan Injin, eh? asked the
Chippewa, with an interest so manifest, that he actually
stopped in his semi-trot, in order to put the question
More pale-face warrior dan red men?
More! Ay, a thousand times more, Chippewa. Where
you could show one warrior, we could show a thousand!
Now, this was not strictly true, perhaps, but it answered
the purpose of deeply impressing the Chippewa with the
uselessness of Peter's plans, and, sustained as it was by his
early predilections, it served to keep him on the right side,
in the crisis which was approaching. The discourse
continued
,
much in the same strain, until the men got in with
their bear's meat, having been preceded some time by the
others, with the venison.
It is a little singular that neither the questions, nor the
manner of Pigeonswing, awakened any distrust in the
bee-hunter
.
So far from this, the latter regarded all that had
passed as perfectly natural, and as likely to arise in
conversation
,
in the way of pure speculation, as in any other
manner. Pigeonswing intended to be guarded in what he
said and did, for, as yet, he had not made up his mind
which side he would really espouse, in the event of the
great project coming to a head. He had the desire,
natural
to a red man, to avenge the wrongs committed against
his race; but this desire existed in a form a good deal
mitigated by his intercourse with the Yankees, and his
regard for individuals. It had, nevertheless, strangely
occurred
to the savage reasoning of this young warrior, that,
possibly, some arrangement might be effected, by means
of which he should take scalps from the Canadians, while
Peter and his other followers were working their will on
the Americans. In this confused condition, was the mind
of the Chippewa, when he and his companion threw down
their loads, near the place where the provision of game was
usually kept. This was beneath the tree, near the spring
and the cook-house, in order that no inconvenience should
arise from its proximity to the place where the party dwelt
and slept. For a siege, should there be occasion to shut
themselves up within the garrison, the men depended
on the pickled pork, and a quantity of dried meat; of the
latter of which, the missionary had brought a considerable
supply in his own canoe. Among these stores, were a few
dozen of buffaloe's, or bison's, tongues, a delicacy that
would honour the best table in the civilized world, though
then so common among the western hunters, as scarce to
be deemed food as good as the common salted pork and
beef of the settlements.
The evening that followed proved to be one of singular
softness and sweetness. The sun went down in a
cloudless
sky, and gentle airs from the south-west fanned the
warm cheeks of Margery, as she sat, resting from the
labours of the day, with le Bourdon at her side, speaking
of the pleasures of a residence in such a spot. The youth
was eloquent, for he felt all that he said, and the maiden
was pleased. The young man could expatiate on b es in
a way to arrest any one's attention; and Margery delighted
to hear him relate his adventures with these little
creatnres
;
his successes, losses, and journeys.
But are you not often lonely, Bourdon, living here in
the openings, whole summers at a time, without a living
soul to speak to? demanded Margery, colouring to the
eyes, the instant the question was asked, lest it should
subject
her to an imputation against which her modesty
revolted
,
that of wishing to draw the discourse to a discussion
on the means of preventing this solitude in future.
I have not been, hitherto, answered le Bourdon, so
frankly as at once to quiet his companion's sensitiveness,
though I will not answer for the future. Now that I have
so many with me, we may make some of them necessary.
MindI say
some
, not all of my present guests. If I could
have my pick, pretty Margery, the present company would
give me
all
I can desire, and more too. I should not think
of going to Detroit for that companion, since she is to be
found so much nearer.
Margery blushed, and looked downthen she raised her
eyes, smiled, and seemed grateful as well as pleased. By
this time she had become accustomed to such remarks, and
she had no difficulty in discovering her lover's wishes,
though he had never been more explicit. The reflections
natural to her situation threw a shade of gentle seriousness
over her countenance, rendering her more charming than
ever, and causing the youth to plunge deeper and deeper
into the meshes that female influence had cast around him.
In all this, however, one of the parties was governed by a
manly sincerity, and the other by girlish artlessness.
Diffidence
,
one of the most certain attendants of a pure
passion
,
alone kept le Bourdon from asking Margery to
become
his wife; while Margery, herself, sometimes doubted
whether it were possible that any reputable man could
wish to connect himself and his fortunes with a family that
had sunk as low as persons could well sink, in this
country
,
and not lose their characters altogether. With these
doubts and distrusts, so naturally affecting the mind of
each, these young people were rapidly becoming more and
more enamoured; the bee-hunter betraying his passion in
the close, absorbed attentions that more properly belong
to his sex, while that of Margery was to be seen in sudden
blushes, the thoughtful brow, the timid glance, and a cast
of tenderness that came over her whole manner, and, as it
might be, her whole being.
While our young folk were thus employed, now
conversing
cheerfully, now appearing abstracted and lost in
thought, though seated side by side, le Bourdon happened
to look behind him, and saw that Peter was regarding them
with one of those intense, but mysterious expressions of
the countenance, that had, now, more than once attracted
his attention; giving reason, each time, for a feeling in
Vol. I.  20
which doubt, curiosity and apprehension were singularly
mingled, even in himself.
At the customary hour, which was always early, in that
party of simple habits, the whole family sought its rest;
the females withdrew within the
chient
, while the males
arranged their skins without. Ever since the erection of
the palisades, le Bourdon had been in the habit of calling
Hive within the defences, leaving him at liberty to roam
about inside, at pleasure. Previously to this new
arrangement
,
the dog had been shut up in his kennel, in order to
prevent his getting on the track of a deer, or in close
combat
with some bear, when his master was not present to
profit by his efforts. As the palisades were too high for
his leap, this putting him at liberty within them, answered
the double purpose of giving the mastiff room for healthful
exercise, and of possessing a most vigilant sentinel against
dangers of all sorts. On the present occasion, however,
the dog was missing, and after calling and whistling for
him some time, the bee-hunter was fain to bar the gate,
and leave him on the outside. This done, he sought his
skin, and was soon asleep.
It was midnight, when the bee-hunter felt a hand laid
on his own arm. It was the corporal, making this
movement
,
in order to awake him. In an instant the young
man was on his feet, with his rifle in his hand.
Did you not hear it, Bourdon? demanded the
corporal
,
in a tone so low as scarce to exceed a whisper.
Hear what! I've been sleeping, sound as a bee in
winter.
The horn!The horn has been blown twice, and, I
think, we shall soon hear it again.
The horn was hanging at the door of the
chient
, and
the conch, too. It will be easy to see if they are in their
places.
It was only necessary to walk around the walls of the
hut, to its opposite side, in order to ascertain this fact. Le
Bourdon did so, accompanied by the corporal, and just as
each laid a hand on the instruments, which were suspended
in their proper places, a heavy rush was made against the
gate, as if to try its fastenings. These pushes were
repeated
several times, with a violence that menaced the
bars. Of course, the two men stepped to the spot, a
distance
of only a few paces, the gateway of the palisades and
the door of the
chient
being contiguous to each other, and
immediately ascertained that it was the mastiff,
endeavouring
to force his way in. The bee-hunter admitted the
dog, which had been trained to suppress his bark, though
this animal was too brave and large to throw away his
breath, when he had better rely on his force. Powerful
animals
,
of this race, are seldom noisy, it being the province
of the cur, both among dogs and men, to be blustering and
spitting out their venom, at all hours and seasons. Hive,
however, in addition to his natural disposition, had been
taught, from the time he was a pup, not to betray his
presence
unnecessarily by a bark; and it was seldom that his
deep throat opened beneath the arches of the oaks. When
it did, it told like the roaring of the lion in the desert.
Hive was no sooner admitted to the `garrison,' than he
manifested just as strong a desire to get out, as, a moment
before, he had manifested to get in. This, le Bourdon
well knew, indicated the presence of some thing, or
creature
,
that did not properly belong to the vicinity. After
consulting with the corporal, Pigeonswing was called; and
leaving him as a sentinel at the gate, the two others made
a sortie. The corporal was as brave as a lion, and loved
all such movements, though he fully anticipated
encountering
savages, while his companion expected an interview
with bears.
As this movement was made at the invitation of the dog,
it was judiciously determined to let him act as pioneer, on
the advance. Previously to quitting the defences,
however
,
the two adventurers looked closely to their arms.
Each examined the priming, saw that his horn and pouch
were accessible, and loosened his knife in its sheath. The
corporal, moreover, fixed his baggonet, as he called the
formidable, glittering instrument that usually embellished
the end of his musket  a
musket
being the weapon he
chose to carry, while the bee-hunter, himself, was armed
with a long, western
rifle
.
END OF VOL. I.